
Hide
Wiki Loves Monuments: Photograph a monument, help Wikipedia and win!
This is a featured article. Click here for more information.
Chetro Ketl
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
Chetro Ketl
Large circular depression outlined by a stone wall. The bottom is flat and grassy, and has a collection of rectangular stone foundations and smaller circles of stone. A great sandstone cliff towers in the background, and beneath the cliff are other stone foundations that are larger and higher.
Aerial view from the south
An archaeological map of the historic site, marking the locations of significant features
Site map (darker lines denote excavated areas)
Location 	Chaco Culture National Historical Park, New Mexico, United States
Nearest city 	Gallup, New Mexico
Coordinates 	36.06°N 107.95°W
Area 	3 acres (1.2 ha)
Elevation 	6,000 feet (1,800 m)
Built 	945–1070
Architectural style(s) 	Ancestral Puebloan
Governing body 	National Park Service

Chetro Ketl is an Ancestral Puebloan great house and archeological site located in Chaco Culture National Historical Park, New Mexico, United States. Construction on Chetro Ketl began c. 990 and was largely complete by 1075, with significant remodeling occurring in the early and mid-1110s. Following the onset of a severe drought, most Chacoans emigrated from the canyon by 1140; by 1250 Chetro Ketl's last inhabitants had vacated the structure.

The great house was rediscovered in 1823 by the Mexican governor of New Mexico, José Antonio Vizcarra, and in 1849 Lieutenant James Simpson of the United States Army Corps of Engineers documented the major ruins in Chaco Canyon. Edgar L. Hewett, the director of the first archeological field school in the canyon, conducted excavations of Chetro Ketl during 1920 and 1921, and again between 1929 and 1935.

Chaco scholars estimate that it required more than 500,000 man-hours, 26,000 trees, and 50 million sandstone blocks to erect Chetro Ketl. The great house is a D-shaped structure; its east wall is 280 feet (85 m) long, and the north wall is more than 450 feet (140 m); the perimeter is 1,540 feet (470 m), and the diameter of the great kiva is 62.5 feet (19.1 m). Chetro Ketl contained approximately 400 rooms and was the largest great house by area in Chaco Canyon, covering nearly 3 acres (1.2 ha). Chetro Ketl lies 0.4 miles (0.64 km) from Pueblo Bonito, in an area that archeologists call downtown Chaco; they theorize that the area may be an ancestral sacred zone. Chetro Ketl contains architectural elements, such as a colonnade and tower kiva, that appear to reflect a Mesoamerican influence.

Chetro Ketl's purpose is widely debated, but many archeologists believe the building was a place of large-scale ceremony that held an important position within the larger Chacoan system. It may have been occupied primarily by groups of priests and, during times of ritual, pilgrims from outlying communities. Archeologist Stephen H. Lekson believes Chetro Ketl was a palace inhabited by Chacoan royalty, and the scale of its construction was motivated by what architects call "massing"; building imposing structures with the intent to impress onlookers. The building has deteriorated significantly since its rediscovery in the early 19th century, and its usefulness as a source of information about Chacoan culture is slowly diminishing.

Contents

    1 Background
    2 Location and alignment
    3 Construction
        3.1 Timber
        3.2 Stone and mortar
        3.3 Masonry
        3.4 Phases
            3.4.1 McElmo
    4 Abandonment
    5 Rediscovery
        5.1 Etymology
    6 Excavation
        6.1 Artifacts
    7 Description
        7.1 Great kiva
        7.2 Colonnade
        7.3 Agriculture and pottery
        7.4 Purpose
    8 Chacoan system
    9 Deterioration and preservation
    10 References
    11 External links

Background

Long ago in the north, below from the Place of Emergence, everybody came out. Now when those who are everyone's chiefs came out they all went out. They went down south ... They went along coming from the north, and they began to make towns.[1]
 —Cochiti origin myth

During the 10th to 8th millennia BCE, the San Juan Basin was occupied by Paleo-Indians known as the Clovis culture (c. 9,300) and the Folsom tradition (8,500 to 7,500). Projectile points found in the vicinity of Chaco Canyon suggest that hunters may have been active in the region as early as 10,000. By 6,000 the Picosa culture had developed from within the Paleolithic population, as environmental changes caused the eastward movement of animals and people to the Southern Plains, bringing Southwestern and northern Mexican cultures into the San Juan Basin.[2] Cynthia Irwin-Williams proposed that the first human presence in Chaco Canyon dates to a hunter-gatherer society that she named the Oshara Tradition, which developed within the local Archaic (c. 6,000 to 800) Picosa population.[3] The Oshara occupied portions of northwestern New Mexico, northeastern Arizona, southeastern Utah, and central and southwestern Colorado.[4] They harvested jackrabbits in the basin as early as 5500.[5] Irwin-Williams divided the Oshara Tradition into six phases, and during the Armijo phase (1800 to 800) the Arroyo Cuervo area east of Chaco Canyon saw the introduction of maize and the use of rock shelters. She hypothesized that this period saw the beginning of seasonal gatherings of people from around the San Juan Basin, who eventually began to aggregate into larger social units.[6]
A color map of the San Juan Basin
The San Juan Basin
A color map of Ancestral Puebloan boundaries
Area occupied by the Ancestral Puebloans

By 200 BCE, the Basketmaker culture had begun to develop from the Oshara Tradition. At least two groups of transitional Basketmaker II people inhabited the San Juan Basin during this period, as increased rainfall allowed for sustained agriculture and permanent settlements by 1 CE, when the water table rose and intermittent streams became more reliable. During the first four centuries CE, the Basketmaker II people established pit-houses at elevated locations near sources of water and arable land. Brian M. Fagan notes that the development of pottery in the area during the 4th century permitted the boiling of maize and beans for the first time, and "must have brought a revolution in cooking".[7] This period also marked the introduction of the bow and arrow to the region.[8]

Parts of the San Juan Basin saw plentiful rainfall during the 5th to 8th centuries, leading to significant expansion of pit-house communities. Population increases during the 6th century led to the settlement of the area's lowlands, including Chaco Canyon, as the Basketmaker II people changed from a primarily hunter-gatherer society to one based on farming. This culture is known as Basketmaker III, and by 500 at least two such settlements had been established in Chaco Canyon. An important phase of Basketmaker III people is known as the La Plata. One of the earliest La Plata phase sites, Shabik'eshchee Village, was continuously occupied until the early 8th century, when the canyon was home to a few hundred people.[9] Several clusters of Basketmaker III sites have been identified in the vicinity of Chetro Ketl.[10]

As the Basketmaker III people improved their farming techniques during the 8th century, the well-watered areas of the San Juan Basin became densely populated. Greater crop yields necessitated the construction of above-ground storage facilities, which were the first large-scale construction projects in the region. Fagan identifies this as the beginning of the first pueblos, "ushering in a period of profound social tension, population movements, and political change."[11] In his opinion, "by 800, there was no going back. The people of Chaco and elsewhere were locked completely into economies based on maize and bean cultivation."[12] Archeologists refer to the period starting c. 800 as the Pueblo I Period. By the early 10th century the large pit-house settlements had been supplanted by modular construction that later served as the foundation for the Ancestral Puebloan great houses.[13][a] This marks the beginning of the Bonito Phase.[16] During the 10th century, Chaco's population was swelled by a steady influx of immigrants from the San Juan River, approximately 100 miles (160 km) north.[17] Fagan notes, "Within a few centuries, as rainfall became more irregular and life less predictable, the Chacoans embarked on a cultural trajectory that melded ancient traditions with new ideas that were to crystalize into a brilliant and short-lived Southwestern society."[18]
Location and alignment
External images Chaco Research Archive
Interactive map of downtown Chaco
A color map of Chaco Culture National Historic Park
Chaco Culture National Historical Park
A color aerial picture of Chaco Canyon
Aerial overview of downtown Chaco from the east, with Chetro Ketl (lower left), Pueblo Bonito (center), and Pueblo del Arroyo (upper right)

Chaco Canyon lies at the geographic center of the San Juan Basin.[19] It is located in northwestern New Mexico 60 miles (97 km) north of Interstate 40 and 130 miles (210 km) from Gallup, the nearest city. The continental divide is 20 miles (32 km) east.[20] Chaco Canyon was created by the Chaco River, which cut several hundred feet into Chacra Mesa.[19] The elevation of the sandstone canyon and the surrounding high-desert terrain is approximately 6,000 feet (1,800 m). Though most of the Chacoan sites are located at the bottom of the canyon, the group also includes some ruins not in the canyon proper, extending 35 miles (56 km) from Kin Ya'a in the south to Pueblo Alto in the north, and 20 miles (32 km) from Pueblo Pintado to the northeast and Peñasco Blanco in the southwest. In terms of water drainage and cultural affinity, the area is part of the San Juan Basin, which includes Mesa Verde in Colorado and Kayenta, Arizona.[20]

Chetro Ketl lies 0.4 miles (0.64 km) east of Pueblo Bonito, in an area that archeologists call downtown Chaco.[21] Scholars theorize that the area may be an ancestral sacred zone demarcated by a low masonry wall that encloses Chetro Ketl, Pueblo Bonito, and Pueblo del Arroyo.[22] Chetro Ketl's position is symmetrical to Pueblo Bonito; the buildings are equidistant from a north-south axis that runs across the canyon.[23] Anna Sofaer proposed that many of the great houses in Chaco Canyon were constructed to emphasize astronomical alignments; during the minor lunar standstill, the full moon rises along Chetro Ketl's back wall.[24][b]

Chetro Ketl is located opposite a large opening in the canyon known as South Gap, which helped maximize the building's exposure to the sun while increasing visibility and access to the south.[26] Its rear wall runs parallel to the canyon, and at less than 100 feet (30 m) from the cliffs its proximity allowed inhabitants to benefit from passive solar energy emanating from the rocks.[27] Chetro Ketl is not perfectly aligned to the cardinal directions, but its nominal southerly orientation further enhanced solar exposure to its tiered rooms.[28]
Construction

Like other great houses in Chaco Canyon, Chetro Ketl was built over an extended period, during which the Ancestral Puebloans quarried large amounts of sandstone from the surrounding canyon.[29] W. James Judge describes the period from 1030 to 1130 as "Chaco's golden century, a period virtually unmatched elsewhere in the pre-Columbian Southwest".[30] By 1085, the Chacoans had constructed great houses at Chetro Ketl, Pueblo Alto, and Pueblo del Arroyo, during what Fagan describes as "a time of extraordinary growth and outreach".[31]
Timber
Chetro Ketl from the north overlook

In 1983, dendrochronology of wood samples from Chetro Ketl provided information on species selected, season of cutting, wood modification and use, as well as an estimate of the number of trees required to build the great house.[32] Trees were harvested for construction at Chetro Ketl annually, which contrasts with the sporadic patterns found at other sites in the canyon.[33] Whereas a late summer and early fall harvesting time has been documented at other Chacoan sites, the tree felling for Chetro Ketl was undertaken primarily during the spring and early summer. This may indicate that enough in-house labor was available during the farming season, or that specialized groups of Chacoans were dedicated to tree felling irrespective of the agriculture cycle, when most others were busy with field preparation and planting.[34] One particularly well-sampled room suggests that wood was cut during the relatively short span of a couple of weeks per season.[35]
A drawing of Chacoan construction features
Chacoan construction features
A drawing of a Chacoan flat roof
Chacoan flat roof

The most commonly harvested tree species was ponderosa pine; the Chacoans felled approximately 16,000 of them for use at Chetro Ketl, and the species is now absent from the canyon. Archeologists Florence M. Hawley and Neil Judd proposed that a plentiful forest may have existed in and around the canyon during the 10th and 11th centuries, but was eventually destroyed by over-harvesting. Dean and Warren believe this is unlikely, but the presence of trees in the canyon during the 20th century "suggests that some pines may have been locally available for use in the large towns". In their opinion, "the harvesting of trees for Chacoan construction must have decimated ponderosa pine stands and forests for many miles in every direction from Chaco Canyon."[36] Archeologists believe the trees were processed where they were cut, then carried, not dragged, back to Chaco Canyon.[37]

A 2001 analysis of strontium isotopes indicates that after 974 the Chacoans harvested architectural timbers primarily from two locations: the Chuska Mountains and Mount Taylor, in the San Mateo Mountains, both located approximately 47 miles (76 km) distant. Despite their equal proximity, they did not harvest from the Nacimiento Mountains. The selection of timbers from the Chuska and San Mateo ranges, and the avoidance of those from the Nacimiento Mountains, suggests that "regional socioeconomic ties" factored more heavily into timber procurement than "resource depletion with distance and time".[38]

Nearly 78 percent of the estimated 26,000 trees harvested for use at Chetro Ketl were felled between 1030 and 1060. More than 7,000 trees were felled for kiva (round room) construction alone, with approximately 750 used in the great kiva.[39] Roofs typically consisted of primary beams, secondary beams, and one or two layers of split shakes, probably of a juniper species or pinyon pine, which were locally available. Most of the primary and secondary construction beams were of ponderosa pine. In addition to bulk materials, construction required other items in smaller quantities. Cordage was used for lashing roof elements together, and baskets and wood frames were needed for transporting mortar and rock. Other tools, such as digging sticks and hammerstones, were used in quantity; many discarded hammerstones have been found built into the wall interiors.[40]
Stone and mortar
A black-and-white picture of a long brick wall
Chetro Ketl's north wall

Chetro Ketl's walls were constructed using three bulk materials: stone, clay-sand, and water. Two types of stone were used: a hard gray-brown tabular sandstone that forms the bench above Chaco Canyon's cliffs, and a softer, tan, massively-bedded sandstone that forms the cliffs themselves. Chacoans preferred the harder, tabular stone as it was easier to shape, but much of it had to be dug up and levered out of the ground with wooden poles. Because the massive tan stone of the cliff faces was easier to procure, but much more difficult to work, the Chacoans probably used it only after the more easily quarried gray-brown stone beds had been depleted.[41]

The Chacoans used clay or clay-sand and water to make mud mortar. They obtained most of the material from canyon deposits, but some of the clays may have been collected from the base of the cliffs. Clay and clay-sand in soils or stream deposits were accessed by digging large pits, then mixing mortar in the pits and carrying the mix to the construction site in baskets. Water is scarce in Chaco Canyon and construction probably took place primarily during the late summer and early fall rainy season, when it was more readily available. Water was also collected from small reservoirs in the slick rock and deep wells in the bed of Chaco Wash.[40]
Masonry
Chacoan masonry styles
A drawing of masonry wall features
Chacoan wall features

Only the most highly skilled Chacoans shaped and set stone; others carried supplies and mixed mortar. The width of a given wall was determined by its place in a structure. The first story of a two-story wall is always wider than the second. Chacoan walls are often called core-and-veneer, but only the widest walls had cores. The Chacoans tried to build walls with two flush faces, but because the stones were typically quite small, to build a wider wall they built up a space between the two faces; this spacing is often called the core. In most walls, the core consisted of roughly-shaped stone or rubble laid at the same time as the two faces. In others, the faces were built up independently, and the core packed between them. Chacoan walls derive their stability from the degree of contact between stones in the faces and the width of the wall itself, not from the strength of the core.[42]

Chacoan wall faces are typically called "veneers", but they were integral load-bearing elements rather than decorative overlays. The veneers are known for their attention to coursing and detail, and various styles have become synonymous with Chacoan building. Depending on the facing style, the joints between the stones would be filled with spalls or chinks, set in mud mortar; or the coursing could alternate between larger stones and several courses of smaller tablets. Good veneer minimized the amount of exposed mortar, which reduced maintenance, maximized stone contact, and increased the strength of the wall. It also reduced the possibility of structural failure. Aside from structural considerations, some veneers are the result of highly skilled masons working within well-developed craft traditions. Recurring veneer patterns may indicate a widespread style used during a particular period, or they may suggest the work of a specific social group or line of builders.[43]

Doors and vents often had sills of carefully-ground flat stone slabs and lintels constructed from a row of thin wood beams. Chacoan masons also frequently included intramural beams – horizontal logs completely enclosed in the wall core – which were probably intended to reduce horizontal deformation of the wall.[44] The interior walls of great houses were typically covered in a rock veneer. Judd identified four distinct types, and his typology is the most commonly-accepted in the region. Chetro Ketl's interior walls, particularly those in the eastern wing, were covered in a Type IV veneer characterized by uniform pieces of sandstone with little to no exposed mortar. Judd excluded a fifth type of masonry, called McElmo style, from his typology.[45]
Phases
Building phases at Chetro Ketl by Florence M. Hawley
Second phase (1030–1070; masonry types II and III)
Second phase (1062–1090; masonry type III)
Third phase (1100–1116; masonry types III, IV, and V)

In 1934, Florence Hawley used 143 tree-ring dates and a comparative masonry analysis to assemble a construction history of Chetro Ketl in three major periods: 945–1030, from which no significant elements are observable; 1030–90, when construction and remodeling produced most of the building's extant features; and 1100–16, which saw renovation of existing features.[46] In 1983, comprehensive architectural studies by Lekson and McKenna and dendrochronological reanalysis by Dean and Warren largely verified Hawley's construction phases, with significant additions and clarifications.[47] Lekson, Thomas C. Windes, and Patricia Fournier, authors of "The Changing Faces of Chetro Ketl", date the beginning of construction to 990–1000; they based their estimate on 1,285 dated elements from the great house.[48][c] In their opinion, Chetro Ketl was largely complete by 1075, with periodic construction occurring there until the mid-1110s, when the great kiva was remodeled.[50]

Hawley's first period (945–1030) was suggested by tree ring dates scattered throughout later parts of Chetro Ketl. Archeologists subsequently discovered that her second period (1030–90) structure was built directly over an earlier (990–1030) one-story-tall, two-room-wide row of rooms.[51] Lekson shortened Hawley's second period to 1030–75, and subdivided it into at least eight different construction events, including the successive additions of upper stories along the main room block, running the length of the building. After 1075, construction consisted of minor additions and alternations, with the exception of a row of three large, Chaco-style second- and third-story round rooms that were added to the plaza-facing center of the main room block during 1075–95.[52] Much of the later construction, including the large Chaco-style kivas, was in McElmo style masonry, using shaped blocks of relatively soft tan colored sandstone instead of the previously preferred harder, denser dark brown sandstone, which may have been quarried out in the central canyon after 1075.[53] Chetro Ketl required an estimated 50 million sandstone blocks and more than 500,000 man-hours to complete.[54]
McElmo
Main article: McElmo Phase

The McElmo Phase was a period in the late 11th and early 12th centuries, when major changes in ceramics and masonry techniques appeared in Chaco Canyon. Chacoans started using painted black-on-white pottery, and the masonry and layout of great houses built during the period, which was the last major construction era in the canyon, differs significantly from those built during the Bonito Phase (850 to 1140). Archeologists initially believed that the McElmo style was brought to Chaco Canyon by immigrants from Mesa Verde, but subsequent research suggests the developments were of local origin. McElmo black-on-white pottery was abundant in later contexts at Chetro Ketl, and the problematic McElmo style masonry was used in several later additions to the building, including very characteristic Chaco-style kivas.[55]

Chetro Ketl's Kiva G complex was constructed using McElmo-type masonry, and ceramic evidence uncovered from refuse found in the great house indicates a significant McElmo presence.[56] Much of the masonry in North Block F also appears to be McElmo style.[57] A smaller square building known as the Talus Unit lies just west of Chetro Ketl; it contains some McElmo style features.[58] R. Gwinn Vivian (son of Gordon Vivian) notes, "The jury is still out on this question, a problem that poses intriguing possibilities for future work."[59]
Abandonment

They didn't abandon this place. It is still occupied. We can still pray to the spirits living in these places from as far away as our pueblo. The spirits are everywhere. Not just the spirits of our ancestors, but tree spirits and rock spirits. If you believe that everything has a spirit, you will think twice before harming anything.[60]
 —Puebloan oral tradition

The Ancestral Puebloans relied on regular rainfall to sustain their agricultural society. This proved challenging in Chaco Canyon, even with consistent precipitation. By 1130, the rains had diminished and the maize crops that the Chacoans depended on had begun to fail, as the region increasingly suffered from the effects of a devastating, fifty-year drought.[61] After a continuous occupation of more than six hundred years, the Chacoans began to migrate from the canyon.[62] Fagan states that by 1140 "Chaco was finished".[63] A study of 12th-century burials in the Gallup, New Mexico, area indicates as many as half of the people who lived during the drought died before the age of eighteen, with sixty percent of all deaths occurring before age thirty-five. The study estimated that for every woman, four children were needed to sustain the agriculture workforce.[64]

The turning point for Chacoan culture prior to the widespread crop failures of 1130 to 1180 was the especially dry period from 1090 to 1095. Emigration from Chaco Canyon increased significantly during this period, and Puebloan construction in outlying communities such as Mesa Verde, Salmon, and Aztec, began to flourish.[65] Despite rapid depopulation in the canyon, Chetro Ketl's great kiva may have been remodeled and used during the early 13th century.[66] A haphazardly applied layer of rubble veneer to ceremonial areas in the great kiva are thought to have been added during an "organized closure" that probably included a "termination ceremony".[67] Ancient potsherds indicate that the last inhabitants of Chetro Ketl vacated the structure by 1250.[68]
Rediscovery
A color picture of a large ruin with several round rooms
Chetro Ketl, facing west, with the north wall at top right

In the years following the Ancestral Puebloan's departure from Chaco Canyon, several migrations to the region occurred. During the 15th century, Navajo people emigrated to the area from northwestern Canada, and in the 18th century Spanish explorers and settlers came from the south. The Spanish investigated parts of the San Juan Basin, but there is no record of them ever finding Chaco Canyon.[69] When cartographer Bernardo de Miera y Pacheco drew a map in 1774 of Spanish land holdings in the region, he labeled Chaco Canyon with the word Chaca, but it is unlikely he ever visited the area.[70] In 1823 the governor of New Mexico, José Antonio Vizcarra, discovered ancient ruins in the canyon during a military campaign against the Navajo.[71] Vizcarra's account is the first historical record of the Chacoan great houses that were "of such antiquity that their inhabitants were not known to Europeans".[69][d] In 1844, Josiah Gregg made the first published reference to Chaco Canyon in his popular book, Commerce of the Prairies.[71]
A color picture of a tall masonry tower built from tan sandstone
The tower kiva at Chetro Ketl, from the north

The United States started exploring the region following the Mexican–American War of 1846–48 and the acquisition of the New Mexico Territory. During a military campaign against the Navajo in 1849, Lieutenant James Simpson of the United States Army Corps of Engineers became interested in the canyon's ruins.[73] A group led by the governor of Jemez Pueblo, Francisco Hosta, explored the canyon; its members included Simpson and the brothers Richard and Edward Kern, who were respectively an artist and a cartographer.[74] Simpson was impressed by Chetro Ketl's masonry, which he described as "a combination of science and art which can only be referred to a higher stage of civilization and refinement than is discoverable in the works of Mexicans or Pueblos of the present day."[75] Simpson and company documented their findings, noting the location and style of the great houses, taking measurements, and sketching the canyon's major ruins.[73] They described the kivas as "circular apartments sunk in the ground".[76] Simpson briefly explored Chetro Ketl, documenting six of its round rooms and 124 rooms on the ground floor of the four-story building.[77] He noted an especially well-preserved room where "the stone walls still have their plaster upon them in a tolerable state of preservation."[78] Vivian credits Simpson's 1850 report detailing their brief exploration of the canyon and Richard H. Kern's lithographs as the beginning of Chacoan archeology.[73][e] The scientific investigation of Chaco Canyon started when Richard Wetherill began his exploration of the canyon in 1895. Wetherill was well known for his discovery of some of the largest Ancestral Puebloan dwellings in Mesa Verde, and after an invitation from amateur archeologist Sidney Palmer to survey Chaco Canyon, organized a one-month expedition to the region. He secured financial backing for a full season soon afterward, and in 1896 full-scale excavations began at Pueblo Bonito.[80][f]
Etymology

The true origin and meaning of "Chetro Ketl" is unknown.[83] Lekson and Peter J. McKenna note that, although most of the names given to Chacoan ruins are either Spanish or Navajo, "Chetro Ketl is neither."[58] A Mexican guide who worked for the first American expedition in 1849 translated it as "rain town".[84] In 1889, Navajo historian Washington Mathews reported that in Navajo mythology the building is referred to as Kintyél or Kintyéli, which means "broad-house". Other Navajo translations include "house in the corner" and "shining house".[85]
Excavation
A black-and-white photo of a man standing next to a large ruin
Edgar L. Hewett at Chetro Ketl, 1932
A drawing of the ground plan of Chetro Ketl
Excavation map of Chetro Ketl by Florence M. Hawley (1934), with great kiva (lower right) and central room block (top center)

The first formal excavation of Chetro Ketl was conducted during 1920 and 1921 by Edgar L. Hewett, director of Chaco Canyon's first archeological field school.[86] He visited the canyon in 1902, and in 1916 he arranged for the School of American Research to participate in excavations at Chetro Ketl with the Royal Ontario Museum and the Smithsonian Institution. He made some preliminary studies at the end of 1916, but World War I caused the delay of his plans. When work resumed in 1920, financial considerations forced the Smithsonian to withdraw its support.[87]

Hewett suspended his research during Judd's 1924–27 excavation of Pueblo Bonito, financed by the National Geographic Society, but returned to Chetro Ketl in 1929 with graduate students from his newly founded Department of Archaeology and Anthropology at the University of New Mexico.[88] He studied the canyon until 1935, and several Chaco scholars worked for or with him during this period, including Gordon Vivian (father of R. Gwinn Vivian), Edwin Ferdon, Paul Reiter, and Florence M. Hawley.[86] Hewett's methods have been widely criticized, and his work judged to have been substandard, particularly in comparison to the work done by the National Geographic Project.[89] He spent several years excavating Chetro Ketl, but never published a detailed account of his research there.[48] Despite this, much is known about his studies from the theses and dissertations written by students who worked with him.[48]

Hawley began her studies with Hewett in 1929, focusing primarily on dendrochronology and ceramic dating. She spent two summers excavating Chetro Ketl's refuse mound, and demonstrated that charcoal found in it could be used for tree-ring dating. Her 1933 doctoral dissertation showed that the mound's layers represent a reverse stratigraphy.[90] Material from older refuse mounds was often moved and placed on top of contemporary debris. It was then covered by layers of daily waste before still more older debris was piled on top. This resulted in newer material accumulating at the base of the pile, and older material accruing near the top.[91] Subsequent excavations indicated that the mound was likely created by more than typical household waste; numerous layers of it are composed of refuse from large-scale feasts that included the ritualistic smashing of pottery.[92] Hawley worked at the site through 1933, and in Fagan's opinion her comparison dating of masonry walls and potsherds significantly enhanced the study of Chacoan culture. He credits her with aiding the establishment of one of archeology's most accurate chronologies.[93] In 1983, as the only surviving member of Hewett's 1929–33 group of researchers, Hawley noted the difficulties of excavating Chaco Canyon during the Great Depression: "The young archeologists and dendrochronologists of today, struggling to reconstruct Chetro Ketl from the notes, maps, and too scanty publications and incomplete collections of the past, know little of the exigencies which have made their task difficult."[94]
A small oval pieced of turquois with a hole drilled though the top
Chacoan turquoise pendant like those found in Chetro Ketl's great kiva, c. 1000–1040
A color picture of a braided sandal
12th-century Chacoan twined sandal

In 1921, Hewett excavated Chetro Ketl's great kiva, where he discovered a more ancient one buried 12 feet (3.7 m) below.[95] He also found several macaw feathers, but no copper bells like those found at Pueblo Bonito.[96] Hewett was surprised at the lack of exotic items at the site, where no human burials have been found.[97][g] In 1931 and 1932, Reiter and Gordon Vivian discovered caches of turquoise beads and pendants while digging in the great kiva.[99][h] In all, 17,454 beads were recovered from the kiva's buried niches.[101] In 1947, when flood waters from Chaco Wash encroached on Chetro Ketl, Vivian rescued a stash of wooden artifacts from an unexcavated room.[102] Archeologists consider the wooden figures, some of which depict birds, unique in the region. Several black-and-white stone necklaces was also uncovered.[103] Barbara J. Mills, author of Key Debates in Chacoan Archaeology, believes the items represent "evidence of intense ceremonial activity" at Chetro Ketl.[104] Lekson notes that after "spectacular amounts of material" were recovered at Pueblo Bonito, "expectations for Chetro Ketl were undoubtedly high", and although Hewett and his students were ultimately disappointed, he describes the wooden artifacts as "an extraordinary collection".[101] Despite this, scholars continue to regard Chetro Ketl as a place where relatively few items of archeological interest have been uncovered.[101]

Several minerals used for paint pigments were excavated from Chetro Ketl, including charcoal, shale, malachite, iron oxides, hematite, limonite, gypsum, and azurite.[105] Twined sandals, and bones from the ferruginous hawk and the great horned owl have been found there.[106] The relative lack of exotic material uncovered at Chetro Ketl, such as shells, copper bells, and macaw feathers, may indicate its lesser importance compared to Pueblo Bonito, where those items have been found in abundance. Because Chetro Ketl has only been partially excavated definitive conclusions remain elusive.[107][i] In 1937, W. W. Postlethwaite, who had for three seasons directed Hewett's excavation of Chetro Ketl's great kiva, oversaw the final work at the site conducted by the University of New Mexico and the School of American Research.[109][j]
Artifacts

Lekson describes Chetro Ketl as "notoriously sterile", and states that "it is impossible to say how much material was recovered during the many seasons" of excavation there. Field notes indicate that while several major artifacts, including baskets, sandals, painted wood fragments, digging sticks, arrow heads, and crushed pots were found at the great house, the whereabouts of most of these items is "one of the great archaeological mysteries of the Southwest". He ascribes the "almost total disappearance" of the Chetro Ketl artifacts, which were viewed as unimpressive in comparison to those found at Pueblo Bonito, as a consequence of Hewett's flippant treatment of the collection.[101] The Museum of New Mexico holds several items excavated from Chetro Ketl, including pieces of turquoise, a black-on-white pottery canteen, and a fourteen-foot-long stone and shell necklace.[110]
Description
External images Chaco Research Archive: Chetro Ketl
Interactive map
Image gallery
National Park Service map of Chetro Ketl

Chetro Ketl contained approximately 400 rooms and was the largest great house by area in Chaco Canyon; sections of it reached four stories, three of which remain.[111][k] The building covers nearly 3 acres (1.2 ha), with approximately half of that in the enclosed plaza, which was lined by wings of rooms to the north, east, and west.[113] Chetro Ketl's perimeter is 1,540 feet (470 m).[114] The great house is a D-shaped structure; its east-facing wall is 280 feet (85 m) long, and the north wall is more than 450 feet (140 m) long.[112] Rooms were constructed three-deep and three or four stories tall, and terraced so that the ground level that faced the plaza in the center of the building was one-story.[112]

Chetro Ketl had twelve kivas: two large ones in the west wing plaza, one of which is a great kiva, and ten in the central room block, including one known as a tower kiva.[115] The refuse mound was 205 feet (62 m) long, 120 feet (37 m) wide, and 20 feet (6.1 m) tall; it contained between 219,000 and 275,000 cubic feet (6,200 and 7,800 m3) of debris.[116] Chetro Ketl's plaza is raised above the surrounding land by 5.75 feet (1.75 m), a feature that is unique in the canyon, where the plazas of all other great houses are level with the surrounding landscape.[117]
A color picture of a corner dorrway in a large sandstone wall
Corner doorway at Chetro Ketl

At the front of the building is a mysterious feature consisting of two closely spaced parallel walls that archeologists call "the moat". The long and narrow chamber runs along the outside wall, and appears to have been backfilled around the same time that the plaza was raised, c. 1070. The original purpose of the feature is unknown, but tunnels between rooms are found in more northerly Puebloan sites, and the moat would have facilitated movement between Chetro Ketl's wings.[118]

A narrow slit along the north wall's outside surface indicates the presence of an ancient balcony.[111] There are several rooms attached to the rear of the structure that lack direct access to the main building; these are believed to have been dedicated to community storage.[119] Chetro Ketl and Pueblo Bonito are the only two great houses in Chaco Canyon with corner doorways.[120]
Great kiva
A drawing of Chacoan round room features
Chacoan round room features

Great kivas are always much larger and deeper than Chaco-style kivas. Whereas the walls of great kivas always extend above the surrounding landscape, the walls of Chaco-style kivas are flush with the surrounding landscape. Chaco-style kivas are often found incorporated into the central room blocks of great houses, but great kivas are always separate from core structures. Great kivas almost always have a bench that encircles the inner space, but this feature is not found in Chaco-style kivas. Great kivas also tend to include floor vaults, which may have served as foot drums for ceremonial dancers, but Chaco-style kivas do not.[121]

Whereas many of the great kivas in Chaco Canyon are located adjacent to or isolated from their associated great house, Chetro Ketl's, which is 62.5 feet (19.1 m) in diameter, lies within the pueblo's walls.[122] The earliest and lowest floor lies 15 feet (4.6 m) below the current plaza surface.[123] The present floor of the kiva is on average 9.25 feet (2.82 m) below.[124] Several peripheral rooms abutted the structure, which is located in the southeast corner of the space; a smaller round room, known as the Court Kiva, lies 98 feet (30 m) to the west, in the plaza's south-central area.[125] The Court Kiva began as a Chaco-style kiva, but was later remodeled to include several of the defining features of a great kiva.[126]
Chetro Ketl's great kiva
Large circular depression outlined by a stone wall. The bottom is flat and grassy, and has a collection of rectangular stone foundations and smaller circles of stone. A great sandstone cliff towers in the background, and beneath the cliff are other stone foundations that are larger and higher.
From the south
A color picture of a large ancient ruin in summer
Facing east

The outer walls of the great kiva are 2.5 feet (0.76 m) to 3 feet (0.91 m) thick, and date to 1062–90. Hawley identified the masonry as Type III, with a crude Type IV veneer covering the bench that postdates the final construction period (1100–16).[127] An 18 foot (5.5 m) by 10 foot (3.0 m) antechamber is attached to the north end of the space; the passageway between them contained a stairway that rose 8 feet (2.4 m) in nine steps from the kiva floor.[128]

Though few remains of it were found, the great kiva's roof was most likely flat rather than domed, as was typical of smaller kivas in the canyon. It was supported by four large posts, upon which four more beams were attached. This formed the roof's main structure, which was covered with a layer of secondary beams, then juniper splints and bark, before being finished with clay.[129] It is not known if the roofs of great kivas were constructed level with the exterior walls or raised above them, but it is believed that the space between the floor and the roof in Chetro Ketl's great kiva was probably not much more than what would be required for average standing height, approximately 5 to 6 feet (1.5 to 1.8 m).[130]

Thirty-nine crypts, measuring approximately 1 foot (0.30 m) in height, 1.1 feet (0.34 m) wide, and 1.25 feet (0.38 m) deep, have been uncovered in the great kiva. They are spaced approximately 5.3 feet (1.6 m) apart and located around the inner circumference of the outer wall.[127] Some artifacts have been recovered from the crypts, but their purpose is unknown; they may have been shelves or specialized altars.[131] A large bench, measuring 3.33 feet (1.01 m) wide by 2.75 feet (0.84 m) tall, encircles the inside of the space.[132] A firebox, measuring 4.83 feet (1.47 m) by 5.3 feet (1.6 m) and 1.6 feet (0.49 m) tall, was located 5 feet (1.5 m) south of the center of the kiva, and a fire screen that helped supply draft air was located 5 feet (1.5 m) away from the firebox.[124]
Colonnade
A color picture of a large masonry wall
The colonnade at Chetro Ketl (front), with the tower kiva (background)

The site contains a colonnade that Lekson, Windes, and Fournier describe as "prominent, even dominating within the plaza", and "possibly the defining form at Chetro Ketl or even at Chaco."[133] It is not only unique to Chaco Canyon, but also to Ancestral Puebloan architecture as a whole. The nearest similar structure is located more than five hundred miles away at Casas Grandes, in northwestern Mexico.[134] Constructed sometime after 1105, the plaza-facing columns were among the last additions to Chetro Ketl.[135] The colonnade's placement and orientation to the canyon indicate that it was intended to be viewed from inside the building. It was later filled in with masonry to accommodate additional living space.[136] It was 93 feet (28 m) long and contained thirteen columns.[137]

Several scholars have detected a Mesoamerican influence in the feature; Ferdon described it as a "column-fronted gallery" that was "wholly untraditional" in Ancestral Puebloan architecture.[138] He proposed that it was inspired by a Quetzalcoatl cult whose traditions were brought to the region by pochteca traders. In his opinion the influence can also be seen in the site's tower kiva.[139] Lekson, Windes, and Fournier believe the architectural parallels between the colonnade at Chetro Ketl and structures in Mexico "are probably attributable to the adoption of Mesoamerican symbols appropriated by the flow of ideas carried by merchants".[140] In their opinion, the connection "may have been the result of an interaction mechanism of indirect contact between nuclear Mesoamerica and Chaco though northwestern Mexico." They believe the colonnade "is a local architectural interpretation of Mexican models, modified to suit local materials and techniques."[141]
Agriculture and pottery
A map of the Chetro Ketl fields
The Chetro Ketl field
A color picture of a black and white bowl with geometric designs
An example of McElmo black-on-white pottery found at Chaco Canyon
A color picture of a grey ceramic bowl
Chacoan grey ware
A color picture of an orange ceramic bowl
Kayenta orange trade ware

Chaco Canyon is watered by winter storms and localized summer rains that fill the arroyos. Chaco Wash is deep, and it drains to the water table located 20 feet (6.1 m) below the canyon floor.[20] Farming terraces on the mesa wall behind Chetro Ketl may have been used for growing specialized crops such as tobacco, and canals running from Pueblo Bonito to Chetro Ketl probably carried rain water.[142] Chetro Ketl's position in downtown Chaco and its proximity to South Gap further aided agricultural efforts near the great house, as summer storms tended to linger in the opening, funneling moisture to the area.[143]

There is no obvious visual evidence of the linear features usually associated with farm fields in the land surrounding Chetro Ketl, but in 1929 aerial black-and-white images by Charles Lindbergh revealed what appeared to be a rectangular plot. In the early 1970s the National Park Service (NPS) developed a remote sensing program to further investigate the area using color video imagery. When enhanced and viewed in black-and-white, the video revealed a well-defined grid pattern within a larger rectangular section of land near Chetro Ketl.[144] The NPS employed two types of ground level remote sensing devices to search for magnetic and soil anomalies in the alluvium of the canyon floor. A soil density study proved inconclusive, but a magnetometer identified a rectangular feature 50 by 65 feet (15 by 20 m), roughly the same size as those seen in Lindbergh's aerial photographs. The NPS researchers proposed that water had deposited iron-bearing clays in the plots, with the center showing the strongest magnetic evidence. Subsequent comparisons with older data reinforced their conclusion. They determined that had the plots been under heavy alluvium they would not have been detected.[145]

In Vivian's opinion, the Chetro Ketl field represents one of the best examples of Chacoan farming. Approximately 20 acres (8.1 ha) of land were divided into 42 plots measuring 75 by 45 feet (23 by 14 m), with parallel irrigation canals that supplied water to individual parcels. Several scholars have disputed this interpretation, suggesting that the area may instead be the location of an unfinished great house, or it could have been used for mixing mortar or raising frogs and freshwater shrimp.[146] Soil analysis indicates that the field received water from both Chaco Wash and side canyons.[147] Twenty-three similar fields have been detected in Chaco Canyon, but Chetro Ketl's is the only one that has been extensively surveyed.[148] Archeologists estimate that between 2,600 and 3,600 acres (1,100 and 1,500 ha) of arable land was available to Chacoan farmers, whose crops could support approximately 4,000 people.[149] Archeomagnetic analysis indicates the Chetro Ketl field was last used in 1250.[150]

Studies of ancient corn cobs found at Pueblo Bonito suggest that large quantities of the foodstuff were imported to the canyon from the Chuska Mountains, 50 miles (80 km) west, and the San Juan and Animas River areas, 56 miles (90 km) north. Archeologists believe the corn was imported to help feed groups of laborers during large-scale construction projects.[151] The corn cobs are longer, with more rows of kernels, than most examples from the region. This may indicate genetic differences, superior growing conditions, or "preferential watering" of crops intended for consumption at Chaco Canyon.[152]

The black-on-white painted pottery found at Chaco Canyon originated from various places throughout the Four Corners region, including the Red Mesa Valley, northeastern Arizona, the San Juan River, and the Chuska Valley, forty miles distant. Whereas most of the gray ware, non-decorative or utility, pottery uncovered at Puebloan sites was produced locally, more than half of the vessels found in the canyon were imported from places like the Chuska Valley, which supplied the majority of utility pottery found in the region.[153]

Red wares were imported from southeastern Utah until c. 1000, when the Chacoans switched to orange ware products originating from northeastern Arizona, near Kayenta. After 1000, almost no pottery was fired in the canyon, but was instead produced in outlying communities with access to a steady supply of firewood for their kilns.[153] During the period from 1030 to 1100, significantly more pottery was imported to the canyon than before. The extensive Puebloan trade network that dispersed stoneware products throughout the region suggests that, although evidence of large-scale production is lacking, proficient local artisans supplied distant communities as well as their own.[153]
Purpose
A black-and-white picture of a large ruin
Chetro Ketl from the west, 1981

Lekson believes that Chetro Ketl was most likely not occupied by scores of families, and in that sense was not a pueblo as early archeologists had concluded. He also notes that, while most if not all round rooms in the canyon have traditionally been labeled as kivas, the smaller ones found at Chetro Ketl were most likely not kivas, "but the final and most elaborate form of the pit-house", which had served as the region's primary housing structure during the five hundred years prior to the settlement of Chaco Canyon.[154] He proposed that Chacoan great houses were royal palaces; Chetro Ketl was a residence for the elite, but also a central location for governance, storage, craftworks, ritual, and bureaucracy.[155] Many scholars disagree because they assume "palaces imply states", and "it is generally accepted that no Native state ever existed" north of Mexico.[156] In his opinion, the view that palaces cannot exist outside states is misguided, and societies like Chaco may have achieved comparable political complexity on a smaller than typical scale.[157] He considers the political "glass celling" an "almost racist" remnant of early archeologists who assumed Native American political sophistication was, by definition, limited to "chiefdoms" and not capable of attaining statehood.[158]

The consistent lack of artifacts and features in excavated Chacoan rooms suggests they were used primarily for grain storage, but because their combined areas appear to exceed what would reasonably have been needed for foodstuffs – a large crop of corn from all the arable land near Chaco would fit into two rows of rooms at Chetro Ketl – this interpretation lacks support amongst archeologists.[159] Because so many of these rooms are featureless interior spaces that lie below several stories, the scale of their construction may have been motivated by what architects call "massing"; building structures with the primary intention of impressing onlookers.[160]

The rooms of Chetro Ketl may have served as storage space for ritual objects, and the great house may have been occupied primarily by groups of priests, also housing pilgrims during community events, when the population of the canyon increased dramatically. Judge notes that these pilgrims probably assisted in the construction of Chetro Ketl, thus "confirming their affiliation with the larger ritual alliance".[161] The area between Chetro Ketl and Pueblo Bonito may have served as a central location for ceremonies.[162] Because water was crucial to their survival, Chacoan rituals most likely focused on prayers for rain.[163]
Chacoan system
A map of the roads around Pueblo Alto
The road network around the Pueblo Alto community
Large square map of northwestern New Mexico and neighboring parts of, clockwise from left, western Arizona, southeastern Utah, and southwestern Colorado. The map region has a green and blocky rectangular-crescent area at its center labeled Chaco Culture National Historical Park. Radiating from the green region are seven segmented gold lines: "[p]rehistoric roads", each several dozen kilometers in length when measured according to the map scale factor. Roughly seventy red dots mark the location of great house[s]; they are widely spread across the map, many of them far from the green area, near the extremes of the map, more than one hundred kilometers from the green area. Two proceed roughly south, one southwest, one northwest, one straight north, and the last to the southeast. Yellow dots mark the location of modern settlements: Shiprock, Cortez, Farmington, and Aztec to the northwest and north; Nageezi, Cuba, and Pueblo Pintado to the northeast and east; Grants, Crownpoint, and Gallup to the south and southwest. They are connected by a network of gray lines marking various interstate and state highways. A fan of thin blue lines along the northern margins of the map depict the San Juan River and its communicants.
Prehistoric roads and great houses in the San Juan Basin

A long-distance communication system that used smoke and mirrors existed in the region, and direct lines of sight have been established between Pueblo Alto, Huérfano Mountain in northern New Mexico, and Chimney Rock Pueblo in southern Colorado. Messages could have been relayed between these three points within minutes.[162] On the mesa behind Chaco Canyon is an ancient road that runs north from Chetro Ketl, then northward along the east side of Pueblo Alto before joining with the Great North Road.[164][l] The Pueblo Alto road network functioned between 1050 and 1140. It facilitated access to watering holes, terraced farming areas, and enabled interaction between Pueblo Alto and great houses like Pueblo Bonito and Chetro Ketl. It also led to a community along Escavada Wash. It may have served an important function in the transport of household goods, construction timber, and people throughout the San Juan Basin.[166][m] Several road segments appear to be related to a row of Chetro Ketl's exterior rooms, which are thought to have been community storage space.[168]

In 1982 Robert Powers theorized that the road network "suggests an intercommunity organization and settlement system of regional extent".[169] Because "Chaco Canyon is the convergence point of all presently documented extra-canyon roads", the area may represent a locus of regional control, or "the apex of the hierarchical system".[170] Powers believes that great houses like Chetro Ketl were involved in civic coordination between the canyon sites and outlying communities.[171] In 1993 David R. Wilcox proposed that a state-level society developed at Chaco, with an administrative center at Pueblo Bonito or Chetro Ketl. In a 2003 study of Chacoan artifacts, Frances Joan Mathien stated that the number of warrior-class individuals that would have been needed to support such a state – Wilcox estimated 500–1,000 – precludes his theory, and Wilcox is assuming a "greater Chacoan organizational complexity than any other scholar to date".[172]

Lekson developed a theory called the Chaco Meridian, which is based on architectural similarities between the Ancestral Puebloan sites at Aztec Ruins and Chaco Canyon, and Paquime at Casas Grandes in northern Mexico. He believes the sites were intentionally located on the same approximate line of longitude (107°57'25"), and this indicates a ceremonial connection between them. The Great North Road roughly follows the Chaco Meridian, and many of the ancient roads in the area appear to follow it towards key sites in the basin.[173]
Alt a map of the Chacoan system at the peak of development
The Chacoan System at its peak development (1050–1175)
A map of roads and stairways near Chaco Canyon
Distribution of roads and stairs near Chaco Canyon

Judge notes that "virtually all researchers recognize a strong ritual component to Chacoan authority and view the Chacoans as having formed a regional center with a compelling and integrating body of ceremony at its core."[174] Preliminary population estimates for the canyon ranged as high as ten thousand people, but in his opinion a figure closer to two thousand is more likely.[161][n] He views Chaco as a ceremonial center and a "place of ritual architecture", which pilgrims from throughout the San Juan Basin's two hundred great house communities would visit.[161] These pilgrims brought large quantities of goods and raw materials to the canyon, including exotics such as turquoise and shell beads, and also ceramics, timber, and food.[176]

Neutron activation analysis linked an artifact from Chetro Ketl to the Cerrillos Turquoise Mines, located 20 miles (32 km) south of Santa Fe, New Mexico.[177] Analysis of chipped stone from Chetro Ketl's trash mound indicates that more than fifty percent of the chert found there was imported from Washington Pass in the Chuska Mountains, 47 miles (76 km) away.[178] The Chacoans enjoyed a bounty of imports from throughout the San Juan Basin, but little evidence of exports from the canyon has been found. This suggests they were consumers, but not producers or distributors of goods.[176]

Scholars continue to debate whether Chacoan organization was based on primarily political or primarily ritual considerations. Archeological evidence suggests that the residents of great houses like Chetro Ketl were of a higher social class than those living in smaller settlements, which may indicate a systemic inequality that is considered a hallmark of hierarchal political systems.[179] Others view Chaco as an egalitarian society, with an economy driven by its function as the region's ceremonial center.[180] Because there has been little to no modern excavation in the canyon, the question remains largely unanswered. Lynne Sebastian suggests that any analysis based on a strict dichotomy of ritual versus political purpose is inherently misguided, because the Chacoans were most likely deeply influenced by both.[179]

Lekson believes that by the later period (1075 to 1140) "Pueblo Bonito, Chetro Ketl and Pueblo del Arroyo ... together with the numerous other structures in the central canyon, should be considered a coherent analytical settlement unit." He views the structures near South Gap "as a larger settlement of significant complexity" that "when coupled with Chaco's regional centrality and relatively high population density" should be considered "nearly urban". He notes that by the mid-12th century, "Chaco was much closer to being a city than simply a canyon full of independent agricultural towns and villages."[181] At its peak, the Chacoan system covered an estimated 30,000 to 40,000 square miles (78,000 to 104,000 km2), an area roughly the size of Portugal.[182] The population of the region at the beginning of the 11th century was approximately 55,000 people.[183]
Deterioration and preservation
A color picture of a large sandstone ruin
Chetro Ketl from the mesa top, facing west (2008)

Lekson and McKenna note that following the rediscovery of Chetro Ketl in the early 19th century, the building's "pace of dissolution increased alarmingly ... [it] has deteriorated at a faster rate over the last century and a half than in the previous six."[68] Chetro Ketl's wooden elements have proven especially vulnerable in a region that lacks timber, with soldiers, cattlemen, and transients scavenging them from the structure. The rear balcony was present in 1901, but by 1921 the beams had been removed by people scouring the canyon for wood. The process of uncovering beams during excavation has further hastened their deterioration.[184] Chaco Wash, which deepens and widens during summer rain showers, also threatens the canyon's ruins.[20] The once prominent refuse mound has been all but destroyed by repeated trenching and by diverting arroyos near Chetro Ketl.[116] Treasure hunting, livestock grazing, and early National Park Service stabilization efforts also contributed to the degradation of the structure, as have deep excavations that left Chaco Wash prone to flooding. Archeology was responsible for the catastrophic effects of a 1947 flood that destroyed the walls of twenty rooms and collapsed 40 feet (12 m) of the north wall.[185][o] It also toppled Chetro Ketl's tallest remnants.[23]

During the late 1980s, a reburial program was undertaken at Chetro Ketl that sought to preserve the structure's original timbers by backfilling portions of the site with soil. Because only a thin layer of overburden was applied, specialized geosynthetic materials were added to help keep the area dry. The program also developed techniques that facilitate the sampling of ancient wood for assessment of deterioration.[186] Lekson and McKenna note, "the visible building is far from pristine. Most walls have undergone generations of structural and cosmetic treatment ... Chetro Ketl is an artifact deteriorating before our eyes. If the reader is inspired to questions that cannot be answered by the present study, be advised that Chetro Ketl's ability to answer in detail is slowly, but surely, disappearing."[184]
References

    The above article incorporates text from the National Park Service's archeological survey The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl, and Florence M. Hawley's The Significance of the Dated Prehistory of Chetro Ketl, Chaco Cañon, New Mexico, both of which are in the public domain.

Notes

Windes believes that the first Ancestral Puebloan great houses were built not in Chaco Canyon, but in southwestern Colorado, near the Dolores River.[14] Powers, Gillespie, and Lekson note, "it is impossible to determine if construction of the Chaco Canyon structures was earlier than the outlying Chacoan structures, or vice-versa."[15]
Archaeoastronomy suggests Chetro Ketl's great kiva was aligned with Ursa Major.[25]
More tree-ring dates from Chetro Ketl have been collected than for any other Chacoan great house; sixty per cent of all such dates taken at the canyon pertain to the structure.[49]
The Spanish first came to the region around 1540, but there is no evidence that they explored the San Juan Basin before the late 1700s.[72]
In 1877, William Henry Jackson photographed the great houses in Chaco Canyon with the intent to produce model-sized recreations of the structures. He climbed out of the canyon using an ancient stairway, which was later named Jackson Staircase in his honor.[79] Jackson later discovered that the film he used to take photographs of the canyon was defective, and none of the images developed.[73]
The Hyde Exploring Expedition, sponsored by brothers Talbot and Fred Hyde Jr., and directed by Dr. George H. Pepper, conducted excavations in Chaco Canyon until 1901, when accusations of impropriety levied by Hewett put an end to their archeological surveys. A subsequent investigation by Steven Holsinger of the US General Land Office vindicated the Hydes and Wetherill.[81] Wetherill later filed a homestead claim that granted him temporary ownership of Chetro Ketl.[82]
Human remains were uncovered from Chetro Ketl's refuse mound, but poor documentation in the associated records diminished their provenance and archeological usefulness.[98]
The Ancestral Puebloans buried offerings of turquoise during the construction of kivas starting c. 770 CE.[100]
A lobatus galeatus shell, which is rare in Chaco Canyon, was uncovered at Chetro Ketl.[108]
A long period of nearly continuous study at Chaco Canyon ended in 1965, when Vivian and colleague Tom Mathews published their findings on the great house Kin Kletso.[102]
Lekson, Windes, and Fournier estimate that Chetro Ketl was five stories at its tallest, but two levels are now buried below the canyon floor.[112]
Pueblo Alto is central to Chaco's ruins, and although the greater significance of the structure is unknown, it housed an estimated five to twenty families during the late 12th and early 13th centuries.[165]
Several scholars have suggested that the structures are not roads, but symbolic linear expressions of Puebloan mythology, where the shipap, or "place of emergence", lies to the north, and the souls of the dead return to the underworld using the North Road.[167]
Lekson believes the population of Chaco Canyon never exceeded three thousand people.[175]

    Gordon Vivian salvaged more than 180 beams that had been washed from Chetro Ketl during the flood.[68]

Citations

Fagan 2005, p. 78.
Mathien 2005, pp. 61–62, 64.
Fagan 2005, pp. 63–65, 73–74: Oshara; Mathien 2005, pp. 61–62: Oshara as subgroup of Picosa.
Mathien 2005, p. 62.
Fagan 2005, pp. 63–65.
Mathien 2005, pp. 62–63.
Fagan 2005, pp. 66, 72–73.
Mathien 2005, p. 63.
Fagan 2005, pp. 73, 79–82, 85.
Mathien 2005, p. 100.
Fagan 2005, pp. 91–93.
Fagan 2005, p. 73.
Fagan 2005, pp. 91–93, 99.
Windes 2004, p. 21.
Powers, Gillespie & Lekson 1983, p. 247.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 72.
Judge 2004, p. 2.
Fagan 2005, p. 90.
Van Dyke 2004, p. 80.
Hawley 1934, p. 7.
Fagan 2005, p. 9: downtown Chaco; Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 1: 0.4 miles (0.64 km) east of Pueblo Bonito.
Fagan 2005, p. 117.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 163.
Van Dyke 2004, pp. 83–84.
Mathien 2005, p. 219.
Marshall 2003, p. 13.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 1: less than 100 feet from the cliffs; Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 162–63: rear wall is parallel to the canyon.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 155: not aligned to the cardinal directions; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 134: southerly orientation.
Fagan 2005, p. 20: built over an extended period; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 13, 96: sandstone.
Judge 2004, p. 1.
Fagan 2005, p. 134.
Mathien 2005, p. 16.
Fagan 2005, p. 153.
Dean & Warren 1983, p. 239.
Lekson 1984, p. 63.
Dean & Warren 1983, p. 207.
Betancourt, Dean & Hull 1986, p. 370.
English et al. 2001, p. 11891.
Dean & Warren 1983, p. 205.
Lekson 1983c, p. 276.
Lekson 1983c, pp. 275–76.
Lekson 1983c, p. 277.
Lekson 1983c, pp. 277–78.
Lekson 1983c, p. 278.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 279–82.
Dean & Warren 1983, pp. 105–06: dendrochronology and comparative masonry analysis; Hawley 1934, pp. 21–25, 28: masonry types.
Dean & Warren 1983, pp. 105–240: dendrochronological reanalysis; Lekson & McKenna 1983b, pp. 11–105: architectural analysis; Lekson 1984b, pp. 152–192: summary of architectural analysis; Lekson 1983e, pp. 241–73: verified Hawley's construction phases.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 157.
Lekson 1983a, p. xxxix.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 157–58.
Lekson 1984b, pp. 173–84.
Lekson 1984b, pp. 184–89.
Lekson 1984b, pp. 23–24.
Metcalf 2003, p. 77: 500,000 man-hours; Fagan 2005, p. 9: 50 million sandstone blocks.
Lekson 1984b, pp. 267–69; Wills 2009, pp. 283–319.
Lekson 1983e, pp. 263, 317.
Lekson 1983d, p. 101.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 1.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 186.
Fagan 2005, p. 197.
Fagan 2005, pp. 198–201: diminishing rains; Judge 2004, p. 6: "one of the most severe and enduring Southwestern droughts on record".
Vivian 2004, p. 13.
Fagan 2005, p. 199.
Fagan 2005, p. 200.
Fagan 2005, p. 201: Mesa Verde: Vivian 2004, p. 13: Salmon and Aztec.
Windes 2003, pp. 28–29.
Stein, Ford & Friedman 2003, p. 56.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 6.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 17–18.
Fagan 2005, pp. 23–24.
Fagan 2005, p. 24.
Fagan 2005, p. 23.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 18.
Fagan 2005, p. 24: Edward Kern; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 18, 150: Francisco Hosta.
Simpson 2003, p. 36.
Simpson 2003, p. 37.
Fagan 2005, pp. 26–27.
Simpson 2003, pp. 45–46.
Fagan 2005, pp. 28–29.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 19.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 155–56.
Swentzell 2004, p. 52.
Fagan 2005, p. 8: meaning; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 296: origin.
Reed 2004, p. 16.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 98.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 144–45.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 3.
Ellis 1983, p. xxiv: suspended from 1924 to 1927; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 144–45: returned in 1929.
Plog 2015, pp. 7–8.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 142.
Hawley 1937, pp. 297–99.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 269.
Fagan 2005, p. 51.
Ellis 1983, p. xxv.
Fagan 2005, p. 38: early kiva underneath the present one; Vivian & Reiter 1965, p. 27: excavated in 1921.
Mathien 2003, pp. 128–29.
Mathien 2003, p. 135.
Akins 1986, pp. 12–13, 95.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 5: bead caches uncovered during 1931 and 1932; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 284–85: uncovered by Reiter and Vivian.
Mathien 2003, p. 218.
Lekson 1983b, p. 317.
Fagan 2005, p. 39.
Mathien 2003, pp. 135, 140.
Mills 2004, p. 126.
Mathien 1992, p. 313.
Jolie & Webster 2015, p. 113: Twined sandals; Mathien 1992, p. 326: hawk and owl bones.
Fagan 2005, pp. 159–63.
Mathien 1992, p. 289.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, pp. 4–6.
Nobel 2004, p. 132.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 96.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 155.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 155: plaza was lined by wings of rooms; Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 1: size of Chetro Ketl.
Fagan 2005, p. 8.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 1: twelve kivas; Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 155: tower kiva.
Lekson & McKenna 1983b, p. 48.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 159–61.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 161–62.
Fagan 2005, pp. 167–69.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 107.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, pp. 82–96.
Fagan 2005, p. 8: diameter of great kiva; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 114–15, 136: locations of Chacon great kivas.
Lekson & McKenna 1983b, p. 45.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, p. 41.
Lekson & McKenna 1983b, p. 45: peripheral rooms; Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 155–57, 165–66: location in plaza.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, p. 84.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, p. 39.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, pp. 27, 39.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, pp. 36, 42, 46, 49.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, pp. 95–96.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, pp. 84–85.
Vivian & Reiter 1965, pp. 39–41.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 170.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 166.
Lekson 1984b, pp. 189–92.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 166, 170.
Ferdon 1955, p. 4.
Ferdon 1955, p. 4: "column-fronted gallery" and "wholly untraditional"; Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, pp. 166–70: several scholars.
Ferdon 1955, pp. 1–12, 14, 20–26.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 167.
Lekson, Windes & Fournier 2007, p. 169.
Fagan 2005, p. 118: canals; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 289: terraces.
Vivian 2004, p. 10.
Loose 1976, pp. 77–79: NPS remote sensing program; Loose & Lyons 1976, pp. 134–37: Charles Lindbergh.
Loose & Lyons 1976, pp. 134–39.
Loose & Lyons 1976, p. 134: 42 plots; Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 137–39: Ancestral Puebloan farming.
Vivian & Watson 2015, p. 39.
Loose & Lyons 1976, p. 147.
Loose & Lyons 1976, p. 150: Chacoan farmers could support approximately 4,000 people; Mathien 2005, pp. 171, 182: arable land.
Loose & Lyons 1976, pp. 147–53.
Benson et al. 2003, p. 13111.
Cordell et al. 2008, p. 506.
Toll 2004, pp. 34–36.
Lekson 2004, p. 26.
Lekson 2006, pp. 107–08: residence for elites, Vivian & Hilpert 2012, pp. 134–35: palaces of Chacoan royalty.
Lekson 2006, pp. 99–100.
Lekson 2006, pp. 107–08.
Lekson 2006, pp. 110–11.
Powers, Gillespie & Lekson 1983, p. 321.
Lekson 2004, pp. 27–28.
Judge 2004, pp. 4–5.
Lekson 2004, p. 29.
Judge 2004, p. 6.
Mathien 2005, p. 152.
Fagan 2005, pp. 10–11.
Lekson 1983c, p. 276: construction timber; Mathien 2005, pp. 154, 275: goods and people.
Van Dyke 2004, pp. 82–83.
Mathien 2005, pp. 154, 160.
Powers, Gillespie & Lekson 1983, p. 268.
Powers, Gillespie & Lekson 1983, pp. 272, 274.
Powers 1984, p. 32.
Mathien 2003, p. 138.
Vivian & Hilpert 2012, p. 89.
Judge 2004, p. 4.
Lekson 2004, p. 30.
Kantner 2004, p. 76.
Mathien 2005, p. 18.
Betancourt, Dean & Hull 1986, p. 370: distance from Chaco to the Chuska Mountains; Cameron 1984, pp. 141, 144: Washington pass chert; Powers, Gillespie & Lekson 1983, p. 329: 55 percent.
Sebastian 2004, pp. 93–99.
Renfrew 2004, p. 101.
Lekson 1984, pp. 69–71.
Judge 2004, p. 5.
Mills 2004, p. 123.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, p. 7.
Lekson & McKenna 1983a, pp. 6–7.

    Ford et al. 2004, pp. 177–202.

Bibliography

    Akins, Nancy J. (1986), A Biocultural Approach to Human Burials from Chaco Canyon, New Mexico (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 9, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, OCLC 14755644
    Benson, Larry; Cordell, Linda; Vincent, Kirk; Taylor, Howard; Stein, John; Farmer, G. Lang; Futa, Kiyoto (2003), "Ancient Maize from Chacoan Great Houses: Where Was It Grown?", Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America 100 (22): 13111–15
    Betancourt, Julio L.; Dean, Jeffrey S.; Hull, Herbert M. (April 1, 1986), "Prehistoric Long-Distance Transport of Construction Beams, Chaco Canyon, New Mexico", American Antiquity 51 (2): 370–75
    Cameron, Catherine M. (1984), "A Regional View of Chipped Stone Raw Material use in Chaco Canyon", in Judge, W. James; Schelberg, John D, Recent Research on Chaco Prehistory (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 8, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 137–52, OCLC 11711668
    Cordell, Linda S.; Toll, H. Wolcott; Toll, Mollie S; Windes, Thomas C. (2008), "Archaeological Corn from Pueblo Bonito, Chaco Canyon, New Mexico: Dates, Contexts, Sources", American Antiquity 73 (3): 491–511
    Dean, Jeffrey S.; Warren, Richard L. (1983), "Dendrochronology", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 105–237, OCLC 10366311
    Ellis, Florence Hawley (1983), "Foreword", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. xxiii–xxxviii, OCLC 10366311
    English, Nathan B.; Betancourt, Julio L.; Dean, Jeffrey S.; Quade, Jay (2001), Sabloff, Jeremy A., ed., "Strontium Isotopes Reveal Distant Sources of Architectural Timber in Chaco Canyon, New Mexico" (PDF), Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America 98 (21): 11891–96
    Fagan, Brian (2005), Chaco Canyon: Archaeologists Explore the Lives of an Ancient Society, Oxford University Press, ISBN 978-0-19-517043-6
    Ferdon, Edwin Nelson (1955), A Trial Survey of Mexican-Southwestern Architectural Parallels: Monographs of the School of American Research 21, School of American Research, ISBN 978-1-258-32318-9
    Ford, Dabney; Demas, Martha; Agnew, Neville; Blanchette, Robert; Maekawa, Shin; Taylor, Michael Romero; Dowdy, Katherine (2004), "Chaco Canyon reburial programme", Journal of Field Archeology 6 (3–4): 177–202
    Hawley, Florence M. (1934), "The significance of the dated prehistory of Chetro Ketl, Chaco Cañon, New Mexico", The University of New Mexico Bulletin (University of New Mexico Press) 1 (1), OCLC 328211
    Hawley, Florence M. (1937), "Reversed Stratigraphy", American Antiquity 2 (4): 297–99
    Jolie, Edward A.; Webster, Laurie D. (2015), "A Perishable Perspective on Chacoan Social Identities", in Heitman, Carrie C.; Plog, Stephen, Chaco Revisited: New Research on the Prehistory of Chaco Canyon, New Mexico, University of Arizona Press, pp. 96–130, ISBN 978-0-8165-3160-8
    Judge, W. James (2004), "Chaco's Golden Century", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 1–6, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Kantner, John (2004), "Great House Communities and the Chaco World", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 71–77, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1983a), "Preface and Acknowledgments", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, pp. xxxix–x1, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1983b), "Appendix C: Portable Artifacts", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, p. 317, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1983c), "Appendix A: Primer and Glossary of Chacoan Building", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 275–286, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1983d), "Building Stages", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 95–103, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1983e), "Construction History of Chetro Ketl", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 241–71, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H.; McKenna, Peter J. (1983a), "Introduction: Chetro Ketl and this Study", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 1–10, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H.; McKenna, Peter J. (1983b), "Excavation Notes", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture and Dendrochronology of Chetro Ketl (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 6, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 11–49, OCLC 10366311
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1984), "Standing Architecture at Chaco Canyon and the Interpretation of Local and Regional Organization", in Judge, W. James; Schelberg, John D, Recent Research on Chaco Prehistory (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 8, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 55–74, OCLC 11711668
    Lekson, Stephen H. (1984b), Great Pueblo Architecture of Chaco Canyon, New Mexico (PDF), United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, OCLC 15296586
    Lekson, Stephen H. (2004), "Architecture: The Central Matter of Chaco Canyon", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 23–31, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Lekson, Stephen H. (2006), "Lords of the Great House: Pueblo Bonito as a Palace", in Christie, Jessica Joyce; Sarro, Patricia Joan, Palaces and Power in the Americas: From Peru to the Northwest Coast (1st ed.), University of Texas Press, pp. 99–114, ISBN 978-0-292-70984-3
    Lekson, Stephen H.; Windes, Thomas C.; Fournier, Patricia (2007), "The Changing Faces of Chetro Ketl", in Lekson, Stephen H., The Architecture of Chaco Canyon, New Mexico, Chaco Canyon Series, University of Utah Press, pp. 155–78, ISBN 978-0-87480-948-0
    Loose, Richard W. (1976), "Air-borne TV as an Archeological Remote Sensing tool", in Lyons, Thomas R., Remote Sensing Experiments in Cultural Resource Studies: Non-destructive Methods of Archeological Exploration, Survey, and Analysis, Reports of the Chaco Center 1, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 77–80, OCLC 3907525
    Loose, Richard W.; Lyons, Thomas R. (1976), "The Chetro Ketl Field: A Planned Water Control System in Chaco Canyon", in Lyons, Thomas R., Remote Sensing Experiments in Cultural Resource Studies: Non-destructive Methods of Archeological Exploration, Survey, and Analysis, Reports of the Chaco Center 1, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 133–56, OCLC 3907525
    Marshall, Anne Lawrason (2003), "The sitting of Pueblo Bonito", in Neitzel, Jill E., Pueblo Bonito: Center of the Chacoan World, Smithsonian Books, pp. 10–13, ISBN 978-1-58834-131-0
    Mathien, Francis Joan (1992), "Ornaments and Minerals from Site 29SJ 627", in Mathien, Frances Joan, Excavations at 29SJ 627, Chaco Canyon, New Mexico: Volume II. The Artifact Analyses (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 11, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 265–318, OCLC 28760356
    Mathien, Frances Joan (2003), "Artifacts from Pueblo Bonito: One Hundred Years of Interpretation", in Neitzel, Jill E., Pueblo Bonito: Center of the Chacoan World, Smithsonian Books, pp. 127–42, ISBN 978-1-58834-131-0
    Mathien, Frances Joan (2005), Culture and Ecology of Chaco Canyon and the San Juan Basin (PDF), United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, OCLC 61717732
    Metcalf, Mary P. (2003), "Construction Labor at Pueblo Bonito", in Neitzel, Jill E., Pueblo Bonito: Center of the Chacoan World, Smithsonian Books, pp. 72–79, ISBN 978-1-58834-131-0
    Mills, Barbara J. (2004), "Key Debates in Chacoan Archaeology", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 123–30, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Nobel, David Grant, ed. (2004), In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Plog, Stephen (2015), "Understanding Chaco: Past, Present, and Future", in Heitman, Carrie C.; Plog, Stephen, Chaco Revisited: New Research on the Prehistory of Chaco Canyon, New Mexico, University of Arizona Press, pp. 3–29, ISBN 978-0-8165-3160-8
    Powers, Robert P.; Gillespie, William B.; Lekson, Stephen H. (1983), The Outlier Survey: A Regional View of Settlement in the San Juan Basin (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 3, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, OCLC 9416843
    Powers, Robert P. (1984), "Regional Interaction in the San Juan Basin: The Chacoan outlier System", in Judge, W. James; Schelberg, John D, Recent Research on Chaco Prehistory (PDF), Reports of the Chaco Center 8, United States Department of the Interior, National Park Service, pp. 23–36, OCLC 11711668
    Reed, Paul F. (2004), The Puebloan Society of Chaco Canyon, Greenwood Publishing Group, ISBN 978-0-313-32720-9
    Renfrew, Colin (2004), "Chaco Canyon: A View from the Outside", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 101–106, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Sebastian, Lynne (2004), "Understanding Chacoan Society", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 93–99, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Simpson, James H. (2003), McNitt, Frank, ed., Navajo Expedition: Journal of a Military Reconnaissance from Santa Fe, New Mexico, to the Navaho Country, Made in 1849, University of Oklahoma Press, ISBN 978-0-8061-3570-0
    Stein, John R.; Ford, Dabney; Friedman, Richard (2003), "Reconstructing Pueblo Bonito", in Neitzel, Jill E., Pueblo Bonito: Center of the Chacoan World, Smithsonian Books, pp. 33–60, ISBN 978-1-58834-131-0
    Swentzell, Rina (2004), "A Pueblo Woman's Perspective on Chaco Canyon", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 48–53, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Toll, H. Wolcott (2004), "Artifacts in Chaco: Where They Came From and What They Mean", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 32–40, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Van Dyke, Ruth M. (2004), "Chaco's Sacred Geography", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 78–85, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Vivian, Gordon; Reiter, Paul (1965), The Great Kivas of Chaco Canyon and Their Relationships, University of New Mexico Press, ISBN 978-0-8263-0297-7
    Vivian, R. Gwinn (2004), "Puebloan Farmers of the Chacoan World", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 7–13, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8
    Vivian, R. Gwinn; Hilpert, Bruce (2012), The Chaco Handbook: An Encyclopedic Guide (2nd ed.), University of Utah Press, ISBN 978-1-60781-195-4
    Vivian, R. Gwinn; Watson, Adam S. (2015), "Reevaluating and Modeling Agricultural Potential in the Chaco Core", in Heitman, Carrie C.; Plog, Stephen, Chaco Revisited: New Research on the Prehistory of Chaco Canyon, New Mexico, University of Arizona Press, pp. 30–62, ISBN 978-0-8165-3160-8
    Wills, W. H. (2009), "Cultural Identity and the Archaeological Construction of Historical Narratives: An Example from Chaco Canyon", Journal of Archaeological Method and Theory 16: 283–319
    Windes, Thomas C. (2003), "This Old House: Construction and Abandonment at Pueblo Bonito", in Neitzel, Jill E., Pueblo Bonito: Center of the Chacoan World, Smithsonian Books, pp. 14–32, ISBN 978-1-58834-131-0
    Windes, Thomas C. (2004), "The Rise of Early Chacoan Great Houses", in Nobel, David Grant, In Search of Chaco: New Approaches to an Archaeological Enigma, School of American Research Press, pp. 14–21, ISBN 978-1-930618-42-8

External links
	Wikimedia Commons has media related to Chetro Ketl.

    National Park Service – Chetro Ketl
    Chaco Research Archive – Chetro Ketl
    Virtual reality computer models of Chetro Ketl by architect Dennis R. Holloway

Coordinates: 36.0605°N 107.9541°W
Categories:

    Archaeological sites in New Mexico
    Chaco Canyon
    Chaco Culture National Historical Park
    Colorado Plateau
    Former populated places in New Mexico
    Pueblo great houses
    Ancestral Puebloans
    Native American history of New Mexico

Navigation menu

    Create account
    Not logged in
    Talk
    Contributions
    Log in

    Article
    Talk

    Read
    Edit
    View history

    Main page
    Contents
    Featured content
    Current events
    Random article
    Donate to Wikipedia
    Wikipedia store

Interaction

    Help
    About Wikipedia
    Community portal
    Recent changes
    Contact page

Tools

    What links here
    Related changes
    Upload file
    Special pages
    Permanent link
    Page information
    Wikidata item
    Cite this page

Print/export

    Create a book
    Do


Hide
Wiki Loves Monuments: Photograph a monument, help Wikipedia and win!
This is a good article. Click here for more information.
Page semi-protected
Napoleon
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Napoleon Bonapart)
This article is about Napoleon I. For other uses, see Napoleon (disambiguation).
Napoleon
Portrait of Napoleon in his forties, in high-ranking white and dark blue military dress uniform. In the original image He stands amid rich 18th-century furniture laden with papers, and gazes at the viewer. His hair is Brutus style, cropped close but with a short fringe in front, and his right hand is tucked in his waistcoat.
The Emperor Napoleon in His Study at the Tuileries, by Jacques-Louis David, 1812
Emperor of the French
1st reign 	18 May 1804 – 11 April 1814
Coronation 	2 December 1804
Predecessor 	Position created
Napoleon was previously First Consul of the French Republic (1799–1804)
Successor 	Position abolished
Louis XVIII (Bourbon Restoration)
2nd reign 	20 March 1815 – 22 June 1815
Predecessor 	Position re-created
Louis XVIII
Successor 	Position abolished
Louis XVIII (Bourbon Restoration)
King of Italy
Reign 	17 March 1805 – 11 April 1814
Coronation 	26 May 1805
Predecessor 	Charles V (King in 1556)
Napoleon was previously President of the Italian Republic (1802–1805)
Successor 	Victor Emmanuel II (King in 1861)
Protector of the Confederation of the Rhine
Reign 	6 August 1806 –
4 November 1813
Predecessor 	Francis II (Held equivalent post as Holy Roman Emperor)
Successor 	Francis I (Came on to hold equivalent post as President of the German Confederation)
Spouse 	Joséphine de Beauharnais
Marie Louise of Austria
Issue 	Napoleon II
Full name
Napoleon Bonaparte
House 	House of Bonaparte
Father 	Carlo Buonaparte
Mother 	Letizia Ramolino
Born 	15 August 1769
Ajaccio, Corsica, France
Died 	5 May 1821 (aged 51)
Longwood, Saint Helena
Burial 	Les Invalides, Paris, France
Religion 	Roman Catholicism[1] – (see Religions section)
Signature 	
Imperial coat of arms

Napoléon Bonaparte (/nəˈpoʊliən, -ˈpoʊljən/;[2] French: [napɔleɔ̃ bɔnapaʁt], born Napoleone di Buonaparte; 15 August 1769 – 5 May 1821) was a French military and political leader who rose to prominence during the French Revolution and led several succesful campaigns during the Revolutionary Wars. As Napoleon I, he was Emperor of the French from 1804 until 1814, and again in 1815. Napoleon dominated European affairs for over a decade while leading France against a series of coalitions in the Napoleonic Wars. He won most of these wars and the vast majority of his battles, rapidly gaining control of continental Europe before his ultimate defeat in 1815. One of the greatest commanders in history, his campaigns are studied at military schools worldwide and he remains one of the most celebrated and controversial political figures in Western history.[3][4] In civil affairs, Napoleon had a major long-term impact by bringing liberal reforms to the countries that he conquered, especially the Low Countries, Switzerland, Italy, and large parts of Germany. He implemented fundamental liberal reforms in France and throughout Western Europe. [note 1] His lasting legal achievement, the Napoleonic Code, has been adopted in various forms by a quarter of the world's legal systems, from Japan to Quebec.[9][12][13]

Napoleon was born in Corsica to a relatively modest family of noble Tuscan ancestry. Serving in the French army, Napoleon supported the Revolution from the outset in 1789 and tried to spread its ideals to Corsica, but was banished from the island in 1793. Two years later, he saved the French government from collapse by firing on the Parisian mobs with cannons. Appointed General of the Army of Italy at age 26, he began his first military campaign against the Austrians and their Italian allies, scoring a series of decisive victories that made him famous all across Europe. In 1798 he commanded a military expedition to Egypt, conquering the Ottoman province after defeating the Mamelukes and launching modern Egyptology through the discoveries made by his army.

Napoleon engineered a coup in November 1799 and became First Consul of the Republic. With the Concordat of 1801, Napoleon restored the religious powers of the Catholic Church but kept the lands seized by the Revolution. The state nominated the bishops and controlled church finances. He extended his political control over France until the Senate declared him Emperor of the French in 1804, launching the French Empire. Intractable differences with the British meant the French were facing a Third Coalition by 1805. Napoleon shattered this coalition with decisive victories in the Ulm Campaign and a historic triumph at the Battle of Austerlitz, which led to his elimination of the Holy Roman Empire. In October 1805, however, a Franco-Spanish fleet was destroyed at the Battle of Trafalgar, allowing Britain to impose a naval blockade of the French coasts. In retaliation, Napoleon established the Continental System in 1806 to cut off European trade with Britain. The Fourth Coalition took up arms against him the same year because Prussia became worried about growing French influence on the continent. After quickly knocking out Prussia at the battles of Jena and Auerstedt, Napoleon turned his attention towards the Russians and annihilated them in 1807 at Friedland, which forced the Russians to accept the Treaties of Tilsit, the high water mark of the French Empire.

Hoping to extend the Continental System, Napoleon invaded Iberia and declared his brother Joseph the King of Spain in 1808. The Spanish and the Portuguese revolted with British support. The Peninsular War, noted for its brutal guerrilla warfare, lasted six years and culminated in an Allied victory. Fighting also erupted in Central Europe as the Austrians launched another attack against the French in 1809. Napoleon defeated them at the Battle of Wagram, dissolving the Fifth Coalition formed against France. By 1811, Napoleon ruled over 70 million people across an empire that had domination in Europe, which had not witnessed this level of political consolidation since the days of the Roman Empire.[9] He maintained his strategic status through a series of alliances and family appointments. He created a new aristocracy in France while allowing for the return of nobles who had been forced into exile by the Revolution.

Tensions over rising Polish nationalism and the economic effects of the Continental System led to renewed confrontation with Russia. To enforce his blockade, Napoleon launched an invasion of Russia in 1812 that ended in catastrophic failure for the French. In 1813, Prussia and Austria joined Russian forces in a Sixth Coalition against France and, by October 1813, a large Allied army defeated Napoleon at the Battle of Leipzig. The next year, the Allies invaded France and captured Paris, forcing Napoleon to abdicate in April 1814. He was exiled to the island of Elba. The Bourbons were restored to power and the French lost most territories they had conquered since the Revolution. However, Napoleon escaped from Elba in February 1815 and returned to power, only to find himself at war against another coalition which defeated him at the Battle of Waterloo in June. He was captured by the British who imprisoned him on the remote island of Saint Helena. His death in 1821, at the age of 51, was received by shock and grief throughout Europe. In 1840, a million people witnessed his remains returning to Paris, where they still reside at Les Invalides.[14]

Contents

    1 Origins and education
    2 Early career
        2.1 Siege of Toulon
        2.2 13 Vendémiaire
        2.3 First Italian campaign
        2.4 Egyptian expedition
    3 Ruler of France
        3.1 French Consulate
            3.1.1 Temporary peace in Europe
        3.2 French Empire
            3.2.1 War of the Third Coalition
            3.2.2 Middle-Eastern alliances
            3.2.3 War of the Fourth Coalition and Tilsit
            3.2.4 Peninsular War and Erfurt
            3.2.5 War of the Fifth Coalition and Marie Louise
            3.2.6 Invasion of Russia
            3.2.7 War of the Sixth Coalition
            3.2.8 Exile to Elba
            3.2.9 Hundred Days
    4 Exile on Saint Helena
        4.1 Death
            4.1.1 Cause of death
    5 Religions
        5.1 Concordat
        5.2 Religious emancipation
    6 Personality
    7 Image
    8 Reforms
        8.1 Napoleonic Code
        8.2 Warfare
        8.3 Metric system
        8.4 Education
    9 Memory and evaluation
        9.1 Criticism
        9.2 Propaganda and memory
        9.3 Long-term impact outside France
    10 Marriages and children
    11 Titles, styles, honours, and arms
    12 Ancestry
    13 Notes
    14 Citations
    15 References
        15.1 Biographical studies
        15.2 Specialty studies
        15.3 Historiography and memory
    16 External links

Origins and education
Half-length portrait of a wigged middle-aged man with a well-to-do jacket. His left hand is tucked inside his waistcoat.
Napoleon's father, Carlo Buonaparte, was Corsica's representative to the court of Louis XVI of France.

Napoleon was born on 15 August 1769 to Carlo Maria di Buonaparte and Maria Letizia Ramolino in his family's ancestral home, Casa Buonaparte, in Ajaccio, the capital of the island of Corsica. He was their fourth child and third son. This was a year after the island was transferred to France by the Republic of Genoa.[15] He was christened Napoleone di Buonaparte, probably named after an uncle (an older brother, who did not survive infancy, was the first of the sons to be called Napoleone). In his 20s, he adopted the more French-sounding Napoléon Bonaparte.[16][note 2]

The Corsican Buonapartes were descended from minor Italian nobility of Tuscan origin, who had come to Corsica from Liguria in the 16th century.[17][18]
Head and shoulders portrait of a white-haired, portly, middle-aged man with a pinkish complexion, blue velvet coat and a ruffle
The nationalist Corsican leader Pasquale Paoli; portrait by Richard Cosway, 1798

His father, Nobile Carlo Buonaparte, an attorney, was named Corsica's representative to the court of Louis XVI in 1777. The dominant influence of Napoleon's childhood was his mother, Letizia Ramolino, whose firm discipline restrained a rambunctious child.[19] Napoleon's maternal grandmother had married into the Swiss Fesch family in her second marriage, and Napoleon's uncle, the later cardinal Joseph Fesch, would fulfill the role as protector of the Bonaparte family for some years.

He had an elder brother, Joseph; and younger siblings, Lucien, Elisa, Louis, Pauline, Caroline and Jérôme. A boy and girl were born before Joseph but died in infancy. Napoleon was baptised as a Catholic.[20]

Napoleon's noble, moderately affluent background afforded him greater opportunities to study than were available to a typical Corsican of the time.[21] In January 1779, Napoleon was enrolled at a religious school in Autun. In May he was admitted to a military academy at Brienne-le-Château.[22] His mother language was Corsican and he always spoke French with a marked Corsican accent, and never learned to spell French properly.[23] Napoleon was teased by other students for his accent and applied himself to reading.[24] An examiner observed that Napoleon "has always been distinguished for his application in mathematics. He is fairly well acquainted with history and geography... This boy would make an excellent sailor."[25][note 3]

On completion of his studies at Brienne in 1784, Napoleon was admitted to the elite École Militaire in Paris. He trained to become an artillery officer and, when his father's death reduced his income, was forced to complete the two-year course in one year.[27] He was the first Corsican to graduate from the École Militaire.[27] He was examined by the famed scientist Pierre-Simon Laplace.[28]
Early career
Napoleon Bonaparte, aged 23, Lieutenant-Colonel of a battalion of Corsican Republican volunteers

Upon graduating in September 1785, Bonaparte was commissioned a second lieutenant in La Fère artillery regiment.[22][note 4] He served in Valence and Auxonne until after the outbreak of the Revolution in 1789, and took nearly two years' leave in Corsica and Paris during this period. A fervent Corsican nationalist, Bonaparte wrote to the Corsican leader Pasquale Paoli in May 1789, "As the nation was perishing I was born. Thirty thousand Frenchmen were vomited on to our shores, drowning the throne of liberty in waves of blood. Such was the odious sight which was the first to strike me."[30]

He spent the early years of the Revolution in Corsica, fighting in a complex three-way struggle among royalists, revolutionaries, and Corsican nationalists. He supported the Jacobin faction and gained command over a battalion of volunteers. Despite exceeding his leave of absence and leading a riot against a French army in Corsica, he was promoted to captain in the regular army in July 1792.[31]

He returned to Corsica and came into conflict with Paoli, who had decided to split with France and sabotage the French assault on the Sardinian island of La Maddalena.[32] Bonaparte and his family fled to the French mainland in June 1793 because of the split with Paoli.[33]
Siege of Toulon
Main article: Siege of Toulon
Bonaparte at the Siege of Toulon

In July 1793, Bonaparte published a pro-republican pamphlet, Le souper de Beaucaire (Supper at Beaucaire), which gained him the support of Augustin Robespierre, younger brother of the Revolutionary leader Maximilien Robespierre. With the help of his fellow Corsican Antoine Christophe Saliceti, Bonaparte was appointed artillery commander of the republican forces at the siege of Toulon.[34]

He adopted a plan to capture a hill where republican guns could dominate the city's harbour and force the British to evacuate. The assault on the position, during which Bonaparte was wounded in the thigh, led to the capture of the city. He was promoted to brigadier general at the age of 24. Catching the attention of the Committee of Public Safety, he was put in charge of the artillery of France's Army of Italy.[35]

Whilst waiting for confirmation of this post, Napoleon spent time as inspector of coastal fortifications on the Mediterranean coast near Marseille. He devised plans for attacking the Kingdom of Sardinia as part of France's campaign against the First Coalition.[36] Augustin Robespierre and Saliceti, were ready to listen to the freshly promoted artillery general.[37]

Carrying out Bonaparte's plan in the Battle of Saorgio in April 1794, the French army advanced to seize Ormea in the mountains. From Ormea, they thrust west to outflank the Austro-Sardinian positions around Saorge. Later, Augustin Robespierre sent Bonaparte on a mission to the Republic of Genoa to determine that country's intentions towards France.[36]
13 Vendémiaire
Main article: 13 Vendémiaire

Following the fall of the Robespierres in the Thermidorian Reaction in July 1794, one account alleges that Bonaparte was put under house arrest at Nice for his association with the brothers. Napoleon's secretary, Bourrienne, disputed this allegation in his memoirs. According to Bourrienne, jealousy between the Army of the Alps and the Army of Italy (with whom Napoleon was seconded at the time) was responsible.[38] After an impassioned defense in a letter Bonaparte dispatched to representants Salicetti and Albitte, he was acquitted of any wrongdoing.[39]

He was released within two weeks and, due to his technical skills, was asked to draw up plans to attack Italian positions in the context of France's war with Austria. He also took part in an expedition to take back Corsica from the British, but the French were repulsed by the Royal Navy.[40]

By 1795, Bonaparte had become engaged to Désirée Clary, daughter of François Clary. Désirée's sister, Julie Clary, had married Bonaparte's elder brother Joseph.[41] In April 1795, he was assigned to the Army of the West, which was engaged in the War in the Vendée—a civil war and royalist counter-revolution in Vendée, a region in west central France, on the Atlantic Ocean. As an infantry command, it was a demotion from artillery general—for which the army already had a full quota—and he pleaded poor health to avoid the posting.[42]
Etching of a street, there are a lot pockets of smoke due to a group of republican artillery firing on royalists across the street at the entrance to a building
Journée du 13 Vendémiaire. Artillery fire in front of the Church of Saint-Roch, Paris, Rue Saint-Honoré

He was moved to the Bureau of Topography of the Committee of Public Safety and sought, unsuccessfully, to be transferred to Constantinople in order to offer his services to the Sultan.[43] During this period, he wrote a romantic novella, Clisson et Eugénie, about a soldier and his lover, in a clear parallel to Bonaparte's own relationship with Désirée.[44] On 15 September, Bonaparte was removed from the list of generals in regular service for his refusal to serve in the Vendée campaign. He faced a difficult financial situation and reduced career prospects.[45]

On 3 October, royalists in Paris declared a rebellion against the National Convention.[46] Paul Barras, a leader of the Thermidorian Reaction, knew of Bonaparte's military exploits at Toulon and gave him command of the improvised forces in defence of the Convention in the Tuileries Palace. Having seen the massacre of the King's Swiss Guard there three years earlier, he realised artillery would be the key to its defence.[22]

He ordered a young cavalry officer, Joachim Murat, to seize large cannons and used them to repel the attackers on 5 October 1795—13 Vendémiaire An IV in the French Republican Calendar. After 1,400 royalists died, the rest fled.[46] He had cleared the streets with "a whiff of grapeshot", according to the 19th-century historian Thomas Carlyle in The French Revolution: A History.[47][48]

The defeat of the royalist insurrection extinguished the threat to the Convention and earned Bonaparte sudden fame, wealth, and the patronage of the new government, the Directory. Murat married one of his sisters and became his brother-in-law; he also served under Napoleon as one of his generals. Bonaparte was promoted to Commander of the Interior and given command of the Army of Italy.[33]

Within weeks he was romantically attached to the former mistress of Barras, Joséphine de Beauharnais. The couple married on 9 March 1796 in a civil ceremony.[49]
First Italian campaign
Main article: Italian campaigns of the French Revolutionary Wars
A three-quarter-length depiction of Bonaparte, with black tunic and leather gloves, holding a standard and sword, turning backwards to look at his troops
Bonaparte at the Pont d'Arcole, by Baron Antoine-Jean Gros, (ca. 1801), Musée du Louvre, Paris

Two days after the marriage, Bonaparte left Paris to take command of the Army of Italy. He immediately went on the offensive, hoping to defeat the forces of Piedmont before their Austrian allies could intervene. In a series of rapid victories during the Montenotte Campaign, he knocked Piedmont out of the war in two weeks. The French then focused on the Austrians for the remainder of the war, the highlight of which became the protracted struggle for Mantua. The Austrians launched a series of offensives against the French to break the siege, but Napoleon defeated every relief effort, scoring notable victories at the battles of Castiglione, Bassano, Arcole, and Rivoli. The decisive French triumph at Rivoli in January 1797 led to the collapse of the Austrian position in Italy.

The next phase of the campaign featured the French invasion of the Habsburg heartlands. French forces in Southern Germany had been defeated by the Archduke Charles in 1796, but the latter withdrew his forces to protect Vienna after learning about Napoleon's assault. In the first notable encounter between the two commanders, Napoleon pushed back his opponent and advanced deep into Austrian territory after winning at the Battle of Tarvis in March 1797. Alarmed by the French thrust that reached all the way to Leoben, about 100 km from Vienna, the Austrians finally decided to sue for peace.[50] The Treaty of Leoben, followed by the more comprehensive Treaty of Campo Formio, gave France control of most of northern Italy and the Low Countries, and a secret clause promised the Republic of Venice to Austria. Bonaparte marched on Venice and forced its surrender, ending 1,100 years of independence. He also authorized the French to loot treasures such as the Horses of Saint Mark.[51]

His application of conventional military ideas to real-world situations enabled his military triumphs, such as creative use of artillery as a mobile force to support his infantry. He remarked later in life that: "I have fought sixty battles and I have learned nothing which I did not know at the beginning. Look at Caesar; he fought the first like the last."[52]

Bonaparte could win battles by concealment of troop deployments and concentration of his forces on the 'hinge' of an enemy's weakened front. If he could not use his favourite envelopment strategy, he would take up the central position and attack two co-operating forces at their hinge, swing round to fight one until it fled, then turn to face the other.[53] In this Italian campaign, Bonaparte's army captured 150,000 prisoners, 540 cannons and 170 standards.[54] The French army fought 67 actions and won 18 pitched battles through superior artillery technology and Bonaparte's tactics.[55]

During the campaign, Bonaparte became increasingly influential in French politics; he founded two newspapers: one for the troops in his army and another for circulation in France.[56] The royalists attacked Bonaparte for looting Italy and warned he might become a dictator.[57] Bonaparte sent General Pierre Augereau to Paris to lead a coup d'état and purge the royalists on 4 September—Coup of 18 Fructidor. This left Barras and his Republican allies in control again but dependent on Bonaparte, who proceeded to peace negotiations with Austria. These negotiations resulted in the Treaty of Campo Formio, and Bonaparte returned to Paris in December as a hero.[58] He met Talleyrand, France's new Foreign Minister—who would later serve in the same capacity for Emperor Napoleon—and they began to prepare for an invasion of Britain.[33]
Egyptian expedition
Main article: French campaign in Egypt and Syria
Person on a horse looks towards a giant statue of a head in the desert, with a blue sky
Napoleon Bonaparte Before the Sphinx, (ca. 1868) by Jean-Léon Gérôme, Hearst Castle
Cavalry battlescene with pyramids in background
Battle of the Pyramids on 21 July 1798 by Louis-François, Baron Lejeune, 1808

After two months of planning, Bonaparte decided France's naval power was not yet strong enough to confront the Royal Navy. He decided on a military expedition to seize Egypt and thereby undermine Britain's access to its trade interests in India.[33] Bonaparte wished to establish a French presence in the Middle East, with the ultimate dream of linking with a Muslim enemy of the British in India, Tipu Sultan.[59]

Napoleon assured the Directory that "as soon as he had conquered Egypt, he will establish relations with the Indian princes and, together with them, attack the English in their possessions."[60] The Directory agreed in order to secure a trade route to India.[61]

In May 1798, Bonaparte was elected a member of the French Academy of Sciences. His Egyptian expedition included a group of 167 scientists: mathematicians, naturalists, chemists and geodesists among them; their discoveries included the Rosetta Stone, and their work was published in the Description de l'Égypte in 1809.[62]

En route to Egypt, Bonaparte reached Malta on 9 June 1798, then controlled by the Knights Hospitaller. The Grand Master Ferdinand von Hompesch zu Bolheim surrendered after token resistance, and Bonaparte captured an important naval base with the loss of only three men.[63] Napoleon resided at Palazzo Parisio in Valletta for a couple of days.[64][65]

General Bonaparte and his expedition eluded pursuit by the Royal Navy and on 1 July landed at Alexandria.[33] He fought the Battle of Shubra Khit against the Mamluks, Egypt's ruling military caste. This helped the French practice their defensive tactic for the Battle of the Pyramids, fought on 21 July, about 24 km (15 mi) from the pyramids. General Bonaparte's forces of 25,000 roughly equalled those of the Mamluks' Egyptian cavalry. Twenty-nine French[66] and approximately 2,000 Egyptians were killed. The victory boosted the morale of the French army.[67]

On 1 August, the British fleet under Horatio Nelson captured or destroyed all but two French vessels in the Battle of the Nile, and Bonaparte's goal of a strengthened French position in the Mediterranean was frustrated.[68] His army had succeeded in a temporary increase of French power in Egypt, though it faced repeated uprisings.[69] In early 1799, he moved an army into the Ottoman province of Damascus (Syria and Galilee). Bonaparte led these 13,000 French soldiers in the conquest of the coastal towns of Arish, Gaza, Jaffa, and Haifa.[70] The attack on Jaffa was particularly brutal: Bonaparte, on discovering many of the defenders were former prisoners of war, ostensibly on parole, ordered the garrison and 1,400 prisoners to be executed by bayonet or drowning to save bullets.[68] Men, women and children were robbed and murdered for three days.[71]

With his army weakened by disease—mostly bubonic plague—and poor supplies, Bonaparte was unable to reduce the fortress of Acre and returned to Egypt in May.[68] To speed up the retreat, he ordered plague-stricken men to be poisoned.[72] Back in Egypt, on 25 July, Bonaparte defeated an Ottoman amphibious invasion at Abukir.[73]
Ruler of France
Main articles: 18 Brumaire and Napoleonic era
Bonaparte in a simple general uniform in the middle of a scrum of red-robbed members of the Council of Five Hundred
General Bonaparte surrounded by members of the Council of Five Hundred during the Coup of 18 Brumaire, by François Bouchot

While in Egypt, Bonaparte stayed informed of European affairs. He learned that France had suffered a series of defeats in the War of the Second Coalition.[74] On 24 August 1799, he took advantage of the temporary departure of British ships from French coastal ports and set sail for France, despite the fact he had received no explicit orders from Paris.[68] The army was left in the charge of Jean Baptiste Kléber.[75]

Unknown to Bonaparte, the Directory had sent him orders to return to ward off possible invasions of French soil, but poor lines of communication prevented the delivery of these messages.[74] By the time he reached Paris in October, France's situation had been improved by a series of victories. The Republic was, however, bankrupt and the ineffective Directory was unpopular with the French population.[76] The Directory discussed Bonaparte's "desertion" but was too weak to punish him.[74]

Despite the failures in Egypt, Napoleon returned to a hero's welcome. In alliance with the director Emmanuel Joseph Sieyès, his brother Lucien; the speaker of the Council of Five Hundred, Roger Ducos; another Director, Joseph Fouché; and Talleyrand, he overthrew the Directory by a coup d'état on 9 November 1799 ("the 18th Brumaire" according to the revolutionary calendar), and closed down the council of five hundred. Napoleon became "first consul" for ten years, with two consuls appointed by him who had consultative voices only. His power was confirmed by the new "Constitution of the Year VIII", originally devised by Sieyès to give Napoleon a minor role, but rewritten by Napoleon, and accepted by direct popular vote (3,000,000 in favor, 1,567 opposed). The constitution preserved the appearance of a republic but in reality established a dictatorship.[77][78]
French Consulate
Main articles: French Consulate and War of the Second Coalition
Bonaparte, First Consul, by Ingres. Posing the hand inside the waistcoat was often used in portraits of rulers to indicate calm and stable leadership.

Napoleon immediately set up a dictatorship. He drafted the Constitution of the Year VIII and secured his own election as First Consul, and he took up residence at the Tuileries. The constitution was approved in a rigged plebiscite held the following January, with 99.94 percent officially listed as voting "yes."[79]

In 1800, Bonaparte and his troops crossed the Alps into Italy.[note 5] The campaign began badly for the French after Bonaparte made strategic errors; one force was left besieged at Genoa but managed to hold out and thereby occupy Austrian resources.[81] This effort, and French general Louis Desaix's timely reinforcements, allowed Bonaparte narrowly to avoid defeat and to triumph over the Austrians in June at the significant Battle of Marengo.[82]

Bonaparte's brother Joseph led the peace negotiations in Lunéville and reported that Austria, emboldened by British support, would not recognise France's newly gained territory. As negotiations became increasingly fractious, Bonaparte gave orders to his general Moreau to strike Austria once more. Moreau led France to victory at Hohenlinden. As a result, the Treaty of Lunéville was signed in February 1801; the French gains of the Treaty of Campo Formio were reaffirmed and increased.[82] In 1801, Napoleon became President of the French Academy of Sciences and appointed Jean Baptiste Joseph Delambre its Permanent Secretary.[83]
Temporary peace in Europe
See also: Haitian Revolution

France and Britain signed the Treaty of Amiens in March 1802. This called for the withdrawal of British troops from most colonial territories it had recently occupied.[81] Bolstered by this treaty, Napoleon was made First Consul for life in a 10 May plebiscite, with an implausible 99.8% voting in favour. His powers were increased by the Constitution of the Year X including: Article 1. The French people name, and the Senate proclaims Napoleon-Bonaparte First Consul for Life.[84] After this he was generally referred to as Napoleon rather than Bonaparte.[29]

The peace with Britain proved to be uneasy and short-lived.[85] Britain did not evacuate Malta as promised and protested against Bonaparte's annexation of Piedmont and his Act of Mediation, which established a new Swiss Confederation, though neither of these territories were covered by the treaty.[86] The dispute culminated in a declaration of war by Britain in May 1803, and he reassembled the invasion camp at Boulogne.[68]

Saint-Domingue had managed to acquire a high level of political autonomy during the Revolutionary Wars, with Toussaint Louverture installing himself as de facto dictator by 1801. Napoleon saw his chance to recuperate the formerly wealthy colony when he signed the Treaty of Amiens. Under the terms of the treaty, Napoleon agreed to appease British demands by not abolishing slavery in any colonies where the 1794 decree had never been implemented. The resulting Law of 20 May never applied to colonies like Guadeloupe or Guyane, even though rogue generals and other officials used the pretext of peace as an opportunity to reinstate slavery in some of these places. The Law of 20 May officially restored the slave trade to the Caribbean colonies, not slavery itself.[87] Napoleon sent an expedition under General Leclerc designed to reassert control over Sainte-Domingue. Although the French managed to capture Toussaint Louverture, the expedition failed when high rates of disease crippled the French army. In May 1803, the last 8,000 French troops left the island and the slaves proclaimed an independent republic that they called Haïti in 1804.[88] Seeing the failure of his colonial efforts, Napoleon decided in 1803 to sell the Louisiana Territory to the United States, instantly doubling the size of the latter. The selling price in the Louisiana Purchase was less than three cents per acre, a total of $15 million.[3] [89]
French Empire
Main article: First French Empire
See also: Coronation of Napoleon I and Napoleonic Wars

Napoleon faced royalist and Jacobin plots as France's ruler, including the Conspiration des poignards (Dagger plot) in October 1800 and the Plot of the Rue Saint-Nicaise (also known as the infernal machine) two months later.[90] In January 1804, his police uncovered an assassination plot against him which involved Moreau and which was ostensibly sponsored by the Bourbon former rulers of France. On the advice of Talleyrand, Napoleon ordered the kidnapping of Louis Antoine, Duke of Enghien, in violation of neighbouring Baden's sovereignty. After a secret trial the Duke was executed, even though he had not been involved in the plot.[91]
The Coronation of Napoleon by Jacques-Louis David in 1804

Napoleon used the plot to justify the re-creation of a hereditary monarchy in France with himself as emperor. He believed a Bourbon restoration would be more difficult if the Bonapartist succession was entrenched in the constitution.[92] Napoleon was elected as "Emperor of the French" in a plebiscite held in November. Since there would be an heir, it would also make it all but impossible to change the regime by assassinating Napoleon. As before, this vote was implausibly lopsided, with 99.93 percent officially voting yes.

He was crowned by Pope Pius VII as Napoleon I, on 2 December 1804 at Notre Dame de Paris and then crowned Joséphine Empress. According to legend, Napoleon seized the crown out of the hands of the pope at the last minute and crowned himself to avoid being subject to papal authority. However, this story is apocryphal; the coronation procedure had been agreed in advance.[note 6][93] Ludwig van Beethoven, a long-time admirer, was disappointed at this turn towards imperialism and scratched his dedication to Napoleon from his 3rd Symphony.[92]

At Milan Cathedral on 26 May 1805, Napoleon was crowned King of Italy with the Iron Crown of Lombardy. He created eighteen Marshals of the Empire from amongst his top generals, to secure the allegiance of the army.
War of the Third Coalition
Main article: War of the Third Coalition
Colored painting depicting Napoleon receiving the surrender of the Austrian generals, with the opposing armies and the city of Ulm in the background
Napoleon and the Grande Armée receive the surrender of Austrian General Mack after the Battle of Ulm in October 1805. The decisive finale of the Ulm Campaign raised the tally of captured Austrian soldiers to 60,000. With the Austrian army destroyed, Vienna would fall to the French in November.

Great Britain broke the Peace of Amiens and declared war on France in May 1803.[94] In December 1804, an Anglo-Swedish agreement became the first step towards the creation of the Third Coalition. By April 1805, Britain had also signed an alliance with Russia.[95] Having been defeated twice in recent memory by France, and wanting revenge, Austria joined the coalition a few months later.[96]

Before the formation of the Third Coalition, Napoleon had assembled an invasion force, the Armée d'Angleterre, around six camps at Boulogne in Northern France. He intended to use this invasion force to strike at England. Although they never invaded, Napoleon's troops received careful and invaluable training for future military operations.[97] The men at Boulogne formed the core for what Napoleon would later call La Grande Armée. At the start, this French army had about 200,000 men organized into seven corps, which were large field units that contained 36 to 40 cannons each and were capable of independent action until other corps could come to the rescue.[98] A single corps, properly situated in a strong defensive position, could survive at least a day without support, giving the Grande Armée countless strategic and tactical options on every campaign. On top of these forces, Napoleon created a cavalry reserve of 22,000 organized into two cuirassier divisions, four mounted dragoon divisions, one division of dismounted dragoons and one of light cavalry, all supported by 24 artillery pieces.[99] By 1805, the Grande Armée had grown to a force of 350,000 men,[99] who were well equipped, well trained, and led by competent officers.

Napoleon knew the French fleet could not defeat the Royal Navy in a head-to-head battle, so he planned to lure it away from the English Channel through diversionary tactics.[100] The main strategic idea involved the French Navy escaping from the British blockades of Toulon and Brest and threatening to attack the West Indies. In the face of this attack, it was hoped, the British would weaken their defense of the Western Approaches by sending ships to the Caribbean, allowing a combined Franco-Spanish fleet to take control of the channel long enough for French armies to cross and invade.[100] However, the plan unraveled after the British victory at the Battle of Cape Finisterre in July 1805. French Admiral Villeneuve then retreated to Cádiz instead of linking up with French naval forces at Brest for an attack on the English Channel.[101]

By August 1805, Napoleon had realized that the strategic situation had changed fundamentally. Facing a potential invasion from his continental enemies, he decided to strike first and turned his army's sights from the English Channel to the Rhine. His basic objective was to destroy the isolated Austrian armies in Southern Germany before their Russian allies could arrive. On 25 September, after great secrecy and feverish marching, 200,000 French troops began to cross the Rhine on a front of 260 km (160 mi).[102][103] Karl Mack, the Austrian commander, had gathered the greater part of the Austrian army at the fortress of Ulm in Swabia. Napoleon swung his forces to the southeast and the Grande Armée performed an elaborate wheeling movement that outflanked the Austrians positions. The Ulm Maneuver completely surprised General Mack, who belatedly understood that his army had been cut off. After some minor engagements that culminated in the Battle of Ulm, Mack finally surrendered after realizing there was no way to break out of the French encirclement. For just 2,000 French casualties, Napoleon had managed to capture a total of 60,000 Austrian soldiers through his army's rapid marching.[104] The Ulm Campaign is generally regarded as a strategic masterpiece and was influential in the development of the Schlieffen Plan in the late 19th century.[105] For the French, this spectacular victory on land was soured by the decisive victory the Royal Navy attained at the Battle of Trafalgar on 21 October. After Trafalgar, Britain had total domination of the seas for the duration of the Napoleonic Wars.
Napoleon at the Battle of Austerlitz, by François Gérard 1805. The Battle of Austerlitz, also known as the Battle of the Three Emperors, was Napoleon's greatest victory, where the French Empire effectively crushed the Third Coalition.

Following the Ulm Campaign, French forces managed to capture Vienna in November. The fall of Vienna provided the French a huge bounty as they captured 100,000 muskets, 500 cannons, and the intact bridges across the Danube.[106] At this critical juncture, both Tsar Alexander I and Holy Roman Emperor Francis II decided to engage Napoleon in battle, despite reservations from some of their subordinates. Napoleon sent his army north in pursuit of the Allies, but then ordered his forces to retreat so he could feign a grave weakness. Desperate to lure the Allies into battle, Napoleon gave every indication in the days preceding the engagement that the French army was in a pitiful state, even abandoning the dominant Pratzen Heights near the village of Austerlitz. At the Battle of Austerlitz, on 2 December, he deployed the French army below the Pratzen Heights and deliberately weakened his right flank, enticing the Allies to launch a major assault there in the hopes of rolling up the whole French line. A forced march from Vienna by Marshal Davout and his III Corps plugged the gap left by Napoleon just in time. Meanwhile, the heavy Allied deployment against the French right weakened their center on the Pratzen Heights, which was viciously attacked by the IV Corps of Marshal Soult. With the Allied center demolished, the French swept through both enemy flanks and sent the Allies fleeing chaotically, capturing thousands of prisoners in the process. Because of the near-perfect execution of a calibrated but dangerous plan, the battle is often seen as a tactical masterpiece of the same stature as Cannae, the celebrated triumph by Hannibal some 2,000 years before.[107]

The Allied disaster at Austerlitz significantly shook the faith of Emperor Francis in the British-led war effort. France and Austria agreed to an armistice immediately and the Treaty of Pressburg followed shortly after, on 26 December. Pressburg took Austria out of both the war and the Coalition while reinforcing the earlier treaties of Campo Formio and of Lunéville between the two powers. The treaty confirmed the Austrian loss of lands in Italy and Bavaria to France, and in Germany to Napoleon's German allies. It also imposed an indemnity of 40 million francs on the defeated Habsburgs and allowed the fleeing Russian troops free passage through hostile territories and back to their home soil. Napoleon would go on to say, "The battle of Austerlitz is the finest of all I have fought."[108] Frank McLynn suggests Napoleon was so successful at Austerlitz he lost touch with reality, and what used to be French foreign policy became a "personal Napoleonic one".[109] Vincent Cronin disagrees, stating Napoleon was not overly ambitious for himself, that "he embodied the ambitions of thirty million Frenchmen".[110]
Middle-Eastern alliances
Main articles: Franco-Ottoman alliance and Franco-Persian alliance

Napoleon continued to entertain a grand scheme to establish a French presence in the Middle East in order to put pressure on Britain and Russia, and perhaps form an alliance with the Ottoman Empire.[59] In February 1806, the Ottoman Emperor Selim III finally recognized Napoleon as Emperor. He also opted for an alliance with France, calling the latter "our sincere and natural ally."[111] The decision to ally with France brought the Ottoman Empire into a losing war against Russia and Britain. A Franco-Persian alliance was also formed between Napoleon and the Persian Empire of Fat′h-Ali Shah Qajar. It collapsed in 1807, when France and Russia themselves formed an unexpected alliance.[59] In the end, Napoleon had made no effective alliances in the Middle East.
War of the Fourth Coalition and Tilsit
Main article: War of the Fourth Coalition

After Austerlitz, Napoleon established the Confederation of the Rhine in 1806. A collection of German states intended to serve as a buffer zone between France and Central Europe, the creation of the Confederation spelled the end of the Holy Roman Empire and significantly alarmed the Prussians. The brazen reorganization of German territory by the French risked threatening Prussian influence in the region, if not eliminating it outright. War fever in Berlin rose steadily throughout the summer of 1806. At the insistence of his court, especially his wife Queen Louise, Frederick III decided to challenge the French domination of Central Europe by going to war.
Napoleon reviews the Imperial Guard before the Battle of Jena.

The initial military maneuvers began in September 1806. In a notable letter to Marshal Soult detailing the plan for the campaign, Napoleon described the essential features of Napoleonic warfare and introduced the phrase le bataillon-carré ('square battalion').[112] In the bataillon-carré system, the various corps of the Grande Armée would march uniformly together in close supporting distance.[112] If any single corps was attacked, the others could quickly spring into action and arrive to help. Napoleon invaded Prussia with 180,000 troops, rapidly marching on the right bank of the River Saale. As in previous campaigns, his fundamental objective was to destroy one opponent before reinforcements from another could tip the balance of the war. Upon learning the whereabouts of the Prussian army, the French swung westwards and crossed the Saale with overwhelming force. At the twin battles of Jena and Auerstedt, fought on 14 October, the French convincingly defeated the Prussians and inflicted heavy casualties. With several major commanders dead or incapacitated, the Prussian king proved incapable of effectively commanding the army, which began to quickly disintegrate. In a vaunted pursuit that epitomized the "peak of Napoleonic warfare," according to historian Richard Brooks,[113] the French managed to capture 140,000 soldiers, over 2,000 cannons and hundreds of ammunition wagons, all in a single month. Historian David Chandler wrote of the Prussian forces: "Never has the morale of any army been more completely shattered."[114] Despite their overwhelming defeat, the Prussians refused to negotiate with the French until the Russians had an opportunity to enter the fight.
The Treaties of Tilsit: Napoleon meeting with Alexander I of Russia on a raft in the middle of the Neman River

Following his triumph, Napoleon imposed the first elements of the Continental System through the Berlin Decree issued in November 1806. The Continental System, which prohibited European nations from trading with Britain, was widely violated throughout his reign.[115][116] In the next few months, Napoleon marched against the advancing Russian armies through Poland and was involved in the bloody stalemate at the Battle of Eylau in February 1807.[117] After a period of rest and consolidation on both sides, the war restarted in June with an initial struggle at Heilsberg that proved indecisive. On 14 June, however, Napoleon finally obtained an overwhelming victory over the Russians at the Battle of Friedland, wiping out the majority of the Russian army in a very bloody struggle. The scale of their defeat convinced the Russians to make peace with the French. On 19 June, Czar Alexander sent an envoy to seek an armistice with Napoleon. The latter assured the envoy that the Vistula River represented the natural borders between French and Russian influence in Europe. On that basis, the two emperors began peace negotiations at the town of Tilsit after meeting on an iconic raft on the River Niemen. The very first thing Alexander said to Napoleon was probably well-calibrated: "I hate the English as much as you do."[9]

Alexander faced pressure from his brother, Duke Constantine, to make peace with Napoleon. Given the victory he had just achieved, the French emperor offered the Russians relatively lenient terms–demanding that Russia join the Continental System, withdraw its forces from Wallachia and Moldavia, and hand over the Ionian Islands to France.[9] By contrast, Napoleon dictated very harsh peace terms for Prussia, despite the ceaseless exhortations of Queen Louise. Wiping out half of Prussian territories from the map, Napoleon created a new kingdom of 1,100 square miles called Westphalia. He then appointed his young brother Jérôme as the new monarch of this kingdom. Prussia's humiliating treatment at Tilsit caused a deep and bitter antagonism which festered as the Napoleonic era progressed. Moreover, Alexander's pretensions at friendship with Napoleon led the latter to seriously misjudge the true intentions of his Russian counterpart, who would violate numerous provisions of the treaty in the next few years. Despite these problems, the Treaties of Tilsit at last gave Napoleon a respite from war and allowed him to return to France, which he had not seen in over 300 days.[9]
Peninsular War and Erfurt
Main article: Peninsular War

The settlements at Tilsit gave Napoleon time to organize his empire. One of his major objectives became enforcing the Continental System against the British. He decided to focus his attention on the Kingdom of Portugal, which consistently violated his trade prohibitions. After defeat in the War of the Oranges in 1801, Portugal adopted a double-sided policy. At first, John VI agreed to close his ports to British trade. The situation changed dramatically after the Franco-Spanish defeat at Trafalgar; John grew bolder and officially resumed diplomatic and trade relations with Britain.
Joseph Bonaparte, Napoleon's brother, as King of Spain

Unhappy with this change of policy by the Portuguese government, Napoleon sent an army to invade Portugal. On 17 October 1807, 24,000 French troops under General Junot crossed the Pyrenees with Spanish cooperation and headed towards Portugal to enforce Napoleon's orders.[118] This attack was the first step in what would eventually become the Peninsular War, a six-year struggle that significantly sapped French strength. Throughout the winter of 1808, French agents became increasingly involved in Spanish internal affairs, attempting to incite discord between members of the Spanish royal family. On 16 February 1808, secret French machinations finally materialized when Napoleon announced that he would intervene to mediate between the rival political factions in the country.[119] Marshal Murat led 120,000 troops into Spain and the French arrived in Madrid on 24 March,[120] where wild riots against the occupation erupted just a few weeks later. Napoleon appointed his brother, Joseph Bonaparte, as the new King of Spain in the summer of 1808. The appointment enraged a heavily religious and conservative Spanish population. Resistance to French aggression soon spread throughout the country. The shocking French defeat at the Battle of Bailén in July gave hope to Napoleon's enemies and partly persuaded the French emperor to intervene in person.

Before going to Iberia, Napoleon decided to address several lingering issues with the Russians. At the Congress of Erfurt in October 1808, Napoleon hoped to keep Russia on his side during the upcoming struggle in Spain and during any potential conflict against Austria. The two sides reached an agreement, the Erfurt Convention, that called upon Britain to cease its war against France, that recognized the Russian conquest of Finland from Sweden, and that affirmed Russian support for France in a possible war against Austria "to the best of its ability."[121] Napoleon then returned to France and prepared for war. The Grande Armée, under the Emperor's personal command, rapidly crossed the Ebro River in November 1808 and inflicted a series of crushing defeats against the Spanish forces. After clearing the last Spanish force guarding the capital at Somosierra, Napoleon entered Madrid on 4 December with 80,000 troops.[122] He then unleashed his soldiers against Moore and the British forces. The British were swiftly driven to the coast, and they withdrew from Spain entirely after a last stand at the Battle of Corunna in January 1809.

Napoleon would end up leaving Iberia in order to deal with the Austrians in Central Europe, but the Peninsular War continued on long after his absence. He never returned to Spain after the 1808 campaign. Several months after Corunna, the British sent another army to the peninsula under the future Duke of Wellington. The war then settled into a complex and asymmetric strategic deadlock where all sides struggled to gain the upper hand. The highlight of the conflict became the brutal guerrilla warfare that engulfed much of the Spanish countryside. Both sides committed the worst atrocities of the Napoleonic Wars during this phase of the conflict. The vicious guerrilla fighting in Spain, largely absent from the French campaigns in Central Europe, severely disrupted the French lines of supply and communication. Although France maintained roughly 300,000 troops in Iberia during the Peninsular War, the vast majority were tied down to garrison duty and to intelligence operations.[123] The French were never able to concentrate all of their forces effectively, prolonging the war until events elsewhere in Europe finally turned the tide in favor of the Allies. After the invasion of Russia in 1812, the number of French troops in Spain vastly declined as Napoleon needed reinforcements to conserve his strategic position in Europe. By 1814, after scores of battles and sieges throughout Iberia, the Allies had managed to push the French out of the peninsula.
War of the Fifth Coalition and Marie Louise
Main article: War of the Fifth Coalition
Napoleon at the Battle of Wagram, painted by Horace Vernet.

After four years on the sidelines, Austria sought another war with France to avenge its recent defeats. Austria could not count on Russian support because the latter was at war with Britain, Sweden, and the Ottoman Empire in 1809. Frederick William of Prussia initially promised to help the Austrians, but reneged before conflict began.[124] A report from the Austrian finance minister suggested that the treasury would run out of money by the middle of 1809 if the large army that the Austrians had formed since the Third Coalition remained mobilized.[124] Although Archduke Charles warned that the Austrians were not ready for another showdown with Napoleon, a stance that landed him in the so-called "peace party," he did not want to see the army demobilized either.[124] On 8 February 1809, the advocates for war finally succeeded when the Imperial Government secretly decided on another confrontation against the French.

In the early morning of 10 April, leading elements of the Austrian army crossed the Inn River and invaded Bavaria. The early Austrian attack surprised the French; Napoleon himself was still in Paris when he heard about the invasion. He arrived at Donauwörth on the 17th to find the Grande Armée in a dangerous position, with its two wings separated by 75 miles (121 km) and joined together by a thin cordon of Bavarian troops. Charles pressed the left wing of the French army and hurled his men towards the III Corps of Marshal Davout. In response, Napoleon came up with a plan to cut off the Austrians in the celebrated Landshut Maneuver.[125] He realigned the axis of his army and marched his soldiers towards the town of Eckmühl. The French scored a convincing win in the resulting Battle of Eckmühl, forcing Charles to withdraw his forces over the Danube and into Bohemia. On 13 May, Vienna fell for the second time in four years, although the war continued since most of the Austrian army had survived the initial engagements in Southern Germany.

By 17 May, the main Austrian army under Charles had arrived on the Marchfeld. Charles kept the bulk of his troops several miles away from the river bank in hopes of concentrating them at the point where Napoleon decided to cross. On 21 May, the French made their first major effort to cross the Danube, precipitating the Battle of Aspern-Essling. The Austrians enjoyed a comfortable numerical superiority over the French throughout the battle; on the first day, Charles disposed of 110,000 soldiers against only 31,000 commanded by Napoleon.[126] By the second day, reinforcements had boosted French numbers up to 70,000.[127] The battle was characterized by a vicious back-and-forth struggle for the two villages of Aspern and Essling, the focal points of the French bridgehead. By the end of the fighting, the French had lost Aspern but still controlled Essling. A sustained Austrian artillery bombardment eventually convinced Napoleon to withdraw his forces back onto Lobau Island. Both sides inflicted about 23,000 casualties on each other.[128] It was the first defeat Napoleon suffered in a major set-piece battle, and it caused excitement throughout many parts of Europe because it proved that he could be beaten on the battlefield.[129]

After the setback at Aspern-Essling, Napoleon took more than six weeks in planning and preparing for contingencies before he made another attempt at crossing the Danube.[130] From 30 June to the early days of July, the French recrossed the Danube in strength, with more than 180,000 troops marching across the Marchfeld towards the Austrians.[130] Charles received the French with 150,000 of his own men.[131] In the ensuing Battle of Wagram, which also lasted two days, Napoleon commanded his forces in what was the largest battle of his career up until then. Neither side made much progress on 5 July, but the 6th produced a definitive outcome. Both sides launched major assaults on their flanks. Austrian attacks against the French left wing looked dangerous initially, but they were all beaten back. Meanwhile, a steady French attack against the Austrian left wing eventually compromised the entire position for Charles. Napoleon finished off the battle with a concentrated central thrust that punctured a hole in the Austrian army and forced Charles to retreat. Austrian losses were very heavy, reaching well over 40,000 casualties.[132] The French were too exhausted to pursue the Austrians immediately, but Napoleon eventually caught up with Charles at Znaim and the latter signed an armistice on 12 July.
Map of Europe. French Empire shown as bigger than present day France as it included parts of present-day Netherlands and Italy.
First French Empire at its greatest extent in 1811
  French Empire
  French satellite states
  Allied states

In the Kingdom of Holland, the British launched the Walcheren Campaign to open up a second front in the war and to relieve the pressure on the Austrians. The British army only landed at Walcheren on 30 July, by which point the Austrians had already been defeated. The Walcheren Campaign was characterized by little fighting but heavy casualties thanks to the popularly dubbed "Walcheren Fever." Over 4,000 British troops were lost in a bungled campaign, and the rest withdrew in December 1809.[133] The main strategic result from the campaign became the delayed political settlement between the French and the Austrians. Emperor Francis wanted to wait and see how the British performed in their theater before entering into negotiations with Napoleon. Once it became apparent that the British were going nowhere, the Austrians agreed to peace talks.

The resulting Treaty of Schönbrunn in October 1809 was the harshest that France had imposed on Austria in recent memory. Metternich and Archduke Charles had the preservation of the Habsburg Empire as their fundamental goal, and to this end they succeeded by making Napoleon seek more modest goals in return for promises of friendship between the two powers.[134] Nevertheless, while most of the hereditary lands remained a part of the Habsburg realm, France received Carinthia, Carniola, and the Adriatic ports, while Galicia was given to the Poles and the Salzburg area of the Tyrol went to the Bavarians.[134] Austria lost over three million subjects, about one-fifth of her total population, as a result of these territorial changes.[135] Although fighting in Iberia continued, the War of the Fifth Coalition would be the last major conflict on the European continent for the next three years.

Napoleon turned his focus to domestic affairs after the war. Empress Joséphine had still not given birth to a child from Napoleon, who became worried about the future of his empire following his death. Desperate for a legitimate heir, Napoleon divorced Joséphine in January 1810 and started looking for a new wife. Hoping to cement the recent alliance with Austria through a family connection, Napoleon married the Archduchess Marie Louise, who was 18 years old at the time. On 20 March 1811, Marie Louise gave birth to a baby boy, whom Napoleon made heir apparent and bestowed the title of King of Rome. His son never actually ruled the empire, but historians still refer to him as Napoleon II.
Invasion of Russia
Main article: French invasion of Russia
The Moscow fire depicted by an unknown German artist

The Congress of Erfurt sought to preserve the Russo-French alliance, and the leaders had a friendly personal relationship after their first meeting at Tilsit in 1807.[136] By 1811, however, tensions had increased and Alexander was under pressure from the Russian nobility to break off the alliance. An early sign the relationship had deteriorated was the Russian's virtual abandonment of the Continental System, which led Napoleon to threaten Alexander with serious consequences if he formed an alliance with Britain.[137]

By 1812, advisers to Alexander suggested the possibility of an invasion of the French Empire and the recapture of Poland. On receipt of intelligence reports on Russia's war preparations, Napoleon expanded his Grande Armée to more than 450,000 men.[138] He ignored repeated advice against an invasion of the Russian heartland and prepared for an offensive campaign; on 23 June 1812 the invasion commenced.[139]
Napoleon's withdrawal from Russia, a painting by Adolph Northen

In an attempt to gain increased support from Polish nationalists and patriots, Napoleon termed the war the Second Polish War—the First Polish War had been the Bar Confederation uprising by Polish nobles against Russia in 1768. Polish patriots wanted the Russian part of Poland to be joined with the Duchy of Warsaw and an independent Poland created. This was rejected by Napoleon, who stated he had promised his ally Austria this would not happen. Napoleon refused to manumit the Russian serfs because of concerns this might provoke a reaction in his army's rear. The serfs later committed atrocities against French soldiers during France's retreat.[140]

The Russians avoided Napoleon's objective of a decisive engagement and instead retreated deeper into Russia. A brief attempt at resistance was made at Smolensk in August; the Russians were defeated in a series of battles, and Napoleon resumed his advance. The Russians again avoided battle, although in a few cases this was only achieved because Napoleon uncharacteristically hesitated to attack when the opportunity arose. Owing to the Russian army's scorched earth tactics, the French found it increasingly difficult to forage food for themselves and their horses.[141]

The Russians eventually offered battle outside Moscow on 7 September: the Battle of Borodino resulted in approximately 44,000 Russian and 35,000 French dead, wounded or captured, and may have been the bloodiest day of battle in history up to that point in time.[142] Although the French had won, the Russian army had accepted, and withstood, the major battle Napoleon had hoped would be decisive. Napoleon's own account was: "The most terrible of all my battles was the one before Moscow. The French showed themselves to be worthy of victory, but the Russians showed themselves worthy of being invincible."[143]

The Russian army withdrew and retreated past Moscow. Napoleon entered the city, assuming its fall would end the war and Alexander would negotiate peace. However, on orders of the city's governor Feodor Rostopchin, rather than capitulation, Moscow was burned. After five weeks, Napoleon and his army left. Early November Napoleon got concerned about loss of control back in France after the Malet coup of 1812. His army walked through snow up to their knees and nearly 10,000 men and horses froze to death on the night of 8/9 November alone. After Battle of Berezina Napoleon succeeded to escape but had to abandon much of the remaining artillery and baggage train. On 5 December, shortly before arriving in Vilnius, Napoleon left the army in a sledge.[144]

The French suffered greatly in the course of a ruinous retreat, including from the harshness of the Russian Winter. The Armée had begun as over 400,000 frontline troops, but in the end fewer than 40,000 crossed the Berezina River in November 1812.[145] The Russians had lost 150,000 in battle and hundreds of thousands of civilians.[146]
War of the Sixth Coalition
Main article: War of the Sixth Coalition
Napoleon's farewell to his Imperial Guard, 20 April 1814

There was a lull in fighting over the winter of 1812–13 while both the Russians and the French rebuilt their forces; Napoleon was then able to field 350,000 troops.[147] Heartened by France's loss in Russia, Prussia joined with Austria, Sweden, Russia, Great Britain, Spain, and Portugal in a new coalition. Napoleon assumed command in Germany and inflicted a series of defeats on the Coalition culminating in the Battle of Dresden in August 1813.[148]

Despite these successes, the numbers continued to mount against Napoleon, and the French army was pinned down by a force twice its size and lost at the Battle of Leipzig. This was by far the largest battle of the Napoleonic Wars and cost more than 90,000 casualties in total.[149]

The Allies offered peace terms in the Frankfurt proposals in November 1813. Napoleon would remain as Emperor of France, but it would be reduced to its "natural frontiers." That meant that France could retain control of Belgium, Savoy and the Rhineland (the west bank of the Rhine River), while giving up control of all the rest, including all of Spain and the Netherlands, and most of Italy and Germany. Metternich told Napoleon these were the best terms the Allies were likely to offer; after further victories, the terms would be harsher and harsher. Metternich's motivation was to maintain France as a balance against Russian threats, while ending the highly destabilizing series of wars.[150]

Napoleon, expecting to win the war, delayed too long and lost this opportunity; by December the Allies had withdrawn the offer. When his back was to the wall in 1814 he tried to reopen peace negotiations on the basis of accepting the Frankfurt proposals. The Allies now had new, harsher terms that included the retreat of France to its 1791 boundaries, which meant the loss of Belgium. Napoleon would remain Emperor, however he rejected the term. The British wanted Napoleon permanently removed; they prevailed. Napoleon adamantly refused.[150][151]

Napoleon withdrew back into France, his army reduced to 70,000 soldiers, and little cavalry; he faced more than three times as many Allied troops.[152] The French were surrounded: British armies pressed from the south, and other Coalition forces positioned to attack from the German states. Napoleon won a series of victories in the Six Days' Campaign, though these were not significant enough to turn the tide. The leaders of Paris surrendered to the Coalition in March 1814.[153]

On 1 April, Alexander addressed the Sénat conservateur. Long docile to Napoleon, under Talleyrand's prodding it had turned against him. Alexander told the Sénat that the Allies were fighting against Napoleon, not France, and they were prepared to offer honorable peace terms if Napoleon were removed from power. The next day, the Sénat passed the Acte de déchéance de l'Empereur ("Emperor's Demise Act"), which declared Napoleon deposed. Napoleon had advanced as far as Fontainebleau when he learned that Paris was lost. When Napoleon proposed the army march on the capital, his senior officers and marshals mutinied.[154] On 4 April, led by Ney, they confronted Napoleon. Napoleon asserted the army would follow him, and Ney replied the army would follow its generals. While the ordinary soldiers and regimental officers wanted to fight on, without any senior officers or marshals any prospective invasion of Paris would have been impossible. Bowing to the inevitable, on 4 April Napoleon abdicated in favour of his son, with Marie-Louise as regent. However, the Allies refused to accept this under prodding from Alexander, who feared that Napoleon might find an excuse to retake the throne.[155] Napoleon was then forced to announce his unconditional abdication only two days later.
Exile to Elba
Cartoon of Napoleon sitting back to front on a donkey with a broken sword and two soldiers in the background drumming
British etching from 1814 in celebration of Napoleon's first exile to Elba at the close of the War of the Sixth Coalition

    The Allied Powers having declared that Emperor Napoleon was the sole obstacle to the restoration of peace in Europe, Emperor Napoleon, faithful to his oath, declares that he renounces, for himself and his heirs, the thrones of France and Italy, and that there is no personal sacrifice, even that of his life, which he is not ready to do in the interests of France.
    Done in the palace of Fontainebleau, 11 April 1814.
    — Act of abdication of Napoleon[156]

In the Treaty of Fontainebleau, the victors exiled him to Elba, an island of 12,000 inhabitants in the Mediterranean, 20 km (12 mi) off the Tuscan coast. They gave him sovereignty over the island and allowed him to retain his title of emperor. Napoleon attempted suicide with a pill he had carried since a near-capture by Russians on the retreat from Moscow. Its potency had weakened with age, and he survived to be exiled while his wife and son took refuge in Austria.[157] In the first few months on Elba he created a small navy and army, developed the iron mines, and issued decrees on modern agricultural methods.[158]
Hundred Days
Main article: Hundred Days
Napoleon returned from Elba, by Karl Stenben, 19th century

Separated from his wife and son, who had returned to Austria, cut off from the allowance guaranteed to him by the Treaty of Fontainebleau, and aware of rumours he was about to be banished to a remote island in the Atlantic Ocean,[159] Napoleon escaped from Elba in the brig Inconstant on 26 February 1815.[159][160][161] He landed at Golfe-Juan on the French mainland, two days later.[159]

The 5th Regiment was sent to intercept him and made contact just south of Grenoble on 7 March 1815. Napoleon approached the regiment alone, dismounted his horse and, when he was within gunshot range, shouted, "Here I am. Kill your Emperor, if you wish."[162]

The soldiers responded with, "Vive L'Empereur!" and marched with Napoleon to Paris; Louis XVIII fled. On 13 March, the powers at the Congress of Vienna declared Napoleon an outlaw, and four days later Great Britain, Russia, Austria, and Prussia bound themselves to each put 150,000 men into the field to end his rule.[163]

Napoleon arrived in Paris on 20 March and governed for a period now called the Hundred Days. By the start of June the armed forces available to him had reached 200,000, and he decided to go on the offensive to attempt to drive a wedge between the oncoming British and Prussian armies. The French Army of the North crossed the frontier into the United Kingdom of the Netherlands, in modern-day Belgium.[164]

Napoleon's forces fought the Coalition armies, commanded by the Duke of Wellington and Gebhard Leberecht von Blücher, at the Battle of Waterloo on 18 June 1815. Wellington's army withstood repeated attacks by the French and drove them from the field while the Prussians arrived in force and broke through Napoleon's right flank.

Napoleon returned to Paris and found that both the legislature and the people had turned against him. Realizing his position was untenable, he abdicated on 22 June in favour of his son. He left Paris three days later and settled at Josephine's former palace in Malmaison (on the western bank of the Seine about 17 kilometres (11 mi) west of Paris). Even as Napoleon travelled to Paris, the Coalition forces crossed the frontier swept through France (arriving in the vicinity of Paris on 29 June), with the stated intent on restoring Louis XVIII to the French throne.

When Napoleon heard that Prussian troops had orders to capture him dead or alive, he fled to Rochefort, considering an escape to the United States. However, British ships were blocking every port. Finally, Napoleon demanded asylum from the British Captain Frederick Maitland on HMS Bellerophon on 15 July 1815.[165]
Exile on Saint Helena
Napoleon on Saint Helena

Britain kept Napoleon on the island of Saint Helena in the Atlantic Ocean, 1,870 km (1,162 mi) from the west coast of Africa. Napoleon was moved to Longwood House there in December 1815; it had fallen into disrepair, and the location was damp, windswept and unhealthy. The Times published articles insinuating the British government was trying to hasten his death, and he often complained of the living conditions in letters to the governor and his custodian, Hudson Lowe.[166]

With a small cadre of followers, Napoleon dictated his memoirs and grumbled about conditions. Lowe cut Napoleon's expenditure, ruled that no gifts were allowed if they mentioned his imperial status, made his supporters sign a guarantee they would stay with the prisoner indefinitely.[167]
Photo of a front garden and large brown building. French flag on a flagpole next to a small cannon.
Longwood House, Saint Helena: site of Napoleon's captivity

There were rumors of plots and even of his escape, but in reality no serious attempts were made.[168] For English poet Lord Byron, Napoleon was the epitome of the Romantic hero, the persecuted, lonely, and flawed genius.[169]
Death
Further information: Napoleon's Death Mask and Retour des cendres

His personal physician, Barry O'Meara, warned London that his declining state of health was mainly caused by the harsh treatment. Napoleon confined himself for months on end in his damp and wretched habitation of Longwood.[170]

In February 1821, Napoleon's health began to deteriorate rapidly. He reconciled with the Catholic Church. He died on 5 May 1821, after confession, Extreme Unction and Viaticum in the presence of Father Ange Vignali. His last words were, "France, l'armée, tête d'armée, Joséphine" ("France, army, head of the army, Joséphine").[171][172]

Napoleon's original death mask was created around 6 May, although it is not clear which doctor created it.[173][note 7] In his will, he had asked to be buried on the banks of the Seine, but the British governor said he should be buried on Saint Helena, in the Valley of the Willows.[175]
Napoleon's tomb at Les Invalides

In 1840, Louis Philippe I obtained permission from the British to return Napoleon's remains to France. On 15 December 1840, a state funeral was held. The hearse proceeded from the Arc de Triomphe down the Champs-Élysées, across the Place de la Concorde to the Esplanade des Invalides and then to the cupola in St Jérôme's Chapel, where it remained until the tomb designed by Louis Visconti was completed. In 1861, Napoleon's remains were entombed in a porphyry sarcophagus in the crypt under the dome at Les Invalides.[176]
Cause of death

The cause of his death has been debated. Napoleon's physician, François Carlo Antommarchi, led the autopsy, which found the cause of death to be stomach cancer. Antommarchi did not, however, sign the official report.[177] Napoleon's father had died of stomach cancer, although this was seemingly unknown at the time of the autopsy.[178] Antommarchi found evidence of a stomach ulcer; this was the most convenient explanation for the British, who wanted to avoid criticism over their care of Napoleon.[175]
Gold-framed portrait painting of a gaunt middle-aged man with receding hair and laurel wreath, lying eyes-closed on white pillow with a white blanket covering to his neck and a gold Jesus cross resting on his chest
Napoleon on his death bed, by Horace Vernet, 1826

In 1955, the diaries of Napoleon's valet, Louis Marchand, were published. His description of Napoleon in the months before his death led Sten Forshufvud in a 1961 paper in Nature to put forward other causes for his death, including deliberate arsenic poisoning.[179] Arsenic was used as a poison during the era because it was undetectable when administered over a long period. Forshufvud, in a 1978 book with Ben Weider, noted that Napoleon's body was found to be remarkably well preserved when moved in 1840. Arsenic is a strong preservative, and therefore this supported the poisoning hypothesis. Forshufvud and Weider observed that Napoleon had attempted to quench abnormal thirst by drinking large amounts of orgeat syrup that contained cyanide compounds in the almonds used for flavouring.[179]

They maintained that the potassium tartrate used in his treatment prevented his stomach from expelling these compounds and that his thirst was a symptom of the poison. Their hypothesis was that the calomel given to Napoleon became an overdose, which killed him and left extensive tissue damage behind.[179] According to a 2007 article, the type of arsenic found in Napoleon's hair shafts was mineral, the most toxic, and according to toxicologist Patrick Kintz, this supported the conclusion that he was murdered.[180]

There have been modern studies that have supported the original autopsy finding.[180] In a 2008 study, researchers analysed samples of Napoleon's hair from throughout his life, as well as samples from his family and other contemporaries. All samples had high levels of arsenic, approximately 100 times higher than the current average. According to these researchers, Napoleon's body was already heavily contaminated with arsenic as a boy, and the high arsenic concentration in his hair was not caused by intentional poisoning; people were constantly exposed to arsenic from glues and dyes throughout their lives.[note 8] Studies published in 2007 and 2008 dismissed evidence of arsenic poisoning, and confirmed evidence of peptic ulcer and gastric cancer as the cause of death.[182]
Religions
Further information: Napoleon and the Catholic Church
Reorganisation of the religious geography: France is divided into 59 dioceses and 10 ecclesiastical provinces.

Napoleon's baptism took place in Ajaccio on 21 July 1771; he was piously raised as a Catholic but he never developed much faith.[183] As an adult, Napoleon was a deist, and showed more interest in Muhammad than in Jesus.[184] Napoleon's deity was an absent and distant God. However he had a keen appreciation of the power of organized religion in social and political affairs, and paid a great deal of attention to bending it to his purposes. He noted the influence of Catholicism's rituals and splendors.[183]

Napoleon had a civil marriage with Joséphine de Beauharnais, without religious ceremony. During the campaign in Egypt, Napoleon showed much tolerance towards religion for a revolutionary general, holding discussions with Muslim scholars and ordering religious celebrations, but General Dupuy, who accompanied Napoleon, revealed, shortly after Pope Pius VI's death, the political reasons for such behaviour: "We are fooling Egyptians with our pretended interest for their religion; neither Bonaparte nor we believe in this religion more than we did in Pius the Defunct's one".[note 9] In his memoirs, Bonaparte's secretary Bourienne wrote about Napoleon's religious interests in the same vein.[186] His religious opportunism is epitomized in his famous quote: "It is by making myself Catholic that I brought peace to Brittany and Vendée. It is by making myself Italian that I won minds in Italy. It is by making myself a Moslem that I established myself in Egypt. If I governed a nation of Jews, I should reestablish the Temple of Solomon."[187] However, according to Juan Cole, "Bonaparte's admiration for the Prophet Muhammad, in contrast, was genuine"[188] and during his captivity on St Helena he defended him against Voltaire's critical play Mahomet.

Napoleon was crowned Emperor Napoleon I on 2 December 1804 at Notre Dame de Paris by Pope Pius VII. On 1 April 1810, Napoleon religiously married the Austrian princess Marie Louise. During his brother's rule in Spain, he abolished the Spanish Inquisition in 1813. In a private discussion with general Gourgaud during his exile on Saint Helena, Napoleon expressed materialistic views on the origin of man,[note 10]and doubted the divinity of Jesus, stating that it is absurd to believe that Socrates, Plato, Muslims, and the Anglicans should be damned for not being Roman Catholics.[note 11] He also said to Gourgaud in 1817 "I like the Mohammedan religion best. It has fewer incredible things in it than ours."[191] and that "the Mohammedan religion is the finest of all".[192] However, Napoleon was anointed by a priest before his death.[193]
Concordat
Further information: Concordat of 1801
Leaders of the Catholic Church taking the civil oath required by the Concordat

Seeking national reconciliation between revolutionaries and Catholics, the Concordat of 1801 was signed on 15 July 1801 between Napoleon and Pope Pius VII. It solidified the Roman Catholic Church as the majority church of France and brought back most of its civil status. The hostility of devout Catholics against the state had now largely been resolved. It did not restore the vast church lands and endowments that had been seized during the revolution and sold off. As a part of the Concordat, he presented another set of laws called the Organic Articles.[194][195]

While the Concordat restored much power to the papacy, the balance of church-state relations had tilted firmly in Napoleon's favour. He selected the bishops and supervised church finances. Napoleon and the pope both found the Concordat useful. Similar arrangements were made with the Church in territories controlled by Napoleon, especially Italy and Germany.[196] Now, Napoleon could win favor with the Catholics while also controlling Rome in a political sense. Napoleon said in April 1801, "Skillful conquerors have not got entangled with priests. They can both contain them and use them." French children were issued a catechism that taught them to love and respect Napoleon.[197]
Religious emancipation
Further information: Napoleon and the Jews

Napoleon emancipated Jews, as well as Protestants in Catholic countries and Catholics in Protestant countries, from laws which restricted them to ghettos, and he expanded their rights to property, worship, and careers. Despite the anti-semitic reaction to Napoleon's policies from foreign governments and within France, he believed emancipation would benefit France by attracting Jews to the country given the restrictions they faced elsewhere.[198]

He stated, "I will never accept any proposals that will obligate the Jewish people to leave France, because to me the Jews are the same as any other citizen in our country. It takes weakness to chase them out of the country, but it takes strength to assimilate them."[199] He was seen as so favourable to the Jews that the Russian Orthodox Church formally condemned him as "Antichrist and the Enemy of God".[200]
Personality
Napoleon visiting the Palais Royal for the opening of the 8th session of the Tribunat in 1807, by Merry-Joseph Blondel

Historians agree that Napoleon's remarkable personality was one key to his influence. They emphasize the strength of his ambition that took him from an obscure village to command of most of Europe.[201] George F. E. Rudé stresses his "rare combination of will, intellect and physical vigour."[202] At 5 ft 6 in (168 cm),[203] he was not physically imposing but in one-on-one situations he typically had a hypnotic impact on people and seemingly bent the strongest leaders to his will.[204] He understood military technology, but was not an innovator in that regard.[205] He was an innovator in using the financial, bureaucratic, and diplomatic resources of France. He could rapidly dictate a series of complex commands to his subordinates, keeping in mind where major units were expected to be at each future point, and like a chess master, "seeing" the best plays moves ahead.[206]

Napoleon maintained strict, efficient work habits, prioritizing what needed to be done. He cheated at cards, but repaid the losses; he had to win at everything he attempted.[207] He kept relays of staff and secretaries at work. Unlike many generals, Napoleon did not examine history to ask what Hannibal or Alexander or anyone else did in a similar situation. Critics said he won many battles simply because of luck; Napoleon responded, "Give me lucky generals," aware that "luck" comes to leaders who recognize opportunity, and seize it.[208] Dwyer argues that Napoleon's victories at Austerlitz and Jena in 1805-06 heightened his sense of self-grandiosity, leaving him even more certain of his destiny and invincibility.[209] By the Russian campaign in 1812, however, Napoleon seems to have lost his verve. With crisis after crisis at hand, he rarely rose to the occasion. Some historians have suggested a physical deterioration, but others note that an impaired Napoleon was still a brilliant general.[206]

In terms of impact on events, it was more than Napoleon's personality that took effect. He reorganized France itself to supply the men and money needed for great wars.[210] Above all he inspired his men—Wellington said his presence on the battlefield was worth 40,000 soldiers, for he inspired confidence from privates to field marshals.[211] He also unnerved the enemy. At the Battle of Auerstadt in 1806, King Frederick William III of Prussia outnumbered the French by 63,000 to 27,000; however, when he mistakenly was told that Napoleon was in command, he ordered a hasty retreat that turned into a rout.[212] The force of his personality neutralized material difficulties as his soldiers fought with the confidence that with Napoleon in charge they would surely win.[213]
Image
Further information: Cultural depictions of Napoleon
Napoleon is often represented in his green colonel uniform of the Chasseur à Cheval of the Imperial Guard, the regiment that often served as his personal escort, with a large bicorne and a hand-in-waistcoat gesture.

Napoleon has become a worldwide cultural icon who symbolises military genius and political power. Martin van Creveld described him as "the most competent human being who ever lived".[214] Since his death, many towns, streets, ships, and even cartoon characters have been named after him. He has been portrayed in hundreds of films and discussed in hundreds of thousands of books and articles.[215]

During the Napoleonic Wars he was taken seriously by the British press as a dangerous tyrant, poised to invade. He was often referred to by the British as Boney. A nursery rhyme warned children that Bonaparte ravenously ate naughty people; the "bogeyman".[216] The British Tory press sometimes depicted Napoleon as much smaller than average height, and this image persists. Confusion about his height also results from the difference between the French pouce and British inch—2.71 cm and 2.54 cm, respectively; he was 1.68 metres (5 ft 6 in) tall, average height for the period.[note 12]

In 1908 Alfred Adler, a psychologist, cited Napoleon to describe an inferiority complex in which short people adopt an over-aggressive behaviour to compensate for lack of height; this inspired the term Napoleon complex.[218] The stock character of Napoleon is a comically short "petty tyrant" and this has become a cliché in popular culture. He is often portrayed wearing a large bicorne hat with a hand-in-waistcoat gesture—a reference to the painting produced in 1812 by Jacques-Louis David.[219]

When he became First Consul and later Emperor, Napoleon eschewed his general's uniform and habitually wore the simple green colonel uniform (non-Hussar) of a colonel of the Chasseur à Cheval of the Imperial Guard, the regiment that often served as his personal escort, with a large bicorne. He also habitually wore (usually on Sundays) the blue uniform of a colonel of the Imperial Guard Foot Grenadiers (blue with white facings and red cuffs). He also wore his Légion d'honneur star, medal and ribbon, and the Order of the Iron Crown decorations, white French-style culottes and white stockings. This was in contrast the gorgeous and complex uniforms with many decorations of his marshals and those around him.
Reforms
First remittance of the Légion d'Honneur, 15 July 1804, at Saint-Louis des Invalides, by Jean-Baptiste Debret (1812).

Napoleon instituted lasting reforms, including higher education, a tax code, road and sewer systems, and established the Banque de France, the first central bank in French history. He negotiated the Concordat of 1801 with the Catholic Church, which sought to reconcile the mostly Catholic population to his regime. It was presented alongside the Organic Articles, which regulated public worship in France. His dissolution of the Holy Roman Empire paved the way to German Unification later in the 19th century. The sale of the Louisiana Territory to the United States doubled the size of the country and was a major event in American history.[220]

In May 1802, he instituted the Legion of Honour, a substitute for the old royalist decorations and orders of chivalry, to encourage civilian and military achievements; the order is still the highest decoration in France.[221]
Napoleonic Code
Main article: Napoleonic Code
Page of French writing
First page of the 1804 original edition of the Code Civil

Napoleon's set of civil laws, the Code Civil—now often known as the Napoleonic Code—was prepared by committees of legal experts under the supervision of Jean Jacques Régis de Cambacérès, the Second Consul. Napoleon participated actively in the sessions of the Council of State that revised the drafts. The development of the code was a fundamental change in the nature of the civil law legal system with its stress on clearly written and accessible law. Other codes ("Les cinq codes") were commissioned by Napoleon to codify criminal and commerce law; a Code of Criminal Instruction was published, which enacted rules of due process.[222]

The Napoleonic code was adopted throughout much of Europe, though only in the lands he conquered, and remained in force after Napoleon's defeat. Napoleon said: "My true glory is not to have won forty battles...Waterloo will erase the memory of so many victories. ... But...what will live forever, is my Civil Code."[223] The Code still has importance today in a quarter of the world's jurisdictions including in Europe, the Americas and Africa.[224]

Dieter Langewiesche described the code as a "revolutionary project" which spurred the development of bourgeois society in Germany by the extension of the right to own property and an acceleration towards the end of feudalism. Napoleon reorganised what had been the Holy Roman Empire, made up of more than a thousand entities, into a more streamlined forty-state Confederation of the Rhine; this provided the basis for the German Confederation and the unification of Germany in 1871.[225]

The movement toward national unification in Italy was similarly precipitated by Napoleonic rule.[226] These changes contributed to the development of nationalism and the nation state.[227]

Napoleon implemented a wide array of liberal reforms in France and across Europe, especially in Italy and Germany, as summarized by British historian Andrew Roberts:

    The ideas that underpin our modern world–meritocracy, equality before the law, property rights, religious toleration, modern secular education, sound finances, and so on–were championed, consolidated, codified and geographically extended by Napoleon. To them he added a rational and efficient local administration, an end to rural banditry, the encouragement of science and the arts, the abolition of feudalism and the greatest codification of laws since the fall of the Roman Empire.[228]

Napoleon directly overthrew feudal remains in much of western Europe. He liberalised property laws, ended seigneurial dues, abolished the guild of merchants and craftsmen to facilitate entrepreneurship, legalised divorce, closed the Jewish ghettos and made Jews equal to everyone else. The Inquisition ended as did the Holy Roman Empire. The power of church courts and religious authority was sharply reduced and equality under the law was proclaimed for all men.[229]
Warfare
Further information: Napoleonic weaponry and warfare and Military career of Napoleon Bonaparte
Photo of a grey and phosphorous-coloured equestrian statue. Napoleon is seated on the horse, which is rearing up, he looks forward with his right hand raised and pointing forward; his left hand holds the reins.
Statue in Cherbourg-Octeville unveiled by Napoleon III in 1858. Napoleon I strengthened the town's defences to prevent British naval incursions.

In the field of military organisation, Napoleon borrowed from previous theorists such as Jacques Antoine Hippolyte, Comte de Guibert, and from the reforms of preceding French governments, and then developed much of what was already in place. He continued the policy, which emerged from the Revolution, of promotion based primarily on merit.[230]

Corps replaced divisions as the largest army units, mobile artillery was integrated into reserve batteries, the staff system became more fluid and cavalry returned as an important formation in French military doctrine. These methods are now referred to as essential features of Napoleonic warfare.[230] Though he consolidated the practice of modern conscription introduced by the Directory, one of the restored monarchy's first acts was to end it.[231]

His opponents learned from Napoleon's innovations. The increased importance of artillery after 1807 stemmed from his creation of a highly mobile artillery force, the growth in artillery numbers, and changes in artillery practices. As a result of these factors, Napoleon, rather than relying on infantry to wear away the enemy's defenses, now could use massed artillery as a spearhead to pound a break in the enemy's line that was then exploited by supporting infantry and cavalry. McConachy rejects the alternative theory that growing reliance on artillery by the French army beginning in 1807 was an outgrowth of the declining quality of the French infantry and, later, France's inferiority in cavalry numbers.[232] Weapons and other kinds of military technology remained largely static through the Revolutionary and Napoleonic eras, but 18th-century operational mobility underwent significant change.[233]

Napoleon's biggest influence was in the conduct of warfare. Antoine-Henri Jomini explained Napoleon's methods in a widely used textbook that influenced all European and American armies.[234] Napoleon was regarded by the influential military theorist Carl von Clausewitz as a genius in the operational art of war, and historians rank him as a great military commander.[235] Wellington, when asked who was the greatest general of the day, answered: "In this age, in past ages, in any age, Napoleon."[236]

Under Napoleon, a new emphasis towards the destruction, not just outmanoeuvring, of enemy armies emerged. Invasions of enemy territory occurred over broader fronts which made wars costlier and more decisive. The political impact of war increased significantly; defeat for a European power meant more than the loss of isolated enclaves. Near-Carthaginian peaces intertwined whole national efforts, intensifying the Revolutionary phenomenon of total war.[237]
Metric system
Depicted as First Consul on the 1803 20 gold Napoléon gold coin.
Depicted as First Consul on the 1803 20 gold Napoléon gold coin.
Main articles: History of the metric system, Mesures usuelles and Units of measurement in France

The official introduction of the metric system in September 1799 was unpopular in large sections of French society. Napoleon's rule greatly aided adoption of the new standard not only across France but also across the French sphere of influence. Napoleon ultimately took a retrograde step in 1812 when he passed legislation to introduce the mesures usuelles (traditional units of measurement) for retail trade[238]—a system of measure that resembled the pre-revolutionary units but were based on the kilogram and the metre; for example the livre metrique (metric pound) was 500 g[239] instead of 489.5 g—the value of the livre du roi (the king's pound).[240] Other units of measure were rounded in a similar manner. This however laid the foundations for the definitive introduction of the metric system across Europe in the middle of the 19th century.[241]
Education

Napoleon's educational reforms laid the foundation of a modern system of education in France and throughout much of Europe.[242] Napoleon synthesized the best academic elements from the Ancien Régime, The Enlightenment, and the Revolution, with the aim of establishing a stable, well-educated and prosperous society. He made French the only official language. He left some primary education in the hands of religious orders, but he offered public support to secondary education. Napoleon founded a number of state secondary schools (lycées) designed to produce a standardized education that was uniform across France. All students were taught the sciences along with modern and classical languages. Unlike the system during the Ancien Régime, religious topics did not dominate the curriculum, although they were present in addition to teachers from the clergy. Napoleon simply hoped to use religion to produce social stability.[243] He gave special attention to the advanced centers, notably the Ecole Polytechnique, that provided both military expertise and state-of-the-art research in science.[244] Napoleon made some of the first major efforts at establishing a system of secular and public education. The system featured scholarships and strict discipline, with the result being a French educational system that outperformed its European counterparts, many of which borrowed from the French system.[245]
Memory and evaluation
Criticism
The Third of May 1808 by Francisco Goya, showing Spanish resisters being executed by Napoleon's troops.

In the political realm, historians debate whether Napoleon was "an enlightened despot who laid the foundations of modern Europe or, instead, a megalomaniac who wrought greater misery than any man before the coming of Hitler."[246] Many historians have concluded that he had grandiose foreign policy ambitions. The Continental powers as late as 1808 were willing to give him nearly all of his remarkable gains and titles, but some scholars maintain he was overly aggressive and pushed for too much, until his empire collapsed.[247][248]

Napoleon ended lawlessness and disorder in post-Revolutionary France.[249] He was, however, considered a tyrant and usurper by his opponents.[250] His critics charge that he was not significantly troubled when faced with the prospect of war and death for thousands, turned his search for undisputed rule into a series of conflicts throughout Europe and ignored treaties and conventions alike. His role in the Haitian Revolution and decision to reinstate slavery in France's oversea colonies are controversial and have an impact on his reputation.[251]

Napoleon institutionalised plunder of conquered territories: French museums contain art stolen by Napoleon's forces from across Europe. Artefacts were brought to the Musée du Louvre for a grand central museum; his example would later serve as inspiration for more notorious imitators.[252] He was compared to Adolf Hitler most famously by the historian Pieter Geyl in 1947[253] and Claude Ribbe in 2005.[254] David G. Chandler, a foremost historian of Napoleonic warfare, wrote in 1973 that, "Nothing could be more degrading to the former [Napoleon] and more flattering to the latter [Hitler]."[255]

Critics argue Napoleon's true legacy must reflect the loss of status for France and needless deaths brought by his rule: historian Victor Davis Hanson writes, "After all, the military record is unquestioned—17 years of wars, perhaps six million Europeans dead, France bankrupt, her overseas colonies lost."[256] McLynn notes that, "He can be viewed as the man who set back European economic life for a generation by the dislocating impact of his wars."[250] However, Vincent Cronin replies that such criticism relies on the flawed premise that Napoleon was responsible for the wars which bear his name, when in fact France was the victim of a series of coalitions which aimed to destroy the ideals of the Revolution.[257]
Propaganda and memory
Main article: Napoleonic propaganda
Napoleon Crossing the Alps, romantic version by Jacques-Louis David in 1805
Bonaparte Crossing the Alps, realist version by Paul Delaroche in 1848

Napoleon's use of propaganda contributed to his rise to power, legitimated his régime, and established his image for posterity. Strict censorship, controlling aspects of the press, books, theater, and art, was part of his propaganda scheme, aimed at portraying him as bringing desperately wanted peace and stability to France. The propagandistic rhetoric changed in relation to events and to the atmosphere of Napoleon's reign, focusing first on his role as a general in the army and identification as a soldier, and moving to his role as emperor and a civil leader. Specifically targeting his civilian audience, Napoleon fostered an important, though uneasy, relationship with the contemporary art community, taking an active role in commissioning and controlling different forms of art production to suit his propaganda goals.[258]

Hazareesingh (2004) explores how Napoleon's image and memory are best understood. They played a key role in collective political defiance of the Bourbon restoration monarchy in 1815–1830. People from different walks of life and areas of France, particularly Napoleonic veterans, drew on the Napoleonic legacy and its connections with the ideals of the 1789 revolution.[259]

Widespread rumors of Napoleon's return from St. Helena and Napoleon as an inspiration for patriotism, individual and collective liberties, and political mobilization manifested themselves in seditious materials, displaying the tricolor and rosettes. There were also subversive activities celebrating anniversaries of Napoleon's life and reign and disrupting royal celebrations — they demonstrated the prevailing and successful goal of the varied supporters of Napoleon to constantly destabilize the Bourbon regime.[259]

Datta (2005) shows that, following the collapse of militaristic Boulangism in the late 1880s, the Napoleonic legend was divorced from party politics and revived in popular culture. Concentrating on two plays and two novels from the period—Victorien Sardou's Madame Sans-Gêne (1893), Maurice Barrès's Les Déracinés (1897), Edmond Rostand's L'Aiglon (1900), and André de Lorde and Gyp's Napoléonette (1913) Datta examines how writers and critics of the Belle Époque exploited the Napoleonic legend for diverse political and cultural ends.[260]

Reduced to a minor character, the new fictional Napoleon became not a world historical figure but an intimate one – fashioned by individuals' needs and consumed as popular entertainment. In their attempts to represent the emperor as a figure of national unity, proponents and detractors of the Third Republic used the legend as a vehicle for exploring anxieties about gender and fears about the processes of democratization that accompanied this new era of mass politics and culture.[260]

International Napoleonic Congresses take place regularly, with participation by members of the French and American military, French politicians and scholars from different countries.[261] In January 2012, the mayor of Montereau-Fault-Yonne, near Paris—the site of a late victory of Napoleon—proposed development of Napoleon's Bivouac, a commemorative theme park at a projected cost of 200 million euros.[262]
Long-term impact outside France
Main article: Influence of the French Revolution
Bas-relief of Napoleon I in the chamber of the United States House of Representatives

Napoleon was responsible for spreading the values of the French Revolution to other countries, especially in legal reform and the abolition of serfdom.[263]

After the fall of Napoleon, not only was Napoleonic Code retained by conquered countries including the Netherlands, Belgium, parts of Italy and Germany, but has been used as the basis of certain parts of law outside Europe including the Dominican Republic, the US state of Louisiana and the Canadian province of Quebec.[264] The memory of Napoleon in Poland is favorable, for his support for independence and opposition to Russia, his legal code, the abolition of serfdom, and the introduction of modern middle class bureaucracies.[265]

Napoleon could be considered one of the founders of modern Germany. After dissolving the Holy Roman Empire, he reduced the number of German states from 300 to less than 50, paving the way to German Unification. A byproduct of the French occupation was a strong development in German nationalism. Napoleon also significantly aided the United States when he agreed to sell the territory of Louisiana for 15 million dollars during the presidency of Thomas Jefferson. That territory almost doubled the size of the United States, adding the equivalent of 13 states to the Union.[266]
Marriages and children
Napoleon's first wife, Joséphine, Empress of the French, painted by François Gérard, 1801
Napoleon's first wife, Joséphine, Empress of the French
Empress Marie-Louise and the King of Rome, by Joseph Franque, 1812.
Napoleon's second wife, Marie-Louise, Empress of the French

Napoleon married Joséphine de Beauharnais in 1796, when he was 26; she was a 32-year-old widow whose first husband had been executed during the Revolution. Until she met Bonaparte, she had been known as "Rose", a name which he disliked. He called her "Joséphine" instead, and she went by this name henceforth. Bonaparte often sent her love letters while on his campaigns.[267] He formally adopted her son Eugène and cousin Stéphanie and arranged dynastic marriages for them. Joséphine had her daughter Hortense marry Napoleon's brother Louis.[268]

Joséphine had lovers, including lieutenant Hippolyte Charles, during Napoleon's Italian campaign.[269] Napoleon learnt of that affair and a letter he wrote about it was intercepted by the British and published widely, to embarrass Napoleon. Napoleon had his own affairs too: during the Egyptian campaign he took Pauline Bellisle Foures, the wife of a junior officer, as his mistress. She became known as "Cleopatra." [270][note 13]

While Napoleon's mistresses had children by him, Joséphine did not produce an heir, possibly because of either the stresses of her imprisonment during the Reign of Terror or an abortion she may have had in her twenties.[272] Napoleon ultimately chose divorce so he could remarry in search of an heir. In March 1810, he married Marie Louise, Archduchess of Austria, and a great niece of Marie Antoinette by proxy; thus he had married into a German royal and imperial family.[273]

They remained married until his death, though she did not join him in exile on Elba and thereafter never saw her husband again. The couple had one child, Napoleon Francis Joseph Charles (1811–1832), known from birth as the King of Rome. He became Napoleon II in 1814 and reigned for only two weeks. He was awarded the title of the Duke of Reichstadt in 1818 and died of tuberculosis aged 21, with no children.[273]

Napoleon acknowledged one illegitimate son: Charles Léon (1806–1881) by Eléonore Denuelle de La Plaigne.[274] Alexandre Colonna-Walewski (1810–1868), the son of his mistress Maria Walewska, although acknowledged by Walewska's husband, was also widely known to be his child, and the DNA of his direct male descendant has been used to help confirm Napoleon's Y-chromosome haplotype.[275] He may have had further unacknowledged illegitimate offspring as well, such as Eugen Megerle von Mühlfeld by Emilie Victoria Kraus[276] and Hélène Napoleone Bonaparte (1816–1907) by Albine de Montholon.
Titles, styles, honours, and arms
Main article: Titles and styles of Napoleon
Ancestry
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	16. Giuseppe Maria Buonaparte
(1663–1703)
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	8. Sebastiano Nicola Buonaparte
(1683–1720/60) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	17. Maria Colonna Bozzi
(1668–1704)
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	4. Giuseppe Maria Buonaparte
(1713–1763) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	18. Carlo Tusoli
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	9. Maria Anna Tusoli
(1690–1760) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	19. Isabella
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	2. Carlo Maria Buonaparte
(1746–1785) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	10. Giuseppe Maria Paravicini 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	5. Maria Saveria Paravicini
(1715–bef. 1750) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	22. Angelo Agostino Salineri
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	11. Maria Angela Salineri 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	23. Francetta Merezano
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	1. Napoleon I, Emperor of the French and King of Italy
(1769–1821) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	24. Giovanni Girolamo Ramolino
(1645–?)
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	12. Giovanni Agostino Ramolino 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	25. Maria Laetitia Boggiano
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	6. Giovanni Geronimo Ramolino (1723–1755) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	26. Andrea Peri
(1669–?)
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	13. Angela Maria Peri 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	27. Maria Maddalena Colonna d'Istria
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	3. Maria Letizia Ramolino
(1750–1836) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	28. Giovanni Antonio Pietrasanta
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	14. Giuseppe Maria Pietrasanta 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	29. Paola Brigida Sorba
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	7. Angela Maria Pietrasanta (1725–1790) 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
 
	15. Maria Giuseppa Malerba 	
 
 
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
	
 
Notes

He established a system of public education,[5] abolished the vestiges of feudalism,[6] emancipated Jews and other religious minorities,[7] enacted legal protections for an emerging middle class,[8] and centralized state power at the expense of religious authorities.[5] His lasting legal achievement, the Napoleonic Code, has been adopted in various forms by a quarter of the world's legal systems, from Japan to Québec.[9][10][11]
His name was also spelled as Nabulione, Nabulio, Napolionne, and Napulione.[16]
Aside from his name, there does not appear to be a connection between him and Napoleon's theorem.[26]
He was mainly referred to as Bonaparte until he became First Consul for life.[29]
This is depicted in Bonaparte Crossing the Alps by Hippolyte Delaroche and in Jacques-Louis David's imperial Napoleon Crossing the Alps, he is less realistically portrayed on a charger in the latter work.[80]
Napoleon gave the pope a tiara following the ceremony, now referred to as the Napoleon Tiara.
It was customary to cast a death mask of a leader. Four genuine death masks of Napoleon are known to exist: one in The Cabildo in New Orleans, one in a Liverpool museum, another in Havana and one in the library of the University of North Carolina.[174]
The body can tolerate large doses of arsenic if ingested regularly, and arsenic was a fashionable cure-all.[181]
"Nous trompons les Égyptiens par notre simili attachement à leur religion, à laquelle Bonaparte et nous ne croyons pas plus qu'à celle de Pie le défunt."[185]
"I think the matter that made man was slime, warmed by the sun and vivified by electric fluids. What are animals—an ox, for example—but organized matter? Well, when we see that our physical frame resembles theirs, may we not believe that we are only better organized matter... The most simple idea consists in worshiping the sun, which gives life to everything. I repeat, I think man was created in an atmosphere warmed by the sun, and that after a certain time this productive power ceased." [189]
"I do not think Jesus Christ ever existed. I would believe in the Christian religion if it dated from the beginning of the world. That Socrates, Plato, the Mohammedan, and all the English should be damned is too absurd. Jesus was probably put to death, like many other fanatics who proclaimed themselves to be prophets or the expected Messiah. Every year there were many of these men."[190]
Napoleon's height was 5 ft 2 in in French measure according to Antommarchi at Napoleon's autopsy, whereas British sources put his height at 5 ft 6 in in imperial measure: both equivalent to 1.68 m.[217] Napoleon surrounded himself with tall bodyguards and had a nickname of le petit caporal which was an affectionate term that reflected his reported camaraderie with his soldiers rather than his height.

    One night, during an illicit liaison with the actress Marguerite George, Napoleon had a major fit. This and other more minor attacks have led historians to debate whether he had epilepsy and, if so, to what extent.[271]

Citations

E. Hales, "Napoleon and the Pope", (London:1962) pg 114
"Napoleon". Random House Webster's Unabridged Dictionary.
Roberts, Andrew. Napoleon: A Life. Penguin Group, 2014, Introduction.
Charles Messenger, ed. (2001). Reader's Guide to Military History. Routledge. pp. 391–427. ISBN 978-1-135-95970-8.
Grab, A. Napoleon and the Transformation of Europe. Palgrave Macmillan, 2003, p. 56
Broers, M. and Hicks, P.The Napoleonic Empire and the New European Political Culture. Palgrave Macmillan, 2012, p. 230
Conner, S. P. The Age of Napoleon. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2004, pp. 38-40.
Fremont-Barnes, G. and Fisher, T. The Napoleonic Wars: The Rise and Fall of an Empire. Osprey Publishing, 2004, p. 336
Roberts, A. Napoleon: A Life. Penguin Group, 2014, p. 279.
The ideas that underpin our modern world—meritocracy, equality before the law, property rights, religious toleration, modern secular education, sound finances, and so on—were championed, consolidated, codified and geographically extended by Napoleon. To them he added a rational and efficient local administration, an end to rural banditry, the encouragement of science and the arts, the abolition of feudalism and the greatest codification of laws since the fall of the Roman Empire. Andrew Roberts, Napoleon: A Life (2014), p. xxxiii.
Xavier Blanc-Jouvan, Worldwide Influence of the French Civil Code of 1804, on the Occasion of its Bicentennial Celebration [1]
The ideas that underpin our modern world—meritocracy, equality before the law, property rights, religious toleration, modern secular education, sound finances, and so on—were championed, consolidated, codified and geographically extended by Napoleon. To them he added a rational and efficient local administration, an end to rural banditry, the encouragement of science and the arts, the abolition of feudalism and the greatest codification of laws since the fall of the Roman Empire. Andrew Roberts, Napoleon: A Life (2014), p. xxxiii.
Xavier Blanc-Jouvan, Worldwide Influence of the French Civil Code of 1804, on the Occasion of its Bicentennial Celebration [2]
Roberts, A. Napoleon: A Life. Penguin Group, 2014, p. 801.
McLynn 1998, p.6
Dwyer 2008, p.xv
McLynn 1998, p.2
2012 DNA tests found some of the family's ancestors were from the Caucasus region; "Le Figaro – Mon Figaro : Selon son ADN,les ancêtres de Napoléon seraient du Caucase!". Le Figaro. 15 January 2012. Retrieved 20 February 2012.; The study found haplogroup type E1b1c1*, which originated in Northern Africa circa 1200 BC; the people migrated into the Caucasus and into Europe. "Haplogroup of the Y Chromosome of Napoléon the First; Gerard Lucotte, Thierry Thomasset, Peter Hrechdakian; Journal of Molecular Biology Research". December 2011. Retrieved 18 February 2012.
Cronin 1994, pp. 20–21
Philip Dwyer, Napoleon (2008) ch 1
Cronin 1994, p.27
Roberts 2001, p.xvi
McLynn 1998, p.18
Dwyer 2008, p.29
McLynn 1998, p.21
Wells 1992, p.74
Dwyer 2008, p.42
McLynn 1998, p.26
McLynn 1998, p.290
McLynn 1998, p.37
McLynn 1998, p.55
McLynn 1998, p.61
Roberts 2001, p.xviii
Dwyer 2008, p.132
McLynn 1998, p.76
Dwyer 2008, pp.145–9
Chandler 1973, p.30
Bourrienne, Memoirs of Napoleon, p.39.
Bourrienne, Memoirs of Napoleon, p.38.
Dwyer 2008, p.157
McLynn 1998, pp.76, 84
McLynn 1998, p.92
Dwyer 2008, p.26
Dwyer 2008, p.164
McLynn 1998, p.93
McLynn 1998, p.96
Johnson 2002, p.27
"The works of Thomas Carlyle – The French Revolution, vol.III, book 3.VII". Google.
Englund (2010) pp 92-94
Dwyer 2008, pp.284–5
McLynn 1998, p.132
McLynn 1998, p.145
McLynn 1998, p.142
Harvey 2006, p.179
McLynn 1998, p.135
Dwyer 2008, p.306
Dwyer 2008, p.305
Dwyer 2008, p.322
Watson 2003, pp.13–14
Amini 2000, p.12
Dwyer 2008, p.342
Englund (2010) pp 127-8
McLynn 1998, p.175
"DuMont BILDATLAS Malta". google.com.mt.
Frans Sammut (1997/2008). Bonaparte à Malte. Argo, Malta. ISBN 9789993288060
McLynn 1998, p.179
Dwyer 2008, p.372
Roberts 2001, p.xx
Dwyer 2008, pp.392
Dwyer 2008, pp.411–24
McLynn 1998, p.189
McLynn 1998, p.193
Dwyer 2008, p.442
Connelly 2006, p.57
Dwyer 2008, p.444
Dwyer 2008, p.455
François Furet, The French Revolution, 1770–1814 (1996), p. 212
Georges Lefebvre, Napoleon from 18 Brumaire to Tilsit 1799–1807 (1969), pp. 60–68
Lefebvre, Napoleon from 18 Brumaire to Tilsit 1799–1807 (1969), pp. 71–92
Chandler 2002, p.51
McLynn 1998, p.235
Schom 1997, p.302
Alder 2002
Edwards 1999, p.55
For and advanced diplomatic history of the era see Paul W. Schroeder, The Transformation of European Politics 1763–1848 (Oxford U.P. 1996) pp 177–560
McLynn 1998, p.265
Roberts, Andrew. Napoleon: A Life. Penguin Group, 2014, p. 301
Roberts, Andrew. Napoleon: A Life. Penguin Group, 2014, p. 303
Connelly 2006, p.70
McLynn 1998, p.243
McLynn 1998, p.296
McLynn 1998, p.297
Woolley, Reginald Maxwell (1915). Coronation Rites. Cambridge University Press. pp. 106–107.
Paul W. Schroeder, The Transformation of European Politics 1763–1848 (1996) pp 231-86
Chandler p. 328. Meanwhile, French territorial rearrangements in Germany occurred without Russian consultation and Napoleon's annexations in the Po valley increasingly strained relations between the two.
Chandler p. 331
Chandler p. 323
Chandler p. 332
Chandler p. 333
McLynn 1998, p.321
McLynn 1998, p.332
Richard Brooks (editor), Atlas of World Military History. p. 108
Andrew Uffindell, Great Generals of the Napoleonic Wars. p. 15
Richard Brooks (editor), Atlas of World Military History. p. 156.
Richard Brooks (editor), Atlas of World Military History. p. 156. It is a historical cliché to compare the Schlieffen Plan with Hannibal's tactical envelopment at Cannae (216 BC); Schlieffen owed more to Napoleon's strategic maneuver on Ulm (1805).
David G. Chandler, The Campaigns of Napoleon. p. 407
Adrian Gilbert (2000). The Encyclopedia of Warfare: From Earliest Time to the Present Day. Taylor & Francis. p. 133. ISBN 978-1-57958-216-6. Retrieved 11 July 2014.
Schom 1997, p.414
McLynn 1998, p.350
Cronin 1994, p.344
Karsh 2001, p.12
Chandler 1966, p. 467-8
Brooks 2000, p. 110
Chandler 1966, p.467-8
McLynn 1998, p.497
Jacques Godechot et al. Napoleonic Era in Europe (1971) pp 126-39
McLynn 1998, p.370
Todd Fisher & Gregory Fremont-Barnes, The Napoleonic Wars: The Rise and Fall of an Empire. p. 197.
Fisher & Fremont-Barnes pp. 198–99.
Fisher & Fremont-Barnes p. 199.
"The Erfurt Convention 1808". Napoleon-series.org. Retrieved 22 April 2013.
Fisher & Fremont-Barnes p. 205.
Chandler pp. 659-60.
Fisher & Fremont-Barnes p. 106.
Chandler p. 690.
Chandler p. 701.
Chandler p. 705.
Chandler p. 706.
Chandler p. 707.
David G. Chandler, The Campaigns of Napoleon. p. 708.
David G. Chandler, The Campaigns of Napoleon. p. 720.
David G. Chandler, The Campaigns of Napoleon. p. 729.
"The British Expeditionary Force to Walcheren: 1809". napoleon-series.org.
Todd Fisher & Gregory Fremont-Barnes, The Napoleonic Wars: The Rise and Fall of an Empire. p. 144.
David G. Chandler, The Campaigns of Napoleon. p. 732.
McLynn 1998, p.378
McLynn 1998, p.495
McLynn 1998, p.507
McLynn 1998, p.506
McLynn 1998, pp.504–505
Harvey 2006, p.773
McLynn 1998, p.518
Markham 1988, p.194
"Napoleon1812". napoleon-1812.nl.
Markham 1988, pp.190, 199
McLynn 1998, p.541
McLynn 1998, p.549
McLynn 1998, p.565
Chandler 1995, p.1020
J. P. Riley (2013). Napoleon and the World War of 1813: Lessons in Coalition Warfighting. Routledge. p. 206.
Leggiere (2007). The Fall of Napoleon: Volume 1, The Allied Invasion of France, 1813–1814. pp. 53–54.
Fremont-Barnes 2004, p.14
McLynn 1998, p.585
Gates 2003, p.259
Lieven, Dominic (2010). Russia Against Napoleon: The True Story of the Campaigns of War and Peace. Penguin. pp. 484–85.
"Napoleon's act of abdication". Bulletin des lois de la Republique Française. Retrieved 28 August 2009.
McLynn 1998, pp.593–4
McLynn 1998, p.597
McLynn 1998, p.604
"(untitled)". Freeman's Journal and Daily Commercial Advertiser (Dublin). 24 November 1831.
Ferrier, Tracey. "Napoleon's getaway ship 'found in Queensland'". MSN News Australia. Retrieved 16 June 2015.
McLynn 1998, p.605
McLynn 1998, p.607
Chesney 2006, p.35
Cordingly 2004, p.254
Schom 1997, pp.769–770
McLynn 1998, p.642
Wilkins 1972
McLynn 1998, p.651
Albert Benhamou, Inside Longwood – Barry O'Meara's clandestine letters, 2012
McLynn 1998, p. 655
Roberts, Napoleon (2014) 799-801
Wilson 1975, pp.293–5
Fulghum 2007
McLynn 1998, p.655
Driskel 1993, p. 168"
McLynn 1998, p.656
Johnson 2002, pp.180–1
Cullen 2008, pp.146–48
Cullen 2008, p.156
Cullen 2008, p.50
Cullen 2008, p.161, and Hindmarsh et al. 2008, p.2092
"L'Empire et le Saint-Siège". Napoleon.org. Retrieved 15 June 2011.
Stephen Coote (2005). Napoleon and the Hundred Days. Perseus. p. 28.
Jacques Bainville, Napoleon I, p.94
"Bonaparte and Islam.". Center for History and New Media at George Mason University. Retrieved 12 July 2012.
"Napoleon: Man of Peace". Napoleon-series.org. 17 November 1999. Retrieved 4 November 2011.
Juan Cole, Napoleon's Egypt: Invading the Middle East, Palgrave Macmillan, 2007, p.29
Talk Of Napoleon At St. Helena'' (1903), pp. 270–271
Talk Of Napoleon At St. Helena'' (1903), pp. 276–277
Talk Of Napoleon At St. Helena'' (1903), pp. 274–275
Talk Of Napoleon At St. Helena'' (1903), pp. 279–280
Louis Antoine Fauvelet de Bourrienne, Memoirs of Napoleon Bonaparte. Scott, Webster & Geary. 1839. p. 586. Retrieved 5 February 2011.
William Roberts, "Napoleon, the Concordat of 1801, and Its Consequences." in by Frank J. Coppa, ed., Controversial Concordats: The Vatican's Relations with Napoleon, Mussolini, and Hitler (1999) pp: 34-80.
Nigel Aston, Religion and revolution in France, 1780–1804 (Catholic University of America Press, 2000) pp 279-315
Nigel Aston, Christianity and revolutionary Europe, 1750–1830 (Cambridge University Press, 2002) pp 261-62.
Luis Granados (2012). Damned Good Company. Humanist Press. pp. 182–83.
McLynn 1998, p.436
Schwarzfuchs 1979, p.50
Cronin 1994, p.315
Pieter Geyl, Napoleon, For and Against (1982)
George F. E. Rudé (1988). The French Revolution. Grove Weidenfeld. p. 128. ISBN 978-0-8021-3272-7.
Andrea Barham (2014). Napoleon Wasn't Short and St Patrick Wasn't Irish: When History Gets It Wrong. Michael O'Mara. pp. 47–49. ISBN 978-1-78243-095-7.
Jack Coggins (1966). Soldiers And Warriors: An Illustrated History. Courier Dover Publications. p. 187. ISBN 978-0-486-45257-9.
Sally Waller (2002). France in Revolution, 1776–1830. Heinemann. p. 188. ISBN 978-0-435-32732-3.
See David Chandler, "General Introduction" to his Chandler, David. The Campaigns of Napoleon: the Mind and Method of History's Greatest Soldier (1975).
Roberts, Napoleon: A Life (2014) pp 470-73
Gregory R. Copley (2007). The Art of Victory: Strategies for Personal Success and Global Survival in a Changing World. Simon and Schuster. p. 97. ISBN 1-4165-2478-9.
Philip Dwyer, Citizen Emperor (2013) pp 175-76
J. M. Thompson, Napoleon Bonaparte: His Rise and Fall (1954), p.285
Christopher Hibbert (1999). Wellington: A Personal History. Da Capo Press. p. 171. ISBN 0-7382-0148-0.
McLynn, (1998) p 357
Steven Englund, Napoleon: A Political Life (2004), pp.379ff
van Crevald, Martin (1987). Command in War. Massachusetts: Harvard University Press. p. 64. ISBN 0-674-14441-4.
"Napoleon Bonaparte (Character)". Internet Movie Database. Retrieved 12 October 2008. and Bell 2007, p.13
Roberts 2004, p.93
Nature Clinical Practice Gastroenterology & Hepatology (12 May 2006). "Nature Clinical Practice Gastroenterology & Hepatology | Napoleon Bonaparte's gastric cancer: a clinicopathologic approach to staging, pathogenesis, and etiology | Article". Nature. Retrieved 25 January 2014.
Hall 2006, p.181
Bordes 2007, p.118
McGRAW-HILL'S, US History 2012, pp. 112–113
Blaufarb 2007, pp.101–2
McLynn 1998, p.255
Bernard Schwartz (1998). The Code Napoleon and the Common-law World. The Lawbook Exchange. p. 7. ISBN 978-1-886363-59-5.
Wood 2007, p.55
Scheck 2008, Chapter: The Road to National Unification
Astarita 2005, p.264
Alter 2006, pp.61–76
Andrew Roberts, Napoleon: A Life (2014) p xxxiii
Robert R. Palmer and Joel Colton, A History of the Modern World (New York: McGraw Hill, 1995), pp. 428–9.
Archer et al. 2002, p.397
Flynn 2001, p.16
Bruce McConachy, "The Roots of Artillery Doctrine: Napoleonic Artillery Tactics Reconsidered," Journal of Military History 2001 65(3): 617–640. in JSTOR; online
Archer et al. 2002, p.383
John Shy, "Jomini" in Peter Paret, ed. Makers of Modern Strategy: From Machiavelli to the Nuclear Age (1986).
Archer et al. 2002, p.380
Roberts 2001, p.272
Archer et al. 2002, p.404
Hallock, William; Wade, Herbert T (1906). "Outlines of the evolution of weights and measures and the metric system". London: The Macmillan Company. pp. 66–69.
Denis Février. "Un historique du mètre" (in French). Ministère de l'Economie, des Finances et de l'Industrie. Retrieved 10 March 2011.
Thierry Sabot (1 October 2000). "Les poids et mesures sous l'Ancien Régime" [The weights and measures of the Ancien Régime] (in French). histoire-genealogie. Retrieved 10 February 2011.
O'Connor 2003
Clive Emsley (2014). Napoleon: Conquest, Reform and Reorganisation. Routledge. p. 52.
L. Pearce Williams, "Science, education and Napoleon I." Isis (1956): 369-382 in JSTOR
Margaret Bradley, "Scientific education versus military training: the influence of Napoleon Bonaparte on the Ecole Polytechnique." Annals of science (1975) 32#5 pp: 415-449.
Harvnb|Roberts|2014|p=278-281
Max Hastings, "Everything Is Owed to Glory," The Wall Street Journal October 31, 2014
Charles Esdaile, Napoleon's Wars: An International History 1803–1815 (2008), p 39
Colin S. Gray (2007). War, Peace and International Relations: An Introduction to Strategic History. Routledge. p. 47. ISBN 978-1-134-16951-1.
Abbott 2005, p.3
McLynn 1998, p.666
Repa, Jan (2 December 2005). "Furore over Austerlitz ceremony". BBC. Retrieved 5 April 2010.
Poulos 2000
Geyl 1947
Philip Dwyer, "Remembering and Forgetting in Contemporary France: Napoleon, Slavery, and the French History Wars", French Politics, Culture & Society (2008) 26#3. pp 110–122. online
Chandler 1973, p. xliii
Hanson 2003
Cronin 1994, pp.342–3
Alan Forrest, "Propaganda and the Legitimation of Power in Napoleonic France." French History, 2004 18(4): 426–445
Sudhir Hazareesingh, "Memory and Political Imagination: the Legend of Napoleon Revisited." French History, 2004 18(4): 463–483
Venita Datta, "'L'appel Au Soldat': Visions of the Napoleonic Legend in Popular Culture of the Belle Epoque." French Historical Studies 2005 28(1): 1–30
"Call for Papers: International Napoleonic Society, Fourth International Napoleonic Congress". La Fondation Napoléon. Retrieved 27 June 2008.
Laurent, Ottavi (8 February 2012). "A New Napoleonic Campaign for Montereau". Foundation Napoleon.
Alexander Grab, Napoleon and the Transformation of Europe (Macmillan, 2003), country by country analysis
"Napoleonic Code". Encyclopædia Britannica. Retrieved 13 April 2012.
Andrzej Nieuwazny, "Napoleon and Polish identity." History Today, May 1998 v48 n5 pp.50–55
McGRAW-HILL's,US History 2012, pp. 112–113
McLynn 1998, p.117
McLynn 1998, p.271
McLynn 1998, p.118
McLynn 1998, p.188
McLynn 1998, p.284
McLynn 1998, p.100
McLynn 1998, p.663
McLynn 1998, p.630
Lucotte, Gérard; Macé, Jacques & Hrechdakian, Peter (September 2013). "Reconstruction of the Lineage Y Chromosome Haplotype of Napoléon the First" (PDF). International Journal of Sciences (Alkhaer Publications) 2 (9): 127–139. ISSN 2305-3925.

    McLynn 1998, p.423

References
Biographical studies

    Abbott, John (2005). Life of Napoleon Bonaparte. Kessinger Publishing. ISBN 1-4179-7063-4.
    Blaufarb, Rafe (2007). Napoleon: Symbol for an Age, A Brief History with Documents. Bedford. ISBN 0-312-43110-4.
    Chandler, David (2002). Napoleon. Leo Cooper. ISBN 0-85052-750-3.
    Cronin, Vincent (1994). Napoleon. HarperCollins. ISBN 0-00-637521-9.
    Dwyer, Philip. Napoleon: The Path to Power (2008) excerpt vol 1; Citizen Emperor: Napoleon in Power (2013) excerpt and text search v 2; most recent scholarly biography
    Englund, Steven (2010). Napoleon: A Political Life. Scribner. ISBN 0-674-01803-6.
    Gueniffey, Patrice. Bonaparte: 1769-1802 (Harvard UP, 2015, French edition 2013); 1008pp; most comprehensive recent scholarly biography; less emphasis on battles and campaigns
    Johnson, Paul (2002). Napoleon: A life. Penguin Books. ISBN 0-670-03078-3.; 200pp; quite hostile
    Lefebvre, Georges (1969). Napoleon from 18 Brumaire to Tilsit, 1799–1807. Columbia University Press. influential wide-ranging history
        Lefebvre, Georges (1969). Napoleon; from Tilsit to Waterloo, 1807–1815. Columbia University Press.
    Markham, Felix (1963). Napoleon. Mentor.; 303pp; short biography by an Oxford scholar online
    McLynn, Frank (1998). Napoleon. Pimlico. ISBN 0-7126-6247-2. ASIN 0712662472.; well-written popular history
    Roberts, Andrew. Napoleon: A Life (2014); long, favourable biography by British military historian
    Thompson, J.M. (1951). Napoleon Bonaparte: His Rise and Fall. Oxford U.P., 412pp; by an Oxford scholar

Specialty studies

    Alder, Ken (2002). The Measure of All Things—The Seven-Year Odyssey and Hidden Error That Transformed the World. Free Press. ISBN 0-7432-1675-X.
    Alter, Peter (2006). T. C. W. Blanning and Hagen Schulze, ed. Unity and Diversity in European Culture c. 1800. Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-726382-8.
    Amini, Iradj (2000). Napoleon and Persia. Taylor & Francis. ISBN 0-934211-58-2.
    Archer, Christon I.; Ferris, John R.; Herwig, Holger H. (2002). World History of Warfare. University of Nebraska Press. ISBN 0-8032-4423-1.
    Astarita, Tommaso (2005). Between Salt Water And Holy Water: A History Of Southern Italy. W. W. Norton & Company. ISBN 0-393-05864-6.
    Bell, David (2007). The First Total War. Houghton Mifflin Harcourt. ISBN 0-618-34965-0.
    Bordes, Philippe (2007). Jacques-Louis David. Yale University Press. ISBN 0-300-12346-9.
    Brooks, Richard (2000). Atlas of World Military History. HarperCollins. ISBN 0-7607-2025-8.
    Chandler, David (1973). The Campaigns of Napoleon., the standard military history of N's battles
    Chesney, Charles (2006). Waterloo Lectures:A Study Of The Campaign Of 1815. Kessinger Publishing. ISBN 1-4286-4988-3.
    Connelly, Owen (2006). Blundering to Glory: Napoleon's Military Campaigns. Rowman & Littlefield. ISBN 0-7425-5318-3.
    Cordingly, David (2004). The Billy Ruffian: The Bellerophon and the Downfall of Napoleon. Bloomsbury. ISBN 1-58234-468-X.
    Cullen, William (2008). Is Arsenic an Aphrodisiac?. Royal Society of Chemistry. ISBN 0-85404-363-2.
    Driskel, Paul (1993). As Befits a Legend. Kent State University Press. ISBN 0-87338-484-9.
    Flynn, George Q. (2001). Conscription and democracy: The Draft in France, Great Britain, and the United States. Greenwood Publishing Group. ISBN 0-313-31912-X.
    Fremont-Barnes, Gregory; Fisher, Todd (2004). The Napoleonic Wars: The Rise and Fall of an Empire. Osprey. ISBN 1-84176-831-6.
    Fulghum, Neil (2007). "Death Mask of Napoleon". University of North Carolina. Retrieved 4 August 2008.
    Gates, David (2001). The Spanish Ulcer: A History of the Peninsular War. Da Capo Press. ISBN 0-306-81083-2.
    Gates, David (2003). The Napoleonic Wars, 1803–1815. Pimlico. ISBN 0-7126-0719-6.
    Godechot, Jacques et al. (1971). The Napoleonic era in Europe. Holt, Rinehart and Winston.
    Grab, Alexander. Napoleon and the Transformation of Europe (Macmillan, 2003), country by country analysis
    Hall, Stephen (2006). Size Matters. Houghton Mifflin Harcourt. ISBN 0-618-47040-9.
    Harvey, Robert (2006). The War of Wars. Robinson. ISBN 978-1-84529-635-3.
    Hindmarsh, J. Thomas; Savory, John (2008). "The Death of Napoleon, Cancer or Arsenic?". Clinical Chemistry (American Association for Clinical Chemistry) 54 (12): 2092. doi:10.1373/clinchem.2008.117358. Retrieved 10 October 2010.
    Karsh, Inari (2001). Empires of the Sand: The Struggle for Mastery in the Middle East, 1789–1923. Harvard University Press. ISBN 0-674-00541-4.
    O'Connor, J; Robertson, E F (2003). "The history of measurement". St Andrew's University. Retrieved 18 July 2008.
    Poulos, Anthi (2000). "1954 Hague Convention for the Protection of Cultural Property in the Event of Armed Conflict". International Journal of Legal Information (vol 28 ed.).
    Roberts, Chris (2004). Heavy Words Lightly Thrown. Granta. ISBN 1-86207-765-7.
    Scheck, Raffael (2008). Germany, 1871–1945: A Concise History. Berg. ISBN 1-84520-817-X.
    Schom, Alan (1997). Napoleon Bonaparte. HarperCollins. ISBN 978-0-06-017214-5.
    Schroeder, Paul W. (1996). The Transformation of European Politics 1763–1848. Oxford U.P. pp. 177–560. ISBN 978-0-19-820654-5. advanced diplomatic history of Napoleon and his era
    Schwarzfuchs, Simon (1979). Napoleon, the Jews and the Sanhedrin. Routledge. ISBN 0-19-710023-6.
    Watson, William (2003). Tricolor and crescent. Greenwood Publishing Group. ISBN 0-275-97470-7. Retrieved 12 June 2009.
    Wells, David (1992). The Penguin Dictionary of Curious and Interesting Geometry. Penguin Books. ISBN 0-14-011813-6.
    Wilkins, William (1972) [1944]. Napoleon's Submarine. New English Library. ISBN 0-450-01028-7.
    Wilson, J (1975). "Dr. Archibald Arnott: Surgeon to the 20th Foot and Physician to Napoleon". British Medical Journal 3 (vol.3): 293–5. doi:10.1136/bmj.3.5978.293. PMC 1674241. PMID 1097047.
    Wood, Philip (2007). The Law and Practice of International Finance Series. Sweet & Maxwell. ISBN 1-84703-210-9.

Historiography and memory

    Dwyer, Philip (2008). "Remembering and Forgetting in Contemporary France: Napoleon, Slavery, and the French History Wars". French Politics, Culture & Society 26 (3): 110–122.
    Englund, Steven. "Napoleon and Hitler" Journal of the Historical Society (2006) 6#1 pp 151–169.
    Geyl, Pieter (1982) [1947]. Napoleon For and Against. Penguin Books.
    Hanson, Victor Davis (2003). "The Claremont Institute: The Little Tyrant, A review of Napoleon: A Penguin Life". The Claremont Institute.
    Hazareesingh, Sudhir (2005). The Legend of Napoleon. excerpt and text search
        Hazareesingh, Sudhir. "Memory and Political Imagination: The Legend of Napoleon Revisited," French History (2004) 18#4 pp 463–483.
        Hazareesingh, Sudhir (2005). "Napoleonic Memory in Nineteenth-Century France: The Making of a Liberal Legend". MLN 120 (4): 747–773.

External links
Find more about
Napoleon Bonaparte
at Wikipedia's sister projects
Search Wiktionary 	Definitions from Wiktionary
Search Commons 	Media from Commons
Search Wikinews 	News stories from Wikinews
Search Wikiquote 	Quotations from Wikiquote
Search Wikisource 	Source texts from Wikisource
Search Wikibooks 	Textbooks from Wikibooks
Search Wikiversity 	Learning resources from Wikiversity

    The Napoleonic Guide
    Napoleon Series
    International Napoleonic Society
    Napoléon Bonaparte (Character) at the Internet Movie Database
    Biography by the US Public Broadcasting Service
    Inside Longwood descriptions of Longwood House & other places on St. Helena, articles on Napoleon's captivity
    Alan Schom Interview on his book Napoleon Bonaparte on Booknotes, 26 October 1997
    Works by Napoleon at Project Gutenberg
    Works by or about Napoleon at Internet Archive
    Memoirs of Napoleon at Project Gutenberg
    John Holland Rose. The Life of Napoleon I at Project Gutenberg
    John Gibson Lockhart. The History of Napoleon Buonaparte at Project Gutenberg
    William Milligan Sloane. The Life of Napoleon I. at Project Gutenberg Vol. 1/4
    William Milligan Sloane. The Life of Napoleon I. at Project Gutenberg Vol. 3/4

Emperor Napoleon I of France
House of Bonaparte
Political offices
Preceded by
French Directory 	Provisional Consul of France
11 November – 12 December 1799
Served alongside:
Roger Ducos and Emmanuel Joseph Sieyès 	Became Consul
New title
Consulate created
	First Consul of France
12 December 1799 – 18 May 1804
Served alongside:
Jean Jacques Régis de Cambacérès (Second Consul)
Charles-François Lebrun (Third Consul) 	Became Emperor
Regnal titles
Vacant
French Revolution
Title last held by
Louis XVI of France
as King of the French 	Emperor of the French
18 May 1804 – 11 April 1814 	Succeeded by
Louis XVIII of France
as King of France and Navarre
Vacant
Title last held by
Charles V, Holy Roman Emperor
as last crowned monarch, 1530 	King of Italy
17 March 1805 – 11 April 1814 	Vacant
Title next held by
Victor Emmanuel II of Savoy
Preceded by
Louis XVIII of France
as King of France and Navarre 	Emperor of the French
20 March – 22 June 1815 	Succeeded by
Louis XVIII of France
as King of France and Navarre
(Napoleon II according to his will only)
Vacant
Title last held by
Louis XVI of France 	Co-Prince of Andorra
1806 – 11 April 1814 	Succeeded by
Louis XVIII of France
Preceded by
none 	Sovereign of the Island of Elba
11 April 1814 – 20 March 1815 	Succeeded by
none
New title
State created
	Protector of the Confederation of the Rhine
12 July 1806 – 19 October 1813 	Rhine Confederation dissolved
successive ruler:
Francis II, Holy Roman Emperor
as President of the German Confederation
Titles in pretence
New title 	— TITULAR —
Emperor of the French
11 April 1814 – 20 March 1815 	Vacant
Title next held by
Napoleon II
[show]

    v
    t
    e

Napoleonic Wars
[show]

    v
    t
    e

French Revolution
[show]

    v
    t
    e

Imperial House of France of the First French Empire
[show]

    v
    t
    e

Bonaparte family
[show]

    v
    t
    e

French monarchs
[show]

    v
    t
    e

German Confederations 1806–1871
[show]

    v
    t
    e

Pretenders to the French throne since 1792
[show]

    v
    t
    e

Heads of State of France
[show]

    v
    t
    e

French Consulate (10 November 1799 – 18 May 1804)
Authority control 	

    WorldCat
    VIAF: 106964661
    LCCN: n79054933
    ISNI: 0000 0001 2283 8283
    GND: 118586408
    SELIBR: 207147
    SUDOC: 02733791X
    BNF: cb12008245w (data)
    BPN: 55397934
    BIBSYS: x90272048
    ULAN: 500122388
    NLA: 35372777
    NDL: 00450992
    NKC: jn20000604140
    ICCU: IT\ICCU\CFIV\096977
    BNE: XX954040

Categories:

    Napoleon
    1769 births
    1821 deaths
    18th-century rulers in Europe
    19th-century monarchs in Europe
    Amateur mathematicians
    Corsican politicians
    Deaths from stomach cancer
    First French Empire
    French commanders of the Napoleonic Wars
    French emperors
    French exiles
    French military leaders of the French Revolutionary Wars
    French people of Italian descent
    French Roman Catholics
    House of Bonaparte
    Kings of Italy
    Leaders who took power by coup
    Members of the French Academy of Sciences
    Monarchs who abdicated
    People excommunicated by the Roman Catholic Church
    People of Tuscan descent
    People from Ajaccio
    Princes of Andorra

Navigation menu

    Create account
    Not logged in
    Talk
    Contributions
    Log in

    Article
    Talk

    Read
    View source
    View history

    Main page
    Contents
    Featured content
    Current events
    Random article
    Donate to Wikipedia
    Wikipedia store

Interaction

    Help
    About Wikipedia
    Community portal
    Recent changes
    Contact page

Tools

    What links here
    Related changes
    Upload file
    Special pages
    Permanent link
    Page information
    Wikidata item
    Cite this page

Print/export

    Create a book
    Download as PDF
    Printable version

Languages

    Acèh
    Адыгэбзэ
    Afrikaans
    Alemannisch
    አማርኛ
    Ænglisc
    العربية
    Aragonés
    ܐܪܡܝܐ
    অসমীয়া
    Asturianu
    Azərbaycanca
    বাংলা
    Bân-lâm-gú
    Башҡортса
    Беларуская
    Беларуская (тарашкевіца)‎
    Bikol Central
    Български
    Boarisch
    Bosanski
    Brezhoneg
    Буряад
    Català
    Чӑвашла
    Cebuano
    Čeština
    Chavacano de Zamboanga
    Chi-Chewa
    Corsu
    Cymraeg
    Dansk
    Deutsch
    Eesti
    Ελληνικά
    Emiliàn e rumagnòl
    Español
    Esperanto
    Estremeñu
    Euskara
    Eʋegbe
    فارسی
    Fiji Hindi
    Føroyskt
    Français
    Frysk
    Furlan
    Gaeilge
    Gàidhlig
    Galego
    贛語
    Gĩkũyũ
    ગુજરાતી
    客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî
    한국어
    Հայերեն
    हिन्दी
    Hrvatski
    Ido
    Ilokano
    Bahasa Indonesia
    Interlingua
    Íslenska
    Italiano
    עברית
    Basa Jawa
    ಕನ್ನಡ
    ქართული
    Қазақша
    Kiswahili
    Kreyòl ayisyen
Hide
Wiki Loves Monuments: Photograph a monument, help Wikipedia and win!
Goku
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
This article is about the Dragon Ball character. For other uses, see Goku (disambiguation).
In this Japanese name, the family name is Son.
Son Goku
Dragon Ball character
Son Goku YoungAdult.PNG
First appearance 	Dragon Ball chapter #1: Bulma and Son Goku (1984)
Created by 	Akira Toriyama
Voiced by 	Japanese
Masako Nozawa
English
See Voice actors
Profile
Aliases 	Kakarrot (birth name)
Zero (Harmony Gold dub)
Species 	Saiyan
Relatives 	Grandpa Gohan (grandfather)
Burdock (father)
Gine (mother)
Raditz (brother)
Chi-Chi (wife)
Gohan (son)
Goten (son)
Pan (grand-daughter)

Son Goku (Japanese: 孫 悟空 Hepburn: Son Gokū?) is a fictional character and the main protagonist of the Dragon Ball manga series created by Akira Toriyama. He is based on Sun Wukong, a main character in the classical Chinese novel Journey to the West. Goku is introduced in chapter #1 Bulma and Son Goku (ブルマと孫悟空 Buruma to Son Gokū?), originally published in Japan's Weekly Shōnen Jump magazine on December 3, 1984,[1] as an eccentric, monkey-tailed boy who practices martial arts and possesses superhuman strength. He meets Bulma and joins her on a journey to find the wish-granting Dragon Balls.

Initially believed to be an Earthling, he is later revealed to be a member of an extraterrestrial warrior race called the Saiyans with the birth name Kakarrot (カカロット Kakarotto?). As Goku matures, he becomes the universe's mightiest warrior and protects his adopted home planet, Earth, from villains who wish to harm it. Goku is depicted as carefree and cheerful when at ease but quickly serious and strategic-minded when fighting. He is able to concentrate his ki and use it for devastatingly powerful energy-based attacks, the most prominent being his signature Kamehameha wave technique, in which Goku launches a blue energy blast from his palms.

As the protagonist, Goku appears in most of the episodes, films, television specials, and OVAs of the manga's anime adaptations Dragon Ball, Dragon Ball Z, Dragon Ball GT and Dragon Ball Super, as well as many of the franchise's video games. Due to the series' international popularity, Goku has become one of the most recognizable and iconic anime characters in the world. Outside the Dragon Ball franchise, Goku has made cameo appearances in Toriyama's self-parody series Neko Majin Z, has been the subject of other parodies, and has appeared in special events. Most Western audiences were introduced to the adult version of Goku appearing in the Dragon Ball Z anime, itself an adaptation of Dragon Ball manga volumes 17-42, as opposed to his initial child form, due to the limited success of the first series overseas.[2] Goku's critical reception has been largely positive and he has been recognized as one of the greatest manga and anime characters of all time.

Contents

    1 Appearances
    2 Conception and creation
        2.1 Design
        2.2 Voice actors
    3 Abilities
        3.1 Transformations
    4 Reception and legacy
    5 Appearances in other media
    6 References
    7 Further reading
    8 External links

Appearances

Goku first appears as a monkey-tailed child adopted by the hermit Gohan. Before the series' narrative begins, he accidentally and unknowingly kills Gohan on a full-moon night when he temporarily transforms into the mighty Great Ape (a giant ape-like creature, which members of the saiyan race become as a result of blux waves given off by the full-moon). Living alone, Goku befriends teenage girl Bulma and joins her to find the seven Dragon Balls, which, when gathered, summon the wish-granting dragon Shenlong. They encounter the desert bandit Yamcha and two shapeshifters named Oolong and Puar, who also join their quest. Goku is later trained by the martial artist Kame-Sen'nin, alongside a Shaolin monk named Kuririn, who becomes his best friend. While participating in the Tenkaichi Budōkai (天下一武道会?, "Strongest Under the Heavens Martial Arts Tournament") that attracts the most powerful fighters in the world, Goku battles foes, later turned allies, such as Tenshinhan and Chaozu, as well as the Namekian Piccolo. After becoming the runner-up champion of the 21st and 22nd Tenkaichi Budōkais, Goku finally wins in the 23rd tournament with Piccolo's defeat, and marries Chi-Chi soon after.

Five years later, Goku meets his evil older brother Raditz and sacrifices himself to defeat Raditz after he learns about his heritage.[3][4] Goku comes from a race of extraterrestrials called Saiyans (サイヤ人 Saiya-jin?), himself having been sent from their home planet to prepare Earth for sale on the intergalactic market by destroying all its life.[5] While Gohan was taking care of him, Goku suffered a severe head injury and forgets his mission to conquer Earth.[5] Goku faces enemies linked to his heritage, such as the Saiyan prince Vegeta, who eventually becomes an ally; and the galactic tyrant Freeza, who destroyed the Saiyans' home planet and nearly the entire race. This is the great battle where Goku becomes a Super Saiyan. After his battle with Freeza, Goku contracts a heart virus whereof the time-traveler Trunks warns him, but recovers after taking medicine provided by Trunks. Later, Goku trains his first son Gohan to be his successor and sacrifices himself again during the battle against the evil life-form Cell. Goku is temporarily resurrected on Earth seven years later and meets his second son Goten. Shortly after, he is drawn into a battle for the universe against the monster Majin Boo. Goku also battles Vegeta again after Vegeta falls under the control of the wizard Bobbidi. Eventually, Goku destroys Boo with a Genki-Dama attack. Ten years later, during another Tenkaichi Budōkai with fighters from all over the world, Goku meets Oob, Boo's human reincarnation, and leaves with him, intending to train him as the new protector of Earth.[6]
Conception and creation

Goku, and Dragon Ball in general, evolved from one of Akira Toriyama's earlier one-shot series called Dragon Boy. In this story, the protagonist who looks a lot like Goku has a pair of wings.[7] When Toriyama created Dragon Ball, he was inspired by Journey to the West. [8] To be creative with the idea, Toriyama designed Goku as a human boy with a monkey's tail, rather than a complete simian, because the tail would give him a distinguishing feature.[9] Similarly, in Journey to the West, but retains his tail. He later stated that the tail was a pain to draw, hence why he had it get cut off early on.[10] Toriyama did not initially plan to make Goku an alien, it was not until the introduction of fighters from other planets that he established him as a Saiyan.[11] Goku was given the ability to teleport to any planet in seconds, so that Toriyama could increase the pace of the story.[12]

Wanting Dragon Ball to have a Chinese appearance, Toriyama modeled Goku's gi (martial arts uniform) on the robes worn by the Shaolin monks.[13] During the early chapters of the manga, Toriyama's editor, Kazuhiko Torishima, commented that Goku looked rather plain. Toriyama had given him simple clothes on purpose because it was a fighting manga, so to combat this he added several characters like Kame-Sen'nin and Kuririn, and created the Tenkaichi Budōkai to focus the storyline on fighting. To defy the assumption that Goku would win the tournaments, Toriyama made him lose the first and second but win the third.[9] Toriyama also mentioned Torishima wanted Goku to form a relationship with Bulma but this was never applied to the series.[14]

Toriyama's editor was initially against having Goku grow up, saying it was uncommon to have the protagonist drastically change in manga, however, he gave in when Toriyama threatened that he would not be able to continue the series if the character did not.[15] Toriyama later stated he had him grow up as a means to make drawing the fight scenes easier.[16] When Toriyama thought up the Super Saiyan concept, he felt the only way to show Goku's massive power up was to have him transform. Initially he was concerned that the facial expression looked like that of a villain, but felt since the transformation was brought about by anger it was acceptable.[17] With the conclusion of the Cell arc, Gohan was intended to replace his father as protagonist, but Toriyama decided that Gohan was unsuitable for the role.[9]

Dragon Ball GT chief character designer Katsuyoshi Nakatsuru said he agonized over designing Super Saiyan 4 Goku, which was the idea of the show's producers, questioning whether it was necessary to go further with the transformations. Because Super Saiyan 4 is brought about while in a Saiyan's Ōzaru ("Great Ape") form, he made the hair more "wild" and covered Goku's body in red fur. There was only a single final draft of the character, although Nakatsuru did consider making the hair blonde, he ended up choosing black as it provides more contrast with the red fur.[18]
Design

Goku is usually recognized by his unique hairstyle, which does not change its length except in his Super Saiyan forms, where his hair changes in color and length according to the form he takes. This is explained by Vegeta to be a common characteristic of full-blooded Saiyans.[19] Goku's hair color changes from black to golden after ascending to a Super Saiyan, and his irises change from black to turquoise. In his god form, both his hair color and irises change from a Super Saiyan's golden to a deep red. In his Super Saiyan God Super Saiyan form, acquired when transforming into a Super Saiyan while in Super Saiyan God form, both his hair color and irises change into blue. Goku prefers dressing in a dōgi uniform to show his devotion to Earth, instead of standard battle fatigues of his race;[20] the only time he actually does wear these garments is during his training with Gohan before the Cell Games.[21]

In his early childhood, Goku is introduced wearing a dark colored dōgi uniform with red wristbands and a white belt tied in a bow. Although, throughout the majority of the series, Goku is commonly seen wearing a red-orange dōgi uniform with a navy blue short-sleeved undershirt, blue wristbands, a blue belt tied in a knot, and striped boots. Goku also often wears the encircled kanji of his training masters on the front and back of this uniform; the first being Kame-Sen'nin's "kame" (亀?, meaning "turtle");[22] the second being Kaiō-sama's, "kaio" (界王?, meaning "world king");[23] and the third being his own "Go" (悟?, meaning "wisdom" or "enlightenment").[24] Eventually, Goku stops wearing a kanji[25] and replaces his knot-tied belt with a blue obi.[25]
Voice actors
Japanese and English voice actors for Goku, Masako Nozawa and Sean Schemmel, pose for the Los Angeles red carpet premiere of Dragon Ball Z: Resurrection 'F'

In the Japanese version of the entire Dragon Ball anime series and subsequent related media, Goku has been voiced by Masako Nozawa. Toriyama selected Nozawa upon hearing her audition sample, remarking that only Goku could sound like that.[26] In most non-Japanese versions, different voice actors have been used for the child and adult forms of the character. In the numerous English versions, Goku is played by different actors because different companies produced the dubs, by reason of changes of ADR companies and recording studios, or due to actors quitting.

Goku's kid incarnation was voiced by Barbara Goodson in Harmony Gold's very brief English dub of Dragon Ball,[27] Brianne Siddall provided the voice in Bandai's English release of the video game Final Bout,[28] Saffron Henderson voiced him in Funimation's original dub of the first 13 episodes of Dragon Ball and the movie Curse of the Blood Rubies (produced in association with BLT Productions),[29] Ceyli Delgadillo originally voiced him in the Funimation's in-house dub of the franchise's movies Sleeping Princess in Devil's Castle and Mystical Adventure dubbed before the series,[29] Zoe Slusar voiced him in AB Groupe's English dub of Dragon Ball and Dragon Ball GT (produced in association with Blue Water Studios) for Canadian and European broadcast,[30] Stephanie Nadolny in the entire Dragon Ball and Dragon Ball GT series, the movie The Path to Power, as well as various video games,[29] and Colleen Clinkenbeard in flashbacks for Dragon Ball Z Kai and the movie Curse of the Blood Rubies.[31]

Goku's adult incarnation has been voiced by Steven Blum in Bandai's English dub of the video game Final Bout,[28] by Ian James Corlett in Funimation's dub of episodes 1-49 (1-37 edited) and the "Toonami" version of the movie Tree of Might of Dragon Ball Z produced in association with Saban and Ocean Productions, by Peter Kelamis in Funimation's dub of episodes 50-67 (38-53 edited) of Dragon Ball Z produced in association with Saban and Ocean[32](as well as Geneon's dub of the movies Dead Zone, The World's Strongest and The Tree of Might (produced in association with Funimation and Ocean),[33] and Westwood Media's dub of episodes 108-158 of Dragon Ball Z (produced in association with Ocean) for European and Canadian broadcast), by Kirby Morrow in Westwood Media's dub of episodes 159-291 of Dragon Ball Z (produced in association with Ocean) for European and Canadian broadcast,[34] by Jeffrey Watson in AB Groupe's dub of Dragon Ball (produced in association with Blue Water Studios) for Canadian and European broadcast,[30] by Jeremiah Yurk in AB Groupe's dub of Dragon Ball GT (produced in association with Blue Water) for Canadian and European broadcast,[30] and consistently by Sean Schemmel in Funimation's in-house dub of the entire Dragon Ball franchise in the United States.[35]
Abilities
Goku in his regular state, and in his original three Super Saiyan forms (from left to right).

Through vigorous training, Goku has achieved many extraordinary abilities, like incredible super strength and durability. He also possesses super speed[36] and reflexes. He can harness/manipulate Lifeforce energy known as Ki and exert powerful and devastating concussive beams of said energy.

As a child, Goku wields the Nyoi-bō (如意棒, lit. "Mind Stick", renamed "Power Pole" in Funimation's English anime dub), a magic staff that extends and retracts on command, given to him by his grandfather;[37] but as he grows older and stronger, Goku eventually stops using the staff. Goku's first means of conveyance is a magic cloud called Kinto'un (筋斗雲, lit. "Somersault Cloud", renamed "Nimbus" in Funimation's dub), given to him by Kame-Sen'nin in return for saving his pet sea turtle.[38] After training with Kami, he learns to fly by virtue of the technique Bukū-jutsu (舞空術, lit. "Air Dance Technique") and uses the cloud less frequently.

Goku's first shown attack as a child is Jan ken (ジャン拳), three physical blows modeled after the hand signs in rock-paper-scissors.[39] However, his signature move is the Kamehameha (かめはめ波, lit. "Turtle Destruction Wave"), a technique learned from Kame-Sen'nin.[40] The Kamehameha is a concentration of ki, released as a concussive beam. Kame-Sen'nin spent about 50 years developing and perfecting the technique, but, as a child, Goku is able to understand and copy the technique immediately after only one demonstration.

Another notable technique of Goku's, taught to him by Kaiō-sama, is the Kaiō-ken (界王拳, lit. "World King Fist"), which multiplies his ki and strength for an instant, but with possible strain to the body.[41] Goku's most powerful attack is the Genki-Dama (元気玉, "Spirit Bomb" in Funimation's dub), an energy sphere created by gathering Ki from surrounding animals, nature and humans, which he also learned from Kaiō-sama.[23] Goku also learns a teleportation skill called Shunkan Idō (瞬間移動, lit. "Instant Teleport", renamed "Instant Transmission" in Funimation's dub), which he learned from the inhabitants of the planet Yardrat.[42]
Transformations

Goku is the only Saiyan in the series to achieve all known Saiyan transformations. When he possessed his tail, Goku was capable of transforming into a gigantic monkey-like creature called an Ōzaru (大猿, lit. "Great Ape") after staring at a full moon. However, Goku loses the ability when his friends cut off his tail.[43] Although it grows back, Goku's tail is later permanently removed by Kami. During his battle with Freeza, Goku becomes the first Saiyan in a thousand years to become a Super Saiyan (超サイヤ人 Sūpā Saiya-jin).[44] Each metamorphosis changes Goku's appearance and enormously enhances his abilities. After training to better control the first and second levels of Super Saiyan, the third Super Saiyan form causes Goku to act in a much more serious manner.

An alternative, more innately powerful form called Super Saiyan God (超サイヤ人ゴッド Sūpā Saiya-jin Goddo) is reached by Goku in the canonical film Battle of Gods. Though the temporary transformation wears off, Goku manages to harness its godly powers in his base form. In its sequel film Resurrection 'F', Goku manages to achieve a blue-haired evolution of Super Saiyan God under Whis's tutelage, known as the Super Saiyan God Super Saiyan (超サイヤ人ゴッドSS（スーパーサイヤ人ゴッドスーパーサイヤ人） Sūpā Saiya-jin Goddo Sūpā Saiya-jin).[45]

Another ability Goku has is to fuse with others, so long as their power levels are equalized. Later, he uses the Potara (ポタラ) earrings presented to him by the Old Kaiō-shin, which results in a "perfect fusion", but it is a permanent fusion. Goku first attempts to fuse with Gohan, but this fails when the latter is absorbed by Boo, and so he persuades the newly arrived Vegeta to fuse with him, creating Vegito (ベジット Bejitto, "Vegerot" in Viz Media's manga translation).[46] In the film Fusion Reborn, the two use the Metamorese Fusion Dance, which creates Gogeta (ゴジータ Gojīta), who sports slight visual differences from their previous merger.[47]
Reception and legacy

Goku's character has been well received by publications for manga, anime and other media. Anime News Network noted Goku as a good source of comedy and remarked that after everything he experiences, he still remains a naïve character.[48] THEM Anime Reviews noted that Goku is not an omnipotent character in the first anime series, unlike Dragon Ball Z, and does not disappear for long periods of time between sagas. They also liked the way the series' depict his entire adventures, making him a good main character.[49] Rationalmagic.com praised Goku's innocence as one of the funniest parts of the series.[50] According to Julius Weideman, Goku's journey and ever-growing strength resulted in the character winning "the admiration of young boys everywhere."[51] In 2015, the Japan Anniversary Association officially declared May 9 as "Goku Day" (悟空の日 Gokū no hi). In Japanese the numbers 5 and 9 can be pronounced as "Go" and "Ku" respectively.[52] Jason Thompson stated that unlike the "manly" heroes of other popular shōnen manga of the late 1980s and early 1990s, such as City Hunter and Fist of the North Star, Toriyama made his protagonist (Goku) cartoonish and small, thus starting a trend that Thompson says continues to this day.[53] One Piece creator Eiichiro Oda and Naruto creator Masashi Kishimoto said that Goku inspired their main protagonists as well as series structure.[54][55] Commenting on Goku's popularity, Kishimoto stated that when people hear the name "Son Goku", no longer do they think of the Journey to the West character, but instead Dragon Ball's protagonist comes to mind.[56] Masako Nozawa, the Japanese voice actor who plays Goku, said that she liked young Goku with his tail because he was cute, and stated that the character was still the same even at the end of the series.[57] Jackie Chan has gone on record stating that Goku is his favorite Dragon Ball character.[58]

Goku was ranked number one in IGN's 2009 Top 25 Anime Characters of All Time[59] and reappeared on the same list in 2014, however, on this occasion they ranked him third, with Spike Spiegel and Shinji Ikari placed above him, saying that "He was, in many ways, a character that bucked the trends of his time and defined the direction of shonen manga/anime for decades."[60] In Mania Entertainment's 10 Most Iconic Anime Heroes, Thomas Zoth commented that "Goku and Dragon Ball completely revolutionized shōnen manga."[61] In a Newtype poll from March 2010, Goku was voted the fifth most popular male character from the 1980s.[62] Goku ranked consistently high in the Anime Grand Prix poll in the category of "best male character" in the late 1980s and early 1990s, appearing seventeenth in the 1987 poll,[63] fifteenth in the 1988 poll,[64] second in the 1989 poll,[65] fourth in the 1990 poll,[66] third in the 1991 poll,[67] fourth in the 1992 poll,[68] thirteenth in 1993 poll,[69] and twelfth in 1994 poll.[70] In a 1993 character popularity poll for the series, Weekly Shōnen Jump readers voted Goku second, after his son Gohan.[71] He came in first in the magazine's 1995 poll,[71] as well as in a 2004 poll amongst fans of the series for the book Dragon Ball Forever.[72] In a 2005 The Daily Reader article entitled "The Greatest Geek Movie Heroes of All Time", Goku is the only animated character listed, and is ranked tenth.[73] In a survey of 1,000 people, conducted by Oricon in 2007, Goku ranked first place as the "Strongest Manga character of all time."[74] In the survey "Friendship" developed by rankingjapan.com, in which people chose which anime character they would like as a friend, Goku ranked fifth.[75] In 2000, Goku placed third in an Animax poll of favorite anime characters.[76] NTT customers voted him as their third favorite black haired male anime character.[77]

Several pieces of merchandising based on Goku have been released, including action figures,[78][79] plushes,[80][81] and keychains.[82]

The German rock band Son Goku takes their name from the Dragon Ball protagonist. The band's lead singer Thomas D chose the name because Goku embodies the band's philosophy, saying he was "fascinated by Goku's naïveté and cheerfulness, yet, at the same time, a great warrior saving the world."[83] In 2010, a fiberglass statue of Goku was created by Chinese artist Edison Chen, with Chen's facial features instead of Goku's, as part of Chen's "I Hate You For Looking!" collection that was displayed at the "Treacherous Treis" exhibition.[84] CNN released an article explaining how Goku was Rafael Nadal's childhood inspiration, and called Nadal "the Dragon Ball of tennis" due to his unorthodox style "from another planet."[85]
Appearances in other media

In the anime-only sequel, Dragon Ball GT, Goku is transformed into a kid by an accidental wish made by his old enemy Pilaf using the Black Star Dragon Balls while Pilaf was about to wish to take over the world.[86] He is seen wearing a multi-colored dōgi that consists of a blue fold-over shirt, a white knot-tied belt, yellow pants, pink wristbands, white shinguards and black shoes and he also has a darker skin complexion.[87] Goku, Trunks and his own granddaughter Pan travel the universe to search for the Black Star Dragon Balls and return them to Earth. Here, Goku defeats the evil Tuffle Baby, Super Android #17, and the evil Shadow Dragons. His final challenge is against Omega Shenron, who he destroys using the Genki-Dama.[88] Goku leaves with the original form of Shenlong, but not before saying his goodbyes to his friends on Earth. He then appears 100 years later at the next martial arts tournament as an adult, where he watches a battle between Goku Jr., his descendant, and Vegeta Jr., Vegeta's descendant. An elderly Pan sees him, but he quickly departs.[89]

Goku has appeared in various other media including an unofficial Taiwanese live-action film[90] and an unofficial Korean live-action film.[91] He was portrayed by Justin Chatwin in the 2009 20th Century Fox feature Dragonball Evolution.[92] Goku has also appeared in almost every Dragon Ball licensed electronic video game, including crossover games such as Jump Super Stars and Jump Ultimate Stars. In 1992, Goku was featured in the interactive game Dragon Ball Z: Get Together! Goku World,[93] in which Goku and his gang travel back in time to review events in the Dragon Ball timeline and interacts with his younger self. In 2006, Goku was featured in the Dragon Ball Z, One Piece and Naruto crossover game Battle Stadium D.O.N. In December 2007, Goku, Naruto Uzumaki and Monkey D. Luffy made guest appearances in avatar form in the MMORPG Second Life for a Jump Festa promotion titled Jumpland@Second Life.[94] Goku also appears in the Dr. Slump and Arale-chan video game for the Nintendo DS.[95]

Goku has been the subject of, and is mentioned in, various songs. "Son Goku Song"[96] and "Gokū no Gokigen Jānī"[97] feature Goku as a child singing about himself. During his adult years, the song "Aitsu wa Son Gokū" by Hironobu Kageyama, where Kageyama praises everything about Goku,[98] and the duet "Ore-tachi no Energy"[99] feature words spoken by the character. For the release of the single of the Dragonball Evolution international theme song "Rule", Toriyama supplied CD artwork of singer Ayumi Hamasaki dressed as Goku.[100]

Goku has been used in Japanese public service announcements aimed at children. In June 1988, Goku and other Dragon Ball characters were featured in two PSA short films. The first, in which Goku is taught the importance of obeying traffic safety by others, is entitled The Goku Traffic Safety (悟空の交通安全 Gokū no Kōtsū Anzen?).[101] The second is called The Goku Fire Fighting Regiment (悟空の消防隊 Gokū no Shōbō-tai?), in which he teaches two children the importance of fire safety.[101]
Goku's appearance on Yamada Katsute-nai Wink.

Goku has made guest appearances in various Japanese television shows and manga. In 2005, Goku appeared in the Toriyama parody manga Neko Majin Z where he is the sensei of the main character Z.[102] On September 15, 2006, in celebration of the 30th anniversary of Kochira Katsushika-ku Kameari Kōen-mae Hashutsujo, the special manga Super Kochikame (超こち亀 Chō Kochikame?) was released. The chapter entitled This is the Police Station in front of Dragon Park on Planet Namek (こちらナメック星ドラゴン公園前派出所 Kochira Namekku-sei Dragon Kōen-mae Hashutsujo?) has Ryotsu Kankichi travel to planet Namek and try to issue Freeza a citation and scold he and Goku for parking their ships illegally.[103] Goku and other Dragon Ball characters join the cast of One Piece in the 2006 crossover manga Cross Epoch.[104] He also appears in a single panel of Toriyama's 2013 manga Jaco the Galactic Patrolman, which is set before the events of Dragon Ball.[105] The collected tankōbon volume of Jaco features the bonus story Dragon Ball Minus: The Departure of the Fated Child, depicting how and why Goku's father and mother, Gine (ギネ?), sent him to Earth.[106][107]

Goku has been the subject of various parodies. In the episode Career Day of Takeshi's Castle, known in the United States as MXC, the hosts Beat Takeshi and Sonomanma Higashi dressed as popular anime characters, one as Goku as a child, the other as Doraemon.[108] Weekly Shōnen Jump's Gag Special 2005 issue, released on November 12, 2004, featured a Bobobo-bo Bo-bobo one-shot Dragon Ball parody manga, a retelling of the first fight between Goku and Vegeta.[109] In chapter #179 of the Yakitate!! Japan manga, Kawachi executes a Genki-Dama parody called a Shinrai-Dama (信頼玉?, lit. "Trust Ball") on the character Katsuo.[110]
Goku's appearance as a commentator at the 2007 Nippon Ijin Taishō.

Goku regularly appears on Fuji TV. In 2003, Goku appeared in the interactive feature Kyutai Panic Adventure! (球体パニックアドベンチャー! Kyūtai Panikku Adobenchā!?, "Orb Panic Adventure!"), which was featured exclusively at the Fuji TV headquarters in the Kyutai (orb) section. In this, Freeza attacks a visiting tourist, blasting the orb section free from the rest of the Fuji TV building. Goku fights Freeza over the real life aqua city of Odaiba.[111][112] In 2004, a sequel called Kyūtai Panic Adventure Returns! (球体パニックアドベンチャーリターンズ! Kyūtai Panikku Adobenchā Ritānzu!?, "Orb Panic Adventure Returns!") was produced.[113] On March 25, 2006, Goku and Freeza appeared in an original animated short film in the IQ Mirror Mistake 7 (ＩＱミラーまちがい７ Aikyū Mirā Machigai Nana?) segment of the Japanese game show IQ Supplement (IQサプリ IQ Sapuri?).[114] On April 7, 2007, Goku and Fuji TV announcer Masaharu Miyake were commentators on the anime segment in the Nippon Ijin Taishō (日本偉人大賞?, "Japan Great Man Awards") titled Saikyō no Ijin ha Dare? (最強の偉人は誰？?, "Who is the Strongest Hero?"). The segment featured a special tournament to decide who was the greatest person in Japanese history. During the intermission, Goku promoted the coming release of R2 Dragon Ball DVDs.[115]

Since the U.S. debut of Dragon Ball Z in 1996, Goku has appeared in American pop culture. He was featured in an issue of Wizard magazine in which he and Superman fought a hypothetical battle and won.[116] In 2013 and 2015, Goku was featured twice in Screwattack's video show Death Battle, in which he loses to Superman in a hypothetical fight.[117] In the Codename: Kids Next Door episode "Operation: R.E.P.O.R.T", Numbuh Four's version of the story is a parody of the Goku and Freeza's battle in Dragon Ball Z.[118] Goku appears in Robot Chicken in a sketch entitled A Very Dragon Ball Z Christmas, where Goku and Gohan fight an evil Mrs. Claus with Santa's reindeer, in an attempt to save Christmas.[119] The Saturday Night Live sketch TV Funhouse titled Kobayashi depicts real-life hot-dog-eating champion Takeru Kobayashi as able to transform into a Super Saiyan as he prepares to eat hot dogs; Goku appears briefly near the end.[120] Goku is referenced in the songs "Goku" and "Anime" by Soulja Boy Tell 'Em, where he brags that he looks and feels like Goku and a few other Dragon Ball related characters also including unrelated Pikachu.[121] Goku appears in a parody of the film Moneyball on an episode of Mad entitled Money Ball Z, in which Billy Beane drafts Goku and a couple of other Dragon Ball characters into the Oakland A's.[122]
References

Weekly Shōnen Jump #51 December 3, 1984
Yadao, James S. The Rough Guide to Manga. Penguin Books, October 1, 2009. p. 117. ISBN 1405384239, 9781405384230. Available on Google Books.
Toriyama, Akira (May 15, 1989). "195-204". かつてない恐怖. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 17. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851614-1.
Toriyama, Akira (July 15, 1989). "205 あの世でファイト！！". 孫悟空とピッコロ大魔王. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 18. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851615-X.
Toriyama, Akira (February 25, 1996). DRAGON BALL 大全集 7: DRAGON BALL 大事典. Dragon Ball (in Japanese). Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-782756-9.
"Even Stronger!! Goku's Dream is Super-Huge". Dragon Ball Z. Episode 291. January 31, 1996.
Toriyama, Akira (August 9, 1995). "Before Dragon Ball Pt. 1". DRAGON BALL 大全集 2: STORY GUIDE. Dragon Ball (in Japanese). Shueisha. p. 46. ISBN 4-08-782752-6.
West, Mark I. (2009). The Japanification of children's popular culture: From Godzilla to Miyazaki. Lanham: Scarecrow Press. p. 203. ISBN 9780810851214.
Toriyama, Akira (August 9, 1995). DRAGON BALL 大全集 2: STORY GUIDE. Dragon Ball (in Japanese). Shueisha. pp. 164–169. ISBN 4-08-782752-6.
DRAGON BALL フルカラー フリーザ編 5 (in Japanese). Shueisha. 2013. pp. 240–245. ISBN 978-4-08-870716-7.
Toriyama, Akira (2004). DRAGON BALL 天下一伝説 (in Japanese). Shueisha. pp. 80–91. ISBN 4-08-873705-9.
Toriyama, Akira (October 9, 1995). "鳥山明的超会見 第４回". DRAGON BALL 大全集 4: WORLD GUIDE. Shueisha. pp. 164–168. ISBN 4-08-782754-2.
Toriyama, Akira (June 25, 1995). "鳥山明的超会見 第１回". DRAGON BALL 大全集 1: COMPLETE ILLUSTRATIONS. Shueisha. pp. 202–206. ISBN 4-08-782754-2.
Toriyama, Akira (1986). Dr. Slump, Volume 16. Viz Media. p. 130. ISBN 978-1-4215-1060-6.
"Shenlong Times 1". DRAGON BALL 大全集 1: COMPLETE ILLUSTRATIONS (in Japanese) (Shueisha). 1995.
DRAGON BALL 超画集 (in Japanese). Shueisha. 2013. pp. 224–225. ISBN 978-4-08-782520-6.
Toriyama, Akira (1995). DRAGON　BALL　大全集　5: TV ANIMATION PART 2. Shueisha. pp. 206–210. ISBN 4-08-782755-0.
DRAGON BALL アニメイラスト集 「黄金の戦士」 (in Japanese). Shueisha. 2010. pp. 78–79. ISBN 978-4-8342-8413-3.
Toriyama, Akira (October 7, 1992). "375 ベジータ、トランクス発進！！". セルの完全体　完成！！. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 32. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851687-7.
Toriyama, Akira (May 15, 1989). "390 悟空と悟飯外へ". セルゲーム始まる. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 17. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851688-5.
"全てオレが片付ける！！新生ベジータ親子出現". Dragon Ball Z. Episode 154. August 26, 1992. Fuji TV.
"Chinese Characters: Turtle". About.com. Retrieved June 24, 2007.
Toriyama, Akira (July 15, 1989). "211 界王さまと、がんばる死人孫悟空！". 孫悟空とピッコロ大魔王. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 18. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851615-X.
Toriyama, Akira (January 15, 1991). "279 不思議な孫悟空". 悟空か！？ギニューか！？. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 24. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851414-9.
Toriyama, Akira (November 15, 1991). "337 集う超戦士たち". 未来から来た少年. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 28. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851418-1.
Toriyama, Akira (September 10, 1995). "鳥山明的超会見" [Akira Toriyama Super Interview]. DRAGON BALL 大全集 3: TV ANIMATION PART 1 [Dragon Ball Great Complete Collection 3 TV Animation Part 1]. Dragon Ball (in Japanese). Shueisha. p. 202. ISBN 4-08-782753-4.
Dragon Ball Harmony Gold dub's credits
Dragon Ball GT: Final Bout credits
Dragon Ball Funimation dub's credits
Dragon Ball and Dragon Ball GT Chinook dub's credits
Dragon Ball Z Kai Funimation dub's credits, and Funimation's Facebook page
"Interview With Ian Corlett". www.animecauldron.com. Retrieved April 30, 2015.
Dragon Ball Z Geneon dub's credits
Dragon Ball Z Westwood dub's credits
Dragon Ball, Dragon Ball Z, Dragon Ball GT, and Dragon Ball Z Kai Funimation dub's credits
Toriyama, Akira (February 11, 1988). "127 クリリンの大作戦". 天下一のスーパーバトル！！. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 11. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851608-7.
Toriyama, Akira (w, a). "ブルマと孫悟空" Weekly Shonen Jump v17, 51: 2 (December 3, 1985), Japan: Shueisha
Toriyama, Akira (September 15, 1985). "4 亀仙人の筋斗雲". 孫悟空と仲間たち. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 1. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851831-4.
Toriyama, Akira (September 10, 1985). "8 ヤムチャおそるべし!!". 孫悟空と仲間たち. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 2. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851831-4.
Toriyama, Akira (January 15, 1986). "13 亀仙人のかめはめ波！！". ドラゴンボール危機一髪. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 2. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851832-2.
Toriyama, Akira (November 15, 1989). "224 孫悟空の静かな怒り". いそげ！孫悟空. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 19. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851616-8.
Toriyama, Akira (November 15, 1991). "336 ３年後の賭け". 未来から来た少年. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 28. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851418-1.
Toriyama, Akira (January 15, 1986). "22 悟空の大変身". ドラゴンボール危機一髪. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 2. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851832-2.
Toriyama, Akira (August 12, 1991). "318 伝説の超サイヤ人". 伝説の超サイヤ人. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 27. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851417-3.<!. -->
"Goku's New Super Saiyan God Form Revealed for DBZ: Resurrection 'F' Film". Anime News Network. 2015-04-09. Retrieved 2015-05-09.
Toriyama, Akira. "503 孫悟空最後の合体！！". バイバイ ドラゴンワールド. Dragon Ball (in Japanese) 26. Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-851090-9.
Dragon Ball Z: Fusion Reborn uncut movie (Liner notes). Texas: Funimation. 2006. 1-4210-0705-3.
Divers, Allen (2001-11-18). "Dragon Ball (manga) Graphic Novel vol 5". Anime News Network. Retrieved 2008-09-27.
Jones, Tim. "Dragon Ball anime review". themanime.org. Retrieved 2008-10-03.
"Dragon Ball Volume 1 review". Rationalmagic.com. Retrieved 2008-10-03.
Wiedemann, Julius (2004-09-25). "Akira Toriyama", in Amano Masanao (ed.): Manga Design. Taschen, p. 372. ISBN 3-8228-2591-3
"May 9 'Officially' Recognized as Goku Day". Anime News Network. 2015-05-09. Retrieved 2015-05-09.
Thompson, Jason (2011-03-10). "Jason Thompson's House of 1000 Manga – Dragon Ball". Anime News Network. Retrieved 2013-10-10.
Kishimoto, Masashi (2007). Uzumaki: the Art of Naruto. Viz Media. pp. 138–139. ISBN 1-4215-1407-9.
Oda, Eiichiro. "Interview with Eiichiro Oda and Akira Toriyama". One Piece Color Walk. One Piece (in Japanese) 1. ISBN 978-4-08-859217-6.
Suzuki, Haruhiko, ed. (2003-12-19). "5: Dragon Ball Children". Dragon Ball Landmark (in Japanese). Shueisha. p. 164. ISBN 4-08-873478-5.
Jump Comics (December 1997). Dragon Ball GT: Perfect File 2. Dragon Ball GT (in Japanese). Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-874090-4.
Toriyama, Akira (June 25, 1995). "I Love Dragon Ball #1: Jackie Chan". DRAGON BALL 大全集 1: COMPLETE ILLUSTRATIONS (in Japanese). Shueisha. p. 7. ISBN 4-08-782754-2.
Mackenzie, Chris (October 20, 2009). "Goku wins a place with the best". IGN. Retrieved October 21, 2009.
Isler, Ramsey (February 4, 2014). "Top 25 Greatest Anime Characters". IGN. Retrieved March 13, 2014.
Zoth, Thomas (January 12, 2010). "10 Most Iconic Anime Heroes". Mania Entertainment. Retrieved January 22, 2010.
"NT Research". Newtype, Issue 4 (Kadokawa Shoten). March 2010.
第9回アニメグランプリ　［1987年6月号］ [The 9th Anime Grand Prix (June issue 1987)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
第10回アニメグランプリ　［1988年6月号］ [10th Anime Grand Prix　(1988 June issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
第11回アニメグランプリ　［1989年5月号］ [11th Anime Grand Prix since (1989 May issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved December 7, 2009.
第12回アニメグランプリ　［1990年5月号］ [12th Anime Grand Prix since (1990 May issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
第13回アニメグランプリ　［1991年5月号］ [13th Anime Grand Prix since (1991 May issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
第14回アニメグランプリ　［1992年5月号］ [14th Anime Grand Prix since (1992 May issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
第15回アニメグランプリ　［1993年5月号］ [15th Anime Grand Prix (1993 May issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
第16回アニメグランプリ　［1994年5月号］ [16th Anime Grand Prix (1994 May issue)] (in Japanese). Animage. Retrieved November 17, 2013.
Dragon Ball The Complete Illustrations. Viz Media. October 2008. pp. 215, 217. ISBN 1-4215-2566-6.
Dragon Ball Forever (in Japanese). Shueisha. 2004. ISBN 4-08-873702-4.
"Goku wins a place with the best". Anime News Network. 2001-02-25. Retrieved 2008-09-26.
"1000 People Chose! The Strongest Character Ranking In Cartoon History!" (in Japanese). Retrieved 2007-10-28.
"Which Anime Character Do You Wish You Could Be Friends With?". Anime News Network. 2007-02-28. Retrieved 2009-06-29.
"Gundam Tops Anime Poll". Anime News Network. 2000-09-12. Retrieved 2008-11-10.
Dong, Bamboo (May 5, 2014). "Japanese Fans Rank Their Favorite Black-Haired Anime Characters". Anime News Network. Retrieved May 5, 2014.
"Dragonball Z BanDai Hybrid Action Mega Articulated 4 Inch Action Figure Goku". Amazon.com. Retrieved 2008-09-11.
"Super saiyan goku dragon ball z 4"" ultimate collction f". Amazon.com. Retrieved 2008-09-11.
"Dragon Ball Z DBZ GOKU 13" Plush Toy". Amazon.com. Retrieved 2008-09-11.
"Dragon Ball 5" Son Goku Plush". Amazon.com. Retrieved 2008-09-11.
"Goku & Tenkaichi Budokai - Dragonball Twin Figure Keychain (Japanese Imported)". Amazon.com. Retrieved 2008-09-11.
Munichx.de:. "Thomas D. und Bertil Mark im Interview" (in German). Retrieved January 14, 2008. "so fasziniert, aufgrund seiner Naivität und Frohsinns und gleichzeitig wurde er zum großen Kämpfer und rettet die Welt."
"e.TALIER d.ES c.HENE @ Mandarin Orchard Singapore". October 5, 2010. Retrieved September 29, 2010.
Johnson, Christopher (8 October 2010). "Rafael Nadal: The 'Dragon Ball' of tennis". CNN International. Retrieved 31 December 2011.
"The Mysterious Dragon Balls Activate!! Goku Becomes A Child!?". Dragon Ball GT. Episode 1. February 7, 1996.
Jump Comics (1997). Dragon Ball GT: Perfect File 1. Dragon Ball (in Japanese). Shueisha. p. 6. ISBN 4-08-874089-0.
"A Miraculous Come-From-Behind Victory!! Goku Saves The Universe". Dragon Ball GT. Episode 63. November 12, 1997.
"Goodbye, Goku... 'Til the Day We Meet Again". Dragon Ball GT. Episode 64. November 19, 1997.
新七龍珠 神龍的傳說 (Credits) (in Chinese). Joe Chan Jun-Leung. Tai Seng. June 27, 2000.
드래곤볼 싸워라 손오공 이겨라 손오공 (Credits) (in Korean). 1990.
Tatiana Siegel (November 13, 2007). "'Dragonball' comes to bigscreen". Variety. Retrieved November 14, 2007.
Toei Animation (1992). "Dragon Ball Z: あつまれ!! 悟空ワールド" (in Japanese). Videkko. Bandai.
"Dragon Ball, Naruto, One Piece to Enter Second Life". Anime News Network. December 21, 2007. Retrieved November 3, 2008.
"Dr Slump Arale-chan feat Son Goku Kid". GameKyo.com. September 26, 2008. Retrieved February 6, 2009.
"Son Goku Song". Dragon Ball: Complete Music Collection (CD) (in Japanese). Masako Nozawa. Japan: Columbia Records. October 21, 1991. COCC-9202.
"Gokū no Gokigen Jānī". Dragon Ball: Complete Music Collection (CD) (in Japanese). Masako Nozawa. Japan: Columbia Records. October 21, 1991. COCC-9202.
"Aitsu wa Son Goku". Dragon Ball Z Hit Song Collection (CD) (in Japanese). Hironobu Kageyama. Japan: Columbia Records. 1989. CC-3768.
"Ore-tachi no Energy". Dragon Ball Z Hit Song Collection IV: Character Special (CD) (in Japanese). Hironobu Kageyama and Masako Nozawa as Son Goku. Japan: Columbia Records. October 1, 1990. COCC-6830.
"Dragonball's Toriyama Sketches Ayumi Hamasaki as Goku". Anime News Network. February 3, 2009. Retrieved 2009-02-04.
Dragon Ball DVD Box: DragonBox (Booklet) (in Japanese). Minoru Okazaki & Daisuke Nishio. Japan: Pony Canyon. 2004. 50482.
"『ネコマジンZ』ストーリーグイヅェスト" (Flash) (in Japanese). 〒101-8050 Tokyo-to, Chiyoda-ku Hitotsubashi 2-5-10: Shueisha. Retrieved June 5, 2009.
Akimoto, Osamu (September 15, 2006). "This is the Dragon Police Station in front of the Park on Planet Namek". Super Kochikame. Kochira Katsushika-ku Kameari Kōen-mae Hashutsujo (in Japanese). 〒101-8050 Tokyo-to, Chiyoda-ku Hitotsubashi 2-5-10: Shueisha. ISBN 4-08-874096-3.
Toriyama, Akira; Oda, Eiichiro (December 25, 2006). "Cross Epoch". Shonen Jump. Dragon Ball & One Piece (in Japanese) (〒101-8050 Tokyo-to, Chiyoda-ku Hitotsubashi 2-5-10: Shueisha) (4/5).
"The Galactic Patrolman's Completed Mission". Weekly Shōnen Jump (Shueisha) (44). 2013-09-30.
"Akira Toriyama to Draw Manga About Goku's Mom". Anime News Network. 2014-02-05. Retrieved 2014-02-05.
Toriyama, Akira (2015-01-06). Jaco the Galactic Patrolman. Viz Media. pp. 232–247. ISBN 978-1-4215-6630-6.
"Career Day". MXC. Episode 52. March 24, 2005. Spike.
Sawai, Yoshio (w, a). "Dragon Ball" Shonen Jump Gag Special 2005: 2 (November 12, 2004), Japan: Shueisha
Hashiguchi, Takashi (November 18, 2005). "179 Punch Line". Yakitate!! Japan 20. Yakitate!! Japan 20. Shougakukan. pp. 11–14. ISBN 4-09-127060-3.
"Fuji TV News". Fuji TV. 2003. Retrieved September 25, 2008.
"Fuji TV listing". Fuji TV. Retrieved September 25, 2008.
"Star*Tech event listings". Star*Tech. Retrieved September 25, 2008.
"ＩＱミラーまちがい７". IQサプリ. March 25, 2006. Fuji TV.
"日本偉人大賞2007". 日本偉人大賞. April 7, 2007. Fuji TV.
The Wizard Staff (October 2002). "E@st Vs. West: Goku Vs Superman". Wizard Magazine (133): 64.
Villarreal, Mike (Jan 21, 2013). "Reaction to Superman vs Goku Death Battle". Nerd Reactor (Nerd Reactor). Retrieved 15 May 2015.
"Operation R.E.P.O.R.T.". Codename: Kids Next Door. Season 2. Episode 22a. December 5, 2003. Cartoon Network.
"Easter Basket". Robot Chicken. Season 2. Episode 23. April 16, 2006. Cartoon Network.
"Kobayashi". Saturday TV Funhouse. Episode 93. November 11, 2006. NBC.
Suen, Michael (23 July 2010). "Why Anime is Doomed: Soulja Boy Records "Anime" and "Goku," Manga Also in Works". Geekosystem. Retrieved July 29, 2010.

    "Money Ball Z / Green Care Bear". Mad. November 21, 2011. Cartoon Network.

Further reading

    Padula, Derek (2012). Dragon Ball Z 'It's Over 9,000!' When Worldviews Collide. forward by Ryo Horikawa. ISBN 978-0-9831205-2-0.

External links
Portal icon 	Dragon Ball portal
Portal icon 	Fictional characters portal
	Wikiquote has quotations related to: Goku
[show]

    v
    t
    e

Dragon Ball by Akira Toriyama
Authority control 	

    MusicBrainz: 3c202557-6d5b-4a01-9956-a343b37dd7fe

Categories:

    Adoptee characters in anime and manga
    Anime and manga characters who can move at superhuman speeds
    Anime and manga characters who can teleport
    Anime and manga characters with superhuman strength
    Anime and manga martial artists
    Child characters in anime and manga
    Child superheroes
    Comics characters introduced in 1984
    Dragon Ball characters
    Film characters
    Extraterrestrial superheroes
    Fictional angels
    Fictional monkeys
    Fictional undead
    Fictional characters who committed suicide
    Orphan characters in anime and manga
    Science fiction film characters
    Male characters in anime and manga

Navigation menu

    Create account
    Not logged in
    Talk
    Contributions
    Log in

    Article
    Talk

    Read
    Edit
    View history

    Main page
    Contents
    Featured content
    Current events
    Random article
    Donate to Wikipedia
    Wikipedia store

Interaction

    Help
    About Wikipedia
    Community portal
    Recent changes
    Contact page

Tools

    What links here
    Related changes
    Upload file
    Special pages
    Permanent link
    Page information
    Wikidata item
    Cite this page

Print/export

    Create a book
    Download as PDF
    Printable version

Languages

    العربية
    Català
    Dansk
    Español
    Euskara
    Français
    Galego
    한국어
    हिन्दी
    Hrvatski
    Bahasa Indonesia
    Italiano
    עברית
    Basa Jawa
    ಕನ್ನಡ
    Lietuvių
    Magyar
    മലയാളം
    Bahasa Melayu
    Nederlands
    日本語
    Norsk bokmål
    Polski
    Português
    Runa Simi
    Русский
    Shqip
    Српски / srpski
    Suomi
    Svenska
    తెలుగు
    ไทย
    Українська
    Tiếng Việt
    中文

Edit links

    This page was last modified on 20 September 2015, at 04:18.
    Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.

    Privacy policy
    About Wikipedia
    Disclaimers
    Contact Wikipedia
    Developers
    Mobile view

    Wikimedia Foundation	
    Powered by MediaWiki	


    Kurdî
    Кыргызча
    Лезги
    ລາວ
    لۊری شومالی
    Latina
    Latviešu
    Lëtzebuergesch
    Lietuvių
    Ligure
    Limburgs
    Lojban
    Luganda
    Lumbaart
    Magyar
    Македонски
    Malagasy
    മലയാളം
    Malti
    मराठी
    მარგალური
    مصرى
    مازِرونی
    Bahasa Melayu
    Mìng-dĕ̤ng-ngṳ̄
    Монгол
    မြန်မာဘာသာ
    Dorerin Naoero
    Nederlands
    Nedersaksies
    नेपाली
    日本語
    Napulitano
    Нохчийн
    Norsk bokmål
    Norsk nynorsk
    Occitan
    ଓଡ଼ିଆ
    Oromoo
    Oʻzbekcha/ўзбекча
    ਪੰਜਾਬੀ
    پنجابی
    پښتو
    ភាសាខ្មែរ
    Piemontèis
    Plattdüütsch
    Polski
    Português
    Qaraqalpaqsha
    Ripoarisch
    Română
    Rumantsch
    Runa Simi
    Русиньскый
    Русский
    Саха тыла
    Gagana Samoa
    संस्कृतम्
    Sardu
    Scots
    Seeltersk
    Shqip
    Sicilianu
    Simple English
    Slovenčina
    Slovenščina
    Ślůnski
    Soomaaliga
    کوردیی ناوەندی
    Српски / srpski
    Srpskohrvatski / српскохрватски
    Basa Sunda
    Suomi
    Svenska
    Tagalog
    தமிழ்
    Taqbaylit
    Татарча/tatarça
    తెలుగు
    ไทย
    ትግርኛ
    ᏣᎳᎩ
    Türkçe
    Twi
    Удмурт
    Українська
    اردو
    ئۇيغۇرچە / Uyghurche
    Vèneto
    Tiếng Việt
    Võro
    Walon
    文言
    West-Vlams
    Winaray
    Xitsonga
    ייִדיש
    Yorùbá
    粵語
    Zazaki
    Zeêuws
    Žemaitėška
    中文
    मैथिली
    Тыва дыл

Edit links

    This page was last modified on 19 September 2015, at 08:02.
    Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.

    Privacy policy
    About Wikipedia
    Disclaimers
    Contact Wikipedia
    Developers
    Mobile view

    Wikimedia Foundation	
    Powered by MediaWiki	



wnload as PDF
    Printable version

Languages

    فارسی

Edit links

    This page was last modified on 22 September 2015, at 10:28.
    Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.

    Privacy policy
    About Wikipedia
    Disclaimers
    Contact Wikipedia
    Developers
    Mobile view

    Wikimedia Foundation	
    Powered by MediaWiki	

